After Paris attacks, intel agencies coming to French aid  via

A U.S. Marine in critical condition from gun shot by Isis member in Paris today. Buckle up boys, we're goin to war.

Tribute to the fallen in Paris we must each be our brother's keeper ensuring never happens again - love's what we need!

A statement from Canadian Council of Refugees, a United Church partner, on the attacks in Paris and Beirut.  #UCCan

Canadian pictured as Paris terrorist in suspected Gamergate smear | World news | The Guardian

and fantastic talent from those days. Do you remember Leon 'Arris the man from Paris??

Paris Attacks: Iran likely to join war on ISIS after Francois Hollande's plea for unity

EXCLUSIVE The pot-smoking Paris suicide bomber: Ex-wife reveals 'blood brother'

French police hunt for second fugitive involved in the Paris attacks  via

Today's News: Virginia for the Win: Paris may shape the presidential race in swing states

Hypocrites all over the world.. #PrayForParis Paris Needs Us Now.. But a bomb went off in Yola today  we dont see d need to #PrayForNigeria

He loves the chance to go to Paris  show off his French fluency, but he's still more of an empty suit playing part of Sect State.

U.S. Attorney General Addresses Paris Attacks  #video [ad  ]

CHILLING Video Shows What Terrorists Were Doing Just Before Paris Attack  #tcot

Worth a watch - father and son after Paris attacks  via

Catch on RNN TV's at 6PM #Paris Aftermath, Refugee debate Channel:

Justin Bieber Pays Heartfelt Tribute To Friend Killed In Paris Terror Attacks: which is part of Universal  #UMG

I might go to at Caberet Savage in Paris, France - Feb 9

Truth. His quiet spreading must not be overlooked in the shadow of Paris tragedy.

Uh,uh,uh our strategy is working. We have them contained. Umm Paris was a slight set back #WorstPresidentEver

It is amazing to see how different our reactions are in comparison with 9/11 vs. Paris. We are growing, we are becoming more aware.

So, this means that Kerry thinks there was some sort of rationale for last week's attack on Paris?

Prince William and Duchess Kate pay respects to Paris victims

Paris video 'shows ninth attacker': French security sources say that surveillance video shows  retweet to share

Obama used the phrase, folks wanna pop off? Obummer chuck McCain said Paris did more bombing damage than USA. #SnackAttack

US Sec. of State Kerry sees 'rationale' in Charlie Hebdo murders, unlike Friday's attacks in Paris - politico

Jacksonville woman recalls terror in Paris | reports:

he has power to raise your dead soul to life. I am proof. Repent and believe the gospel while u have time #paris

VIDEO: Turkish Crowd Asked Observe Moment of Silence for Paris.. You Won't Believe What Happened Next  via

After Paris Attacks, Vilifying Refugees, via Certainly happening here. #politics

MIDNIGHT IN PARIS (2011) | DOP: Darius Khondji | Director: Woody Allen

Pregnant Woman Finds Hero Who Saved Her During Paris Attacks [VIDEO]

How to deal with terrorism like the attacks in Paris - FoxTV Business News:  via

If you wore black for Paris today just to post a picture on Instagram saying black out you really need to revaluate yourself

I'm so saddened to hear about what happened in Paris

Your Tuesday Evening Briefing: Paris, Charlie Sheen, Refugees

A French Journalist who's wife died in the Paris attacks wrote this heartbreaking message to her murders.

Paris Terror Attacks Stoke Encryption Debate: U.S. state and federal law enforcement officials app

This husband and father, who lost his wife in the Paris attacks, has got it spot on. What a fine specimen of a human

Concert happening in St Patrick's Cathedral this Friday to mark the Paris attacks#ConcertForParis #ParisAttacks

Paris Terror Attacks Stoke Encryption Debate: U.S. state and federal law enforcement officials appear poised t

Ongoing siege taking place in #SaintDenis, Paris. Live updates here -

Official Response from Paris 2018 after Paris Attacks -

#Paris #climate talks could be a light in the darkness of terror

'Two jihadists' killed in Paris shootout  via

From MSNBC Does the U.S. Need a New ISIS Strategy?: The attacks in Paris prompt renewed criticism of the U.S.'

Paris latest: 5 arrested, one still inside apartment

Paris Terror Siege: What We Know So Far

Paris terrorists cornered in Saint-Denis apartment:  #9News

Sad thing is the tombs of the first Bishop of Paris #SaintDenis and the Kings of France has become the Islamic suburb of Paris

Muslims Praise The Paris Jihadists As MARTYRS During Moment Of Silence And Greece Soccer Game

If only liberty was indestructible but politicians are exploiting Paris to take liberties from ordinary citizens

Breaking: Terror suspects killed  arrested following police raid in Paris  via

2 suspects killed during police raid in Paris

The French government. I wish Indian Government was half as efficient as them #Respect #Paris #francefightback

Oh Lord. Now a further serious incident in Saint-Denis, Paris. Another traumatic news day ahead  my heart's heavy with fear.

spike in #Islamophobic hate crime in UK following terror attacks..#UK

Cymbidium Robin Hood by HVS Orchids styled in the residence of the Netherlands in Paris! With it's sweet green

Paris attacks: French military launches second wave of air strikes against Islamic State in Syria - as it happened

Not only just IS, all terrorists including Gaza Jihadists.They too celebrated Paris!!

Retweeted CNN Air France flight from Los Angeles to Paris diverted to Utah due to security incident, an

Two #Paris-bound flights diverted to #Halifax and #Utah over unspecified security concerns

This. Means. War.Anonymous declares war on ISIS in wake of Paris attacks:

BJP will debate 'Effect of Babri on Paris Attack wt Barkha..

Two Paris-bound Air France flights from US diverted due to bomb threats  via

What happened in Paris recently was very sad. But people die in civil wars every day. Millions every year. Why do we only mourn some #peace

Bataclan owners urge onlookers to stay away: The owners of The Bataclan, the Paris music venue we  ckdsradio.eu

LIVE: Police raid in Saint-Denis related to #Paris attacks, deaths reported #//t.co/l9XIHizeVe

#Syringes In Hotel Room Linked To Paris Plot

Newsworthy: Report: Raid targets Paris attacks mastermind - NBC's Chris Jansing reports the latest on an operat

Woman blows self, as raid on terrorists mount in Paris: Two suspected jihadists were killed, including a woman

#skynews wall to wall coverage of Police action in Paris all speculation very few facts

Paris Terror and the US - Connecting the Dots | Clarion Project -

there is a police operation right now in St Denis (near Paris), and there already 4 policemen injured

Suspects Had Planned Attack on Paris Business District: Source  via

Live coverage: Woman detonated a suicide belt in the morning raids in Saint-Denis, Paris

Facebook Activates Safety Check for Yola Bomb Victims, Following Paris Backlash Zuckerberg's listed to criticism.

Was sleeping but looks like a lot of action in Paris.officials close in on attack mastermind

LATEST: Five arrests, at least one dead in #SaintDenis raid in #Paris. GMA LIVE STREAM:

Fucking hell. A second attack was lined up in Paris? Credit to the police for getting there in time. Horrible.

#THEMBNG .COM #NEWS: Raid Targets Paris Attacks Mastermind  #MICHIGAN #LANSING

Traffickers count on ignorance, apathy to allow them to victimize men, women and children-Kendis Paris/Truckers against Trafficking #TWC2015

I'm going back to Paris soon. Are you coming with me or would it make you too emotional? How dare you attack a reporter?

Paris: Way special police  military are gathering suggests final assault is being prepared

What Paris dealt with was a pin prick compared to what happens in Syria every single day but it doesn't change the fact that people died too

LADY TECNIQ NEWS Talking to kids about tragedies - Immediately after the horrific Paris attacks, so many parent

Two Air France flights from the United States to Paris diverted due to bomb threats  via

now khabardar so please if you about history famous cities so plz about paris thanks alot bye and good luck

Talking to the children about Paris attacks. How did your child's school handle it?

Explosions took place in #SaintDenis the northern suburbs of Paris  two suspects linked to Friday's attacks died

People forget Paris wasn't alone that got attacked! #PrayForLebanon 43 killed, 239 wounded at refuge camp. #OpISIS #Anonymous

DTN USA: England vs. France: Fans unite against Paris attacks:

Paris attacks: Anonymous releases guide to finding Isis online #WorldNews

A picture is worth a thousand words.And This is exactly what happened in #Paris.#ParisAttacks

hi Tom, what's the atmosphere like in Paris right now? #SaintDenis

2 terror suspects dead in raid on Paris attacks#8217; mastermind

please cancel the belgium and the two paris shows.

then what? What do you mean ?Paris should also live the same life as Syrians?Why? Explain

yes of course ,is like saying never go back to Paris or London or Madrid

problem solved! Streaming from Paris, keeping calm!

rt #BADLANDS VIDEO: Explosions and gunfire heard in Paris: Mobile phone footage in St Denis, northern Paris, c

Pray for Paris (and eat Pret) xoxoxo

In my opinon, team of 10 ppl caught in apt w/ suicide vests  heavy arms, I'd say God had his hand on #Paris this morning #PrayforParis

Iraqi-Kurdish leader says Paris attacks a 'wake-up call' via /r/worldnews

A great Tribute to Paris last night at #CMOEU. Thanks for the picture Sam.

Police raid Saint-Denis in hunt for Paris attacks mastermind - YouTube

This is beautiful. 20 favourites for finding that joie de vivre in Paris again by

#Breaking: LIVE coverage of the #Paris raids on This Morning. reports 7 suspected terrorists arrested.

Top story: 2 dead after early morning police raid on Paris apartment  see more

Paris shootout: Woman suicide bomber, 2 others killed as cops raid apartment Source:India Today

#StDenis Could this jihadi cell have been part of attack on the 18th district that for some unknown reason never took place?#Parisattacks

take Ifrane, I'll take Paris

#Breaking update: 7 people now arrested in raids in #Paris suburb of #SaintDenis linked to deadly attacks.

Bloomberg - Paris Raids Target Terrorist Ringleader, Leaving at Least 2 Dead

French police arrest 5 in connection with investigation of Paris attacks

War scenes near Paris today. Staying safeYesterday's rehearsal with Sheila Jordan  gig with the Moutin

Why have attacks in France gotten so much more attention than bombings in #Lebanon? via

The Latest: Historic Paris suburb filled with armed police  (AP) #news

2 additional arrests made in #Paris within the last 1/2 hour. CNN is really on this! They have crews everywhere reporting constantly. #CNN

the Israelis are being kind. If positions were reversed, the French would demand restraint and Paris suburbs dismantled.

Terror Attack On Paris May Shift The Oil War

Seven arrests in post-attacks #Paris assault: police source-AFP

Media Berated Glenn Beck For This 2011 Prediction- Now It's Come True #WhatIfGlennBeckIsRight #Paris

ISIS Terrorist attack police in Paris - France (NEW FOOTAGE)

Souvenirs de Paris.New photo story on my website.

2 Paris-bound flights cleared after bomb threats diverted planes. FBI: No credible threat. Passengers intvwd #wakeupwash

Paris attacks: Police dog Diesel killed by terrorists in Saint-Denis siege after brave act

Seven arrested as police target suspects in Paris apartment: Seven people have been arrested in a raid on an a

2 Paris-Bound Planes Diverted Due to Bomb Threats

Live Updates: At Least 1 Dead, 7 Arrested After Police Raid In Paris Suburb  via

7 Arrested, 2 Dead in Paris Raids  - ABC News -  via

Ahead of the UN Climate Change Conference in Paris #COP21!

#AlJazeera Deaths, arrests in police raid seeking Paris att  |

Retweeted Zee News LIVE: At least 2 jihadis killed, 7 arrested in massive anti-terror raid in Paris

Putin eases Ukraine debt terms in about face after Paris attacks $TRF #finanzas

According to reports, Paris attacks mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud has been killed in anti-terror raid in  Paris

uTerrorists vs. SWAT in Paris here:  . #ParisAttacks #BEFOUR #mwgs #MotoGP

AP NewsAlert: Police: 7 now arrested in raids in Paris suburb linked to deadly attacks.  (WP)

#IBTM15 Uninspired? A refreshing option, with direct flights Paris to #Seychelles #incentives in paradise are easy!

#Paris POLICEMAN IN PARIS!!!LISTEN CAREFULLY, SMOKE THESE TERRORISTS OUT!!!!! Like what happened in US #Watertown Boston Marathon bombers.

#Parisattacks: Abdelhamid Abaaoud, mastermind of Friday's attack, targeted in major police raid in St Denis

Police raid targeted suspected Paris attacks mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud: police source. (AFP)

Watch a father and son have a touching conversation about the Paris attacks  via TIMEWorld

Wakeup now: Authorities in Paris swarm a suburb amid heavy gunfire; Iraqi forces bombs ISIS hideouts.the toll.

Something to think about.. ISIS Nigeria attack #ParisAttacks #Islamophobia

Born a DOG. Died a GENTLEMAN.DIESEL named as police dog killed in Saint Denis raids hunting for Paris attackers

Not just Paris. 32 people killed in Nigeria yesterday. Nothing to do with open EU/borders/refugees

#BREAKING: AP - French government spokesman says 7-hour operation targeting mastermind of  Paris attacks and accomplices is over

Kylie Minogue has paid tribute to her fan Nick Alexander who was killed in the Paris attacks

is anyone else wondering what the special opts Paris officers are doing breaking into that church door?

fox25news: #BREAKING IN #PARIS: Government spokesman says the operation in Paris suburb of Saint-Denis is over. (

In #TheMorningNews starting at 6:02: 7 arrests at a deadly Paris raid; 3 hurt in 2 #ROC shootings; Assini running.

Like guys its fine.. Paris is pretty safe

NB to PM TrudeauThose who expect to reap the blessings of freedom must, like men, undergo the fatigue of supporting it. #cdnpoli #Paris

Anyone working for the BBC not in Paris? You ought to be wondering what you've done wrong?

Coach Fatih Terim slams Turkish fans for booing the minute silence for Paris attack victims (Video)

I had a dream I was decorating a Christmas tree then out of nowhere I was on a boat to Paris

BBC reporter sheds tears on TV at Paris attack site

Paris attacks live updates: Raid in Saint Denis where 'Mastermind' Abdelhamid Abaaoud was 'surrounded' in shoo

.fastFT: Police raid in northern Paris over  #PINKFINANCE

Paris Siege Flat Owner: 'I Don't Know Anything'

Amen! U.S. Soldier Reveals Truth Behind ISIS and Paris Terror Attacks  via

Stories of those who died in the Paris attacks - Yahoo News India  via

Saw some tweets on how #France wanted #SriLanka to stop attacks on #terrorism. With #ParisAttacks, I suppose they no longer feel that way.

2 Air France Flights Cleared After Threats Forced Them To Divert: Authorities cleared both Air France flights bound for Paris from th

Two Air France flights bound for Paris diverted after security threats

About forty days late in expressing it, but my thoughts are with those in Paris. : Ugh.

Liked on YouTube: French Sermon on Day of Paris Attacks: Our Children Can Become Rulers of France by Legal Means

French authorities say anti-terror raid in Paris suburb over after 7 hours; 7 suspects arrested, 2 dead

The french government says the operation in the Paris suburb of Saint-Denis is over. #CapitalReports

NEWS: Two dead after siege targeting suspect behind Paris attacks

Names of victims start to emerge in Paris terror attack | brvbar; 76  #nohemigonzalez

MMSS agreed to work on this in Feb after Charlie Hebdo attack? What happened since then? More #ParisAttacks

MORE: 2 suspects killed during police raid in Paris --

Paris attacks: EU troops could be sent to France as terrifying details of hellip; : -

Extraordinary hypocrisy:In retaliation for #ISIS attacks in #Sinai  #Paris, #Russia bombed non-#ISIS targets in #Aleppo  #Idlib.

Anti-terror exercise held days after Paris attacks  #today

All good - at work - watching more drama in Paris unfold.

#Paris restaurants defy terrorism in the most French way possible

The video is so sweet and precious. A Father-Son Conversation After Paris Terror is Viral

Anybody coming from Cairo to Paris soon?

I added a video to a playlist  Disneyland Paris Vlog

Three dead in Saint-Denis, Paris raids as police close in on terror attacks mastermind

Paris attacks heighten security concerns for   #security #police #doorman #nightclub #sia #closeprotection #bouncer

French police dog Diesel killed by jihadists during Paris raid

Paris Gun Battle: What We Know So Far  via

Two suspects dead in Paris police raid: AljazeeraTwo suspects linked to Fridays deadly attacks in Paris died af

yeah, you know what Paul?  It didn't.  There is nothing new or different in what happened in Paris.  It's not

One Jihad Shot Dead Woman Uses Suicide Bomb Man Snipered In Paris France Fighting Back.:  via

Why Is Edward Snowden Being Blamed For Paris Attacks  Please //t.co/rxHLANIhVC

#ParisAttacks: Interior minister and #Paris prosecutor share details on police raids

statesman: 2 dead, 7 arrested in raid targeting Paris attack mastermind

Paris is wild man them people gotta be tired

Serve paris green acting card as far as affirm impressions: AgPT

EAGLES OF DEATH METAL: Enter UK Charts Following Paris Attacks | Jonny Hartwell on 3WS Radio  via

who will even go to Paris to die.

once again paris attacks how long innocent people will suffer when the shame will stop

Ferrari also doesn't want to take the agreed number of 20K Syrian refugees into UK after #Paris

Advice from Warwickshire Police: Following the tragic events in Paris last week the UK threat level from

Syrian passport in Paris may be planted: Germany -  via

A lot of breaking news in Paris as the sun came up today. #cnn #ParisAttacks

Two terror suspects dead, five arrested in Paris raid.  Five police injured, one police dog killed.

BBC News - #France - 'Heavy shooting' heard north of #Paris

Police seeking the Paris attacks mastermind carried out a deadly dawn raid

Was one of the original shooters from Friday nights attack on Paris the woman who was killed last night wearing the bomb  vest? Hmmmmm?

Jah know I hope the Paris police got that devil. Praying they got him  he's among the dead!

PARIS - French government says all 129 victims of the Paris attacks have been identified. Copyright 2015

How many police officers would have died today in Paris if they were not permitted to shoot to kill? #Paris

The Terror Attacks on Paris: Reflections on the Aftermath Via The Amazing Atheist.

Raids in northern Paris in search for key suspect conclude | Breaking News |  |

BREAKING NEWSFRENCH POLICE REPORTED INJURED IN ANTI-TERROR RAID IN PARIS SUBURB#TCOT

UPDATE- 2 suspected terrorists killed, 7 arrested in raid north of Paris. Police believe the terrorists were planning another attack.

honest and sane article. Very mature by  Why Paris happened ?

SP turns positive; data, Paris attacks eyed

An excellent article. I've grown yet more sympathetic to the plight of Syrian refugees since Paris, as they are

#usgovernment Dead killers, hunted suspects after Paris attacks: (Reuters) - France and Belgium are stri  #news

Seven people were arrested in raids targeting the Paris mastermind --

This is what Boots on the Ground will produce - dead cockeoaches. Live Blog: Siege In Paris Ends, (cont)

Paris Siege and Square Prices IPO--5 Things to Know Today

#Bosnia|n Muslim Fans Disrupt Minute Silence for Victims of Paris Attacks   #parisattacks

#Gunshots rattle #Paris suburb, #police raid targets suspected #attack mastermind

Chart: Quite a rally in some defense shares after the Paris attacks -

Florida man charged with threatening to firebomb Islamic center after Paris terrorist attacks

[Society] West Leverages Paris Attacks for Syria Endgame: The terrorist attacks carried out in the heart   #YAF

LADY TECNIQ NEWS Explosions heard as raid unfolds near Paris

Turkish fans didn't boo Paris victims  #worldnews #news #breakingnews

#Gawker 2 Dead and 7 Arrested After Police Raid Suburban Paris Apartment: When police attempted to storm an ap

132 died in Paris Terror attack and some of FB friends screened their profile pic with French flags. If we add

Shots fired in Paris suburb as police surround terror suspects  via

Welch eine Schande!! Partner?Turkish fans interrupt minute of silence for Paris terrorist victims  via

Watching #PMQs right now. Great tribute from about the Paris attacks.

I have French family,had friends caught up in Paris but people have told me I'm racistunfollowed me for tweeting about it more than Beirut.

And asks about reclaiming all controls of UK borders in light of Paris attacks, PM says UK out of Schengen

Paris I am so sorry for what has happen in your country I am also sorry that our Prisdent is a coward.

Inside the XI: A community hard hit by Paris attacks: Residents of the c

At this point Paris is a war zone for certain.

Slide Show: An Early-Morning Raid North of Paris, via Eddie

Plz take a moment when you can, to enter your cathedral of mind for a kneel down and a prayer for all of Paris.

Here's the issue of the moment! 2 terror suspects dead after French police raid north of Paris - Washington Post

Hundreds enjoy night out in bars and cafes of Paris in defiance of ISIS attacks

who shot up Paris? Who blew up 32 in Nigeria? Nazi's? Uh No Muslim extrmists did

Idk man like I wanna say shit but 130 people just got shot up in Paris for existing so I think I'm just gonna let this one go.

Paris attacks: police injured in St-Denis shootout amid hunt for ninth attacker

3 dead including police dog, 7 arrested  5 officers injured after terror raid in Paris

Paul Weston's response to the Paris attacks will be released officially tonight.

Israeli PM exploits Paris attacks, justifying state terror against Palestinians: PLO  via

Obama is LATE for the Moment of Silence Held by G20 Leaders to Mourn Paris Attacks | VIDEO

5 things to know on Wednesday, November 18, 2015 - Here are the 5 things you need to know: a raid in Paris targ

#PMQs never let tragedy go to waste;bring on warmongers;No announcement yet to Nuke ISIS;or Invade Belgium(Where Paris Attacks came from)

A request for comment: Towards a Climate Stabilized Modernity  Paris may fail, but perhaps a diff polity?

Paris police move in on suspects: Gunfire erupts in Paris as police move in on more suspects linked to last week's gun and bomb attac

Paris Attack and More News and More I'm going to keep tweeting this stuff, until people wake up. #ParisFalseFlag

Paris attacks: Mother died using her body to shield her five-year-old son from bullets - Times

Feds fight to end phone secrecy after Paris attacks

#ParisHilton Paris Hilton Regal Black Satin Pumps Size 7.5 M:  $29.99End Date: Friday Nov-27-2015 23:10:48 PST

Paris Attacks: Seven Arrested in Police Raids in Saint-Denis

David Cameron endorses shoot-to-kill policy if police believe terrorist is on loose and pays tribute to French police action in #Paris #PMQs

Amen. Our Traitor-in-chief is only about defending Islam not America or Americans. I'm sure he blames Paris for the attacks

The amount of AP mobile alerts I woke up to about Paris was insane. France is not messing around.

PARIS - French president says he wants 'large coalition' against #IslamicState group. Copyright 2015 The Associated

The Islamic State (Full Length) el estado islamico #Siria #Syria #Paris

Suspects killed in French police raid in north Paris  via

White House Affirms Syrian Refugee Plan Despite #Paris Attacks infin; 76

Let's Pray  Be Prepared that Obama Listens to his Military  Law Enforcement Leaders   Prevent Attacks Here In US!

as i suspected: 1st poll post Paris in NH, shows Trump slight gains, Rubio gains, Carson fall off. no movement for Jeb, others.

See Charlie Hebdo's defiant response to the Paris attacks:

2 terror suspects killed, 7 arrested in raid targeting Paris attack mastermind  via the Android appGet them

#Moscow residents pay tribute to victims of #Paris attacks

Latest: France: Notre Dame Cathedral holds mass for victims of Paris attacks

Richard Fuller, Bedford: Paris police are heroes. Will PM ensure our police have resources to keep us safe? #PMQs

Investors ditch shares in airlines for stocks in defence and security firms after Paris attacks

Heavy Gunfire, Suicide, as French Police Raid Paris Terror Suspects' Way Station   / NYTimes

Looking at his website he probably was until Paris.

Six-hour Raid Ended:  2 killed, 7 arrested in the raid in #Paris' Saint Denis targeting #ParisAttacks mastermind

Via Friendship Begins Over Shared Grief At Paris Memorial

yep also interesting compared to Sep, trump similar. He has a ceiling, it seems, even with Paris.

This will be the new normal in Pittsburgh. In less than a week, Second Paris Attack Foiled  via

We have designed and assembled the stand for #ACCIONA at #EWEA2015, Paris.

Let's see now, Obama is out of the country so watch out D.C. the next Paris?

#Paris DRILLS PLANNED ON SAME DAY!  Where have we heard that before?

It aired during the Paris attacks and in the episode the Kids join ISIS Kind of

French police dog Diesel killed by jihadists during Paris raid: A French police dog named Diesel was killed on

Beirut, Paris, or Peshawaran act of terrorism is equally condemnable

France News: Paris attacks: Police in deadly swoop on apartment in northern suburbExplosions and heavy gunfire

Shout out to the officers in the Paris raids last night. 7 arrests, and no officer injuries. Beau.

Twitter Has Censored Gory Images of the Paris Attacks |  france has got a long way to go to catch up w/ turkey tho.

One woman blew herself up, at least five others arrested in #SaintDenis police operation in Paris

geraldo just fillerbusters during his tv segnment in paris

Gamergate supporters blamed for hoax 'Paris terrorist' image of innocent Sikh

MiamiHerald: No threat found on both diverted flights from U.S. to Paris

No colonial fiction | The artist formerly known as Mos Def on the Paris attacks  -

RIP Diesel the police dog who also died in Paris

Ahmed Rashid: From Mumbai to Paris -- The New York Review of Books

Muslims face backlash after Paris attacks

Tribune: 2 dead, 7 arrested in raid targeting Paris attack mastermind

NBCNews: Two Air France flights to #Paris diverted after bomb threats

Sheriff says attacks like those in Paris possible in SC (from #ParisAttacks

Paris:Saint Denis Me Police Ka Operation, 7 Dhamakay, Hamlon K Master Mind Abdul Hameed Samet 3 Afrad Maray GayeReP Dr Iltaf M.haSSani

Two suspects killed, seven arrested in raid on Paris attackers' apartment in north Paris - World News

Video: Turkey Fans Boo Moment of Silence for Paris Attacks, Then Break Out Into chants

Ignorance of what? How were the #Paris attacks due to a proxy war between super powers?

31% of Americans believe ISIS is contained, or don't own televisions. #Trump #tcot #p2 #BREAKING #Paris #Syria

Great news master mind of Paris attack is dead great work by Russia,France,usa and UK destroyed them more

EVIL: The Turkish football fans all booed and shouted Allah Akbar during the minute silence for Paris in Istanbul #tcot

Hunt for suspected Paris ringleader circles back to city on edge  #Washington #Post #news

Paris Attacks: #MichelHazanavicius Pens Sexually Explicit Open Letter to ISIS

Video: Two Air France flights to Paris from US diverted after bomb threats

Major developments out of Paris this morning. Read the latest here:

Paris attacks: Flags at half mast in Shropshire as books of condolence launched   via

2 #dead, 7 arrested in #raid targeting mastermind of #Paris attacks - Nov 18 AM ET

Three Britons injured in Paris return home after release from hospital

He reminds me of some of the parents of mass shooters: A father's  struggle to save his son- a Paris suicide bomber

Poor little baby responds to President Obama's comments calling Paris attacks a 'setback'

Ocean Press - The Syrian passport found in Paris - See how it's easy obtaining a real new one

Gunfire erupts near Paris stadium as police hunt fugitives #Political

THE BBC using a terrorist murders in Paris to attack Corbyn !! Cheap, Tory right wing sympathisers , not even trying to hide bias !!

Police raid underway in Paris suburb, several officers reportedly injured  #LiveOnWLOS

From Beirut to Paris, the Same Right to Live- on double standards of mourning

In 2011 flew the world's first commercial biofuel flight, carrying 171 passengers from Amsterdam to Paris!

#Politico #Politics Two dead, seven arrested in Paris raid: At least one person is dead, a wo  #UniteBlue #Tcot

Of the 9 attackers in Paris ONE was a refugee. The rest were Belgium and French nationals. Bringing in refugees doesn't put as at more risk

How do you explain the Paris attacks to a child? This father found the most beautiful way

British Govt, instead of re-enforcing our borders is using the Paris horror as a distraction to further instil FEAR in Britain!

45AM!45AM! 45AM!52AM! Terrorists attacked Paris.

I think Obama is doing this hoping that the terrorists will do what did in Paris so he can declare Marshall law.

How Mashable is memorializing victims of Paris attacks with a Twitter account,

Woman blows herself up, man killed, in massive Paris assault - Channel News Asia: CBS NewsWoman blows herself

I will keep the people in Paris in my prayers

Brave police dog killed by woman suicide bomber in Paris siege

If the migration crisis is the reason for the Paris attacks, why we're some of them french/belgian? Loose Women #hypocritical

Will the Paris attacks bring a new cohesion to Western plans to combat ISIS?

News: VIDEO: 'We saw best and worst of humanity in Paris'

Only Jews Were Saved After France Ignores Russia-Israel Warning Of Paris Massacre  via

Turkey football fans boo and chant 'Allahu Akbar' during silence for Paris victims  Kill every one of these bastards

Paris Attack: Two die during police raid in an apartment  -See more at:

Attacks show limits of ISIS's strategy - and of resistance. Olivier Roy spot on as usual.  (But the NYT in French?)

No threat found on 2 diverted US-to-Paris flights; more on 10News:

2 dead, 7 arrested in raid targeting Paris attack mastermind | Sakal Times

A raid in the Saint-Denis suburb of Paris is over. #ParisSiege

I put this little video together for you. Paris is love, Paris is life! #JeSuisParis (Best in HD)

Get Familiar! Paris Attacks: UEFA Says Champions League  Europa Fixtures Will Not Be Cancelled

I'm sorry for your loss. Then you remember the Boston lockdown like Paris? Compassion yes, fools no

Return of the Demonized: a Great Catastrophic Earthquake Has Erupted #uspoli #cdnpoli #ukpoli #paris #berlin

Champions League and Europa League games will go ahead despite Paris attacks, confirm UEFA

#Paris Crime comes from one source, one country, one kingdom:#Saudi #Arabia. #Saudi_Destroy_France #FranceAttacks #FranceUnderAttack

Well, I've never been more terrified to go to Paris as I am now. Hope nothing happens while I'm there.

Ireland : Khaled Saadi Ndiaye and Gregory Reibenberg marched together for loved ones killed in Paris attacks

World: Who is the man accused of planning the Paris massacre?: Belgian ISIS operative Abdelhamid Abaaoud spent

All about them: Mizzou, Black Lives protesters say Paris attacks took spotlight |  Haha #stupid

#dieselthedog did more to fight terror than most political leaders. Imagine that. #Paris

Secret Services found tht terrorists who bombed in PARIS was conectd with each othr through PS4,so now terrorists will play COD in real life

#News: Wednesday's Top 7 Stories at NBC News: From a deadly raid in a Paris suburb to wintry   via

#World: Stop Radicalization: Paris on 7-9 January - Paris again on 13 November. In between,   via

French President  Welcomes Refugees Despite Attack

After Paris attacks, lawmakers seek greater access to encrypted data

Trending: Paris Police Raid: Visuals  Ground Report From Saint-Denis

#AlJazeera #News Inside the XI: A community hard hit by Paris attacks: Residents of the cos  #MiddleEast #World

One Paris attacker applied for ASYLUM and then traveled to France for the attack. He was NOT A REFUGEE in any

One Woman's Facebook Status Against Changing Her Profile Picture to Support Paris Has -

PR Agency Issues Apology After Using Paris Attacks To Sell Nail Polish  via #PR

that is correct they did some raids and they apparently disrupted a big attack in paris seriously

Another terror mommy who needs a good hard smack. No wonder these vile creatures turn out this way. #Paris

Paris attacks: French fans united in grief - Arriving at Wembley Stadium, it was clear that this was no ordinar

What's happening? This matters. #climatechange #pollution #Paris #oil #SaudiArabia sees End of Oil Age coming

President Obama Attacks Republicans For Paris Response  via

into our country we have had 9/11  Paris had 11/13. We do NOT need any other national mishaps bc of misinformed intelligence

France on the offensive. Stops attack just before it happens.

Chairman Jawahery opens IFA's 2015  Strategic Forum in Paris.

Two #AirFrance flights heading from the United States to Paris are diverted by a couple of bomb threats

So Justin and I are just hanging out on the couch at some kickback in Paris and I ask him to sing Get Used To It for me.

I just can't wrap my hands around the events in Paris.  I can't comprehend that kind of violence nor the hatred

#GoogleMaps displayed the location of the #Paris tragedy when people searched for 'Daesh'  via

Trump: Obama Was 'Angry At Reporters' and GOP, Instead of at Paris 'Killers' - Breitbart Obama is a TRAITOR

Well I'm praying for my colonial masters. Also Paris sounds fashonable. Syria? Please

RT Elisabeth grills press secretary Josh Earnest over Pres. Obama's 'setback' comments in response to Paris attacks

I added a video to a playlist  French police arrest Paris attack suspects in video during swoop on

Direct victim not giving in to hatred, while in PH, a journalist doing polls asking if the attack happens in PH..etc

Paris Attacks Raises Encryption as Key Issue to 2016   #Tech |

Der because Beirut is a war zone and Paris isn't

Planes Bomb ISIS: Syria Air Strikes Continue In Response To ISIS Attacks In Paris  via Tara Dodrill

Wtf Turkish fans boo through pre-match minute's silence for Paris victims  via

#Breaking144 The Talker: 5 things on our radar today: From the latest in the Paris unrest to an h  #AceNewsDesk

November 18th and still none of the Paris terrorists are Syrian refugees.

After Paris, Europe must lead the fight against  Islamophobia  via

Even our 4 legged friends are heroes.  I just read a police dog was killed in the Paris raid. #ParisAttacks #ParisRaid

Paris Attacked. Russians Attacking! Obama Attacking Climate Change! Congressman Collin Peterson, Where the hell

Wednesday's Top 7 Stories at NBC News: From a deadly raid in a Paris suburb to wintry weather socking the West, here are the stories

Met reviews its tactics following Paris attacks:  #Joblikenoother

Ireland : PARIS ATTACKS: George Osborne says Britain has got the cyber ammunition to take on Islamic State

Apologies for the absence. We've been too broken-hearted to post. Our thoughts are with the people of Paris, and

#ModiMinistry Belgium became breeding ground for IS and France ignored actionable intel: Decoding the Paris attack

Not sure what he is more passionate about, his LIES or his ACTIONS.#IRS #VA #DOJ #Border #bergdahl #ISIS #Paris ETC

Livestream Panel: #Islamophobia in the Wake of Paris and Beirut feat  Thx for the shoutout

EDITORIAL IPCC and the media: Last Tango in Paris - News Weekly #media

#RIPDiesel   #PARIS ---    LOOK OUT  #ISIS   aka #ARSEis  #France #Russia #USA #Australa #UK coming to get you SCUM

A sermon at Carson's church this past Saturday referenced Paris as a sign of End Times.

U.S. flights to Paris diverted following bomb threats

#business #retail ISIS pulled off two of its most alarming attacks in the space of less than a month

Clear Thinking on Terrorism, Not Myths, Needed After Paris Attacks

Turkey fans boo minute's silence for Paris victims via /r/news

I ain't worried about Paris it's a war going on right here in CT.

in Paris and have began praying for those affected by the terrible event. Christians in Pakistan are no strangers to terrorist

TITLE: Live youngCLIENT: EvianAGENCY: BETC Paris#CreativeUnusuals#WittyWednesdays

[ISS] As the scale of the terrorist casualties in Paris in last Friday's attacks became known, F

Dramatic scene in paris as a blonde ang mo girl firing AK47 at police and blew herself up as they closes in

2 terrorists killed in overnight Paris raid

ISIS Infographics Explain Deadly Paris Attacks And Aftermath

After Paris, now comes the assault on privacy  #cdnpoli #canpoli

But if there are terrorist attacks in places like Nigeria, Lebanon or Iraqwell, it's expected there. Not in places like Paris.

4 Things To Know: French Police Raid, Paris Flights Diverted, Thanksgiving  More

French security moves people at Rue Bichat in the 10th arrondissement of Paris following a string of attacks

old deray should head over to Paris and investigate in person, maybe he'll get shot!

photos of police raid in Saint-Denis, North of Paris  via

no better way to kick off the radio show than with Michael Morell. listen live here:   talking #ISIS #paris #syria

Rt Seven arrested in Paris terrorism raid that leaves two dead

Duran Duran Lend Support to Fan-Led Music Campaign Following Paris Attacks

Muse kick-off world tour in Mexico with tribute to Paris -

ok! did we not just have a WOMAN blow herself up in suburbs of Paris!!

Financial Times - Paris attacks: Live blog - French police mount a massive operation in northern Paris

BBC News - Paris attacks: Explosions and gunfire heard

Because it's easier to sell: Republicans Choose Fear Over Leadership In Aftermath Of Paris Attacks  via

All about them: Mizzou, Black Lives protesters say Paris attacks took spotlight  via the ALL LIVES MATTER!

Isis claims responsibility for the terrorist attack in Paris. And today is Mickey Mouse's birthday.

Obama: Fiddling with Climate Models while Paris Burns  via #parisattacks #obama

Music Silenced at Legendary Paris Venue: The Bataclan concert hall has long followed a simple rule: Anyone cou

Love letter to Paris by Emma Soames, Saga Magazine editor-at-large.

Reuters: Paris attacker may have had accomplice on journey through Balkans (EXLUSIVE): One of t  #FreeSavchenko

Two Dead In Major Operation Targeting Suspected Paris Attacks Mastermind: Seven arrests made as woman blows he

#Ukraine #Kyiv #News Reuters: Paris attacker may have had accomplice on journey through B  #Kiev #Ukrainian #Ua

Houndmouth tonight. Nashville tomorrow. Rotterdam on Sunday. Paris on Thursday. Awesome week and a half on deck.

I wonder how the Paris atrocities impacted this ban. I'm against burqas but think it's wrong to institute a ban

RIP to the police dog that got blown up today in Paris.

Not sure what to think, after the Paris attacks? Good food for your thoughts, here, from [Please RT]

If paris mastermind has committed suicide due to police raid, let me remind, the suicide is barred in Islam. You cant even think of it.

Great song to start off the day!  Dedicated to belle Paris.U2 - City of Blinding Lights   via

.CIA wants even MORE mass surveillance of your email, phone, etc.Cuz, ya know, #Paris.They've admitted that

French police searching across Europe for a Citroen Xsara car, believed that carrying fugitive wanted in #Paris attacks Salah Abdeslam

#NUFC and France midfielder Moussa Sissoko thanks fans for their support following Paris attacks #CapitalReports

Beauty Brand Under Fire For Using Paris Attacks To Push Nail Polish Line

Paris attacks widower's open letter to ISIS goes viral: Helene Muyal, 35, was killed in attack on the Bataclan

2 dead, 7 arrested in raid targeting Paris attack mastermind:  Traitor Obama will not protect Americans  via

After the Paris attacks, it's time to #StandWithMuslims - The Daily Dot

We can thank for degrading US national security. Paris attacks fuel debate over spying     via

Touching video of father reassuring boy after #Paris attacks goes viral

Schengen and refugee quotas under strain following Paris attacks | Open Europe | via

this is sick. This is just what the evil wanted the evil one is laughing Paris have done exactly what he wanted

Gunfire and explosions as police raid Paris apartment, targeting mastermind of Fri. attack:

When I think of Paris I keep thinking about this song:

Delighted to see Jayne Secker    taking over in Paris She did a great job reporting Charlie Hebdo  sure she will do same again

#News: Street Fighter 5 Interview: Yoshinori Ono on DLC Plans, Beta Woes, and Xbox One Fans: At Paris Games We

reschedules their live gig in light of the Paris attacks. Check out the full story!

Mourners pay tribute to police dog killed during in Paris #RIPDiesel   #JeSuisChien

I really don't think we should judge all of France by the cucks in Paris. It would be like judging all British citizens by Londoners.

Ron Paul Institute's Paul Craig Roberts says the Paris massacres were a false flag.

Fking pity syria people, they dont deserve this  is fk tup when you compare the attention between paris and syria.

Paris attack mastermind may have committed suicide in raid, French envoy says: 07:50 PM (I

EU official: all recognized Paris attackers have been from the EU

Paris Attacks - 120 Dead Tweeted 2 Days Before Event - YouTube

All about them: Mizzou, Black Lives protesters say Paris attacks took spotlight  via the Android app UNREAL!

that commitment he made to the Germans before Paris attack.

#News: 'We have flowers': Video of father explaining Paris attacks to son goes viral: A father's heartwarm  #TU

Barack Hussein Obama did not go to Paris to walk down the street with other leaders listen to Kerry he told it all

How did this Paris mastermind escape that flat they raided!? Mans like Dr Evil in his rocket ship

The Paris attackers weren't refugees and the Syrian passport was fake. Will that make a difference to the scared governors? #ParisAttacks

The New York Times is giving readers the option to follow the Paris attacks via email updates

1. Mark. Selling tickets on the board. Posting about his overseas trip in 10 months after 100+ get killed in Paris. #alltimehoftool

PARIS, PAIN, FRUSTRATION, SORROW AND ANGER - Paris: pain, frustration, sorrow and angerOur deepest sympathy

A first hand account from our Calvary Chapel pastor in #Paris

Climate change zealots meet in Paris to implement plan to reduce global temps by 0.3 degrees F by 2100 - at tremendous cost to world's poor

vicenews: Police in Paris carried out 118 searches last night, detained 25 people, and seized 34 weapons:

Iredell representatives show support for McCrory on refugees: It started with a single fingerprint in Paris, a

my prayers being extended to: Nigeria, Paris, Pakistan, Lebanon, Beirut, Bagdad,  this entire world.

Prime Minister releases statement against acts of racism  hatred directed at specific Canadians in wake of Paris attacks

What happened and continues to happen in Paris . (mind working faster than hands)

I'm sure there was a picture of a Muslim gang celebrating the Paris attack outside that station the other day

Major overnight police operation in France has ended w/ 25 suspected terrorists arrested. We're LIVE in Paris at 7AM

and troye doesn't have any show between the London and the Paris one so he has 3 days off

Favorite Jen Mockingjay pt 2 premiere? (pt 2)Rt for London premiereLike for Paris premiere

#316ICT Police raid on Paris apartment ends; two dead: A seven-hour police operation north of  #Wichita #Kansas

Trump paid some muslim isis workers to attack Paris so his presidential campaign would be stronger.

The Soul of a JihadistThe radical evil behind the terrorist attacks on Paris.

The Paris Terrorist Attacks. Passports Revisited

Paris attack fallout by the numbers: 2 killed, 25 arrested, 34 weapons, 33 extremists killed in airstrikes. via

Alleged ISIS Video Threatens Washington, DC, With Paris-Like Attacks - N  via

BBC News - France's banlieue Saint Denis unmoved by Paris attacks

CNN's Atika Shubert was at the scene of Wednesday morning's police raid on terror suspects in the northern Paris suburb of Saint Deni

Welcome in Paris! Would be nice to meet you.

All 129 people who died in last week's #Paris terror attacks have been positively identified, the #French Council

Moral Courage. And also, actual facts.6 Reasons to Welcome Refugees after Paris | Foundation for Economic Education

New FREE Mobile #TV #News Site. #cnn #fox #nbc  We have put together #French TV, #RT, #France24 #paris #france

#happy #beautiful The world may be looking at the attacks in Paris through the wrong lens. The actions of ISIS

Bullet ridden shield of the Paris police special unit that freed hostages at the Bataclan.  Unbelievable courage.

#Paris attacks: 2 dead, 7 arrested during Saint-Denis raid  via

The process was good enough Friday, and since the refugees weren't the ones attacking Paris there's no reason to change

N.J. will need public's help to fight Paris-style terror attacks, security  -

Legally binding climate commitments needed of G20 countries in Paris COP21:

Brookhaven Councilman Was in Paris During Attacks

#travel #tourism Why My Family Will Still Be Going to Paris for Christmas: Our family h

photoholicjenny:  Heart goes out to Paris,

Internet! Get off your high horse  stop telling me I shouldn't pray for Paris. I can pray for Paris w/o forgetting everyone else. Promise!

An early-morning police operation in the suburbs of Paris turned violent as gunfire and explosions rang out in the area o  #AEsperancaOFinal

Paris attacks placed encrypted messaging tools in crosshairs of intel. officials. reports

New article: Two die in police raid targeting suspected Paris attack mastermind read more at here

Paris Attack Mastermind Pursued By French Police In St-Denis Raid, Gunshots, Explosions Heard

#Crudeoil Mid-session Europe: Forex drifts as Paris in lockdown: Forex markets are drifting ahead of the Feder

Watch:  Manhunt After Paris Attacks: Police operation overnight leads to fatalities.

rt #MiddleEast Profile: Abdelhamid Abaaoud: Belgian jihadist leader sought over Paris atrocity

Great Job to Law Enforcement in Paris! Destroy these THUGS! Prayers for Paris!

Here's one way God is working in the aftermath of the recent Paris attacks. Please talk a moment and give Him

#TeamYamita Refugees Across Europe Fear Repercussions From Paris Attacks: After fleeing th  Unete A #TeamYamita

In honor of those fallen I'm Paris, here are some inspired t-shirts

Richmond The Latest: US: Very likely IS directed the Paris attacks

RT: :How are children in Paris coping after the attacks?  #ParisAttacks

#SyrianRefugees #immigration #TrumpBO=Mentally Unstable evidence n Paris! Remove 2 Hospital ASAP! BAN ISLAM CULT!

McCain Needs Laws Mandating Govt Obtain To Encryption  #armedproducts #paris

A cellist and a flutist are numbered among the Paris dead  via

TODAY ONE #BURKA_CLAD_WOMEN_SUICIDE_BOMBER BLEW UP IN #PARIS WHEN #CORNERED

Syrian ISIS terrorists executed attack in Paris, thwarted in Germany Yesterday.

Nigeria govt shld stop preaching forgiveness to boko haram , let's to emulate russia and paris

Toddler cries about homelessness, then does this  #Paris #France #News

Paris attack: France identifies all the 129 victims -

Because in two years we will have forgotten about this whole Paris kerfuffle.

If mass surveillance actually prevents terrorism, someone explain to me why it didn't prevent what happened in Paris.

What can we say  do to help children process grief  fear after the Paris attacks?

Paris attacker 'stole identity of dead Syrian soldier to enter Europe'  via

Gare du Nord evacuated #ParisAttacks and I   fly back to Paris soon to rejoin top team

Turkish soccer fans boo when asked to observe a moment of silence for Paris terrorism victims.

Never cared of what they say Never cared of what they do Love Paris and Parisienne walkways

Good synthesis about Paris attacks by

Friend of Paris attack suspect saw amp;#39;no sign of hatredamp;#39; infin; 72

Paris raids: Empty streets of Saint Denis. Pt-4 To you let them live in fear not you trust no Muslim

Questions for Operation Gladio,German Intelligence Amidst Paris Carnage  #news was Paris attack strategy of tension?

French police aggressively pursuing terrorists with latest raid outside Paris Wed. 7 arrested, 2 killed.

#stylecon #GQ After Paris Attacks, Whose ISIS Rhetoric Is the Least Responsible?: In the wake   #style #fashion

Some think Paris attacks will draw voters to GOP's 'experienced' candidates. But voters display stunning ignorance of basic issues, prefer

Second assault on Paris was foiled by local police today. Women detonates suicide boom 7 others arrested.

Cybersecurity after the Paris attacks: Info-sharing in the spotlight  via

the stuff that is going on in Paris is complete bs. Diesel was a badass

Father Of Abaaoud, Suspected Mastermind Of Paris Attacks, Denounces Him -

Post Paris: Is Obama Actually Pro-Jihadi?  via PJTV #BestSeenToday

Mood: Paris Hilton escaping the paparazzi

Anonymous Reportedly Shut Down Thousands Of ISIS Twitter Accounts In Response To Paris Attacks: Anonymous rece

The Paris LAN? Wasn't that when the game wasn't even out yet?

What a great way to get the heat of you. #Paris #parisburns #ParisVictims

Well said! FOMO: Why I'm not going to #Paris for #COP21 -  #GrnBz via #sustauinability

Why do people call the Paris terrorists masterminds. They blew themselves up in crowded places, they didn't kill the president with a tissue

Sweden raises its terror alert level after Paris

Jesus and Mo Paris edition.  media  #comics #atheism

I don know. That's why I was asking. I know turkey fans chanted during silence for Paris

That's the way to fix Islamic terrorists! Hope India learns - Woman Blew Herself Up in Paris Siege: 10 Developments

Tim DeChristopher: Don't Back Down in Paris  via #SanityROCKS!

This is Diesel. He lost his life today while helping to eradicate evil in Paris. RIP hero!

If you have been affected by the events in Paris or Tunisia we are here 24/7 to offer support Call 0800 107 0900 je

why does BCCI beg Pak cricket board even after the let type attack on Paris?

Swamy39: RHidadugi : Delayed to 9.30. Rajat is more fascinated by Paris

London; English fans and players tribute to Paris victimsRead More:

Exclusive:Suspects had planned attack on Paris business district - sources :    via

Who would you want/expect dealing with situations like Paris or any other situation of terror.

if last nights game was about more then football do you think the profits should go to the victims of#paris?

That's nuts. I'm sorry you're not going to Paris! Probably a safe choice.

The Wilsons on reconciling, Paris, Steph Curry, Jeremih. Name That Tune. #RelationshipGoals

About 132 people died of firearms in #Paris Friday night.  Gun control dint work #NHPolitics

what are your views about the ps4 being linked with the events in Paris lately??

Turkish fans DID BOO #Paris Victims (Source: Turkish Newspaper)  via #tcot #ccot #ukip #auspol #pjnet

New Episode! Compassion or Caution? The Migrant Crisis After Paris, with Prof. Jackie Bhabha

The Paris attacks have created several mixed reactions from all sorts of people, some using it to their own

French Pres Welcomes Refugees Despite Attack - *Paris now becoming a terrorist strong hold--*dangerous to infidels (YOU) friend**killings on

ETF Surprises After Paris Attacks

#InCaseYouMissedThis: Prophet TB Joshua Claims He Prophesied The Paris Terrorist Attack -  World famous Lagos

[News] Paris assault: Woman blows herself up, man killed

I smell a rat a big fat one!!!!#lies #mensonges #ISIS #Daech #Paris #santdenis

Some of the world's cities that paid tribute to the Paris terror attacks victims.

Terrorists strike Paris, France bombs Syria, more terrorists created, terrorists strike London, UK bombs Afghanistanand so it goes onon

Police Raid Paris Apartment in Search for Terrorist Mastermind: Two Dead, Seven Arrested

He is not being treated unfairly. He is incompetent! Do we need to wait until we are hit in the US, like Paris!

Paris clubs to reopen this weekend following attacks  November 18, 2015 at 10:49PM

Sir! Our Brothers and Sisters at Paris have Suffered a Knock. As a Public Figure Please Solicit Condolences on Behalf of Humanity.

You need to get out of London-London is unsafe. The same thing that happened to Paris is going to happen #getjoesuggoutoflondon

Bless those police heroes in Paris who gave their life for the safety of their fellow citizens.

Rue Saint Denis Painted during a more peaceful time. How my heart breaks for #Paris #peace #art

News24 be telling us about Paris dogs even when we have #NigeriaAttack .Do we have to mourn for Paris dogs as well?

I wonder if the ppl in paris pray for the black victims over here

You mean indestructible passport planted ON pieces of blown up alleged attacker? #parisattacks obvious #Gladio

Did you ever consider that it's extremely unsafe to go outside in Paris now and that terrorism has no religion

Paris Attack: Father Denounces Terrorist Son

This photo might have been taken back in 1955 but it's actually from 2015! #Dsis60 #Paris

#Paris attacks will not affect #Iceland accepting refugees. (I adore #Iceland!)

#WakeUpAmerica Liberals will only wake up to grave threat of ISIS when one of their own is endangered. *Worked for Geraldo Rivera in #Paris

Okay so in french class our teacher started talking about the whole situation in Paris bc some girls asked her questions about it

I thought he did a great job reporting on paris massacre night of 11/13. A lot better than CNN!

Paris after the terrorist attacks, attacks on the deployment across Europe of Muslims and their religious

#ICYMI, a must-read: This is why the #Paris attacks have gotten more news coverage than other terrorist attacks

Trudeau issues statement denouncing racism after Paris attacks   via

Please pray for Nigeria not Paris they don't need it: As seen on Twitter

Chairman Royce, Ranking Member Engel Applaud House Passage of Resolution Condemning Terrorist Attac  #iran #paris

New post: Terrorist Attacks In Paris, France  #attacks #france #in #paris #terrorist

euronews:  Candles are lit in memory of the Paris victims #Molenbeek

Italy deploys soldiers around Rome after Paris attacks  via

Can we stop pretending religion is not the problem? #Paris

ISIS propaganda just released - articles on how they bombed Russian plane and their justification for Paris attacks

Yes. There were. They claimed responsibility. Look. Paris isn't isolated. They attacked Baghdad 3 days before, and on 8/13/15.

Paris attacks: Mother died using her body to shield her five-year-old son from bullets - Paris attacks:

On my way to Paris. Looking forward to working in Travel Retail again. #coaching

really tell that to the loved ones that are dealing with people that died in Paris.

At least two people have been killed and seven arrested after a major police operation in the northern Paris suburb of #SaintDenis

Loyal police dog killed during hunt for Paris attackers is remembered as hero: Two people were kil

#Paris attacks: Two die in hunt for 'mastermind' Abaaoud

LaTonya is looking good in her new Francis Klein Paris frames!  So good, in fact, that she is our Customer of The

Isis is hoping to do back-to-back hits so to demoralize Paris

University students hold anti-racism protests across US  #Constitution #Equality #Liberty #Humanity #Paris

Grateful to be a South African right now, just like we prayed for Paris let's pray for Nigeria as well

didn't you hear about the kano bomb blast by none Muslim terrorist? Why are you not announcing it? Because Nigeria is not PARIS? #bbc

I added a video to a playlist  Paris Attack Survivor's Story Teaches A Powerful Lesson

Notice anything different? We're proudly showing our solidarity and support for #Paris.

#worldnews Paris--Shifting the Heart of the Collective: The terror attacks in Paris are a stab to our collecti

because prayer has worked so well so far. I guess no one was praying hard enough during the Paris slaughter.

#EU foreign policy post #Paris? More of the same argues Instead EU leaders will be extra tough at home

WHEN DOES ACCESS BECOME INVASION?-Paris has exacerbated Feds efforts 2 get Apple, Google, etc. 2 drop encryption of our phones-

Black Lives Matter, Not Paris | Fix This Nation .com  via I have had enough crap from black lives

Two suspects sold Brussels bar not long before Paris attacks.It had been shut for drugs  via

IS-linked Furat media group releases a new French-language video celebrating the Paris attacks, and threatening more violence against France

Raid in Paris this morning on a suspected terrorist cell was met with resistance. 7 taken into custody, 3 dead, 1 police dog killed

Discover the lush beauty of #Paris on our self-guided #biketour  #greentravel

The greater tragedy post-Paris is the assumption that the politics of endless war is the answer..

i am. But north of paris isn't too much

New story on NPR: In Neighborhood Tied To Paris Attackers, Muslims Rally Against ISIS

Eagles of Death Metal speak out after Paris attacks: 'Love overshadows evil'  via Hillary Busis

Stop Praying For Paris en Start Praying For Nigeria Amen.

Paris attacks: Stade de France bomber Bilal Hadfi was 'unambitious loner who

#jesuischien Dog man's best friend : #Hero of #France : #Diesel The dog killed in #Paris raids.

Alber Elbaz has been seen this morning at the Palais de Justice in Paris. Is he, as he threatened, going to sue Lanvin and Shaw-Lan Wang ?

Kerry: 'There Wasa Rationale You Could Attach Yourself to' in Terror Attack on Charlie Hebdo  Another clueless SOS

At least after the Paris attacks neither Obama or Kerry referred to the Religion of Peace. Perhaps they knew they'd be laughed at.

Should Americans fear an attack like those in Paris?via

Must watch! Ken O Keefe Tells You The Real Truth About Paris  ISIS. We need to see the truth!   via

---some countries' refusal of refugees and blame of them for Paris; the glass ceiling, wage gaps and gender inequality;

Paris got me wanting Wendy's

In the days after the Paris massacres, both Iranian and Palestinian media quickly fingered the culprits: the Jews.

Check out the Japan top chart: Eagles of Death Metal on Paris Attacks: 'Love Overshadows Evil'

i love these, and i love paris.

#TRUTHSERUM #HAVESOMEYasiin Bey has a residence in Paris and has deep connections to the city. As a practicing

R #Gaylord native, an English teacher in #Paris, safe after #ParisAttacks.

Raouche Rock illuminated in the colors of French and Lebanese flags in solidarity with victims of Bourj al-Barajneh and Paris attacks

I'm only going to say this once more. Obama is a Muslim sympathizer, hates Americans,  is a domestic threat. #paris

Paris Attacks: William Engdahl Explains the Past, Present and Future of the War in Syria (Corbett Report)

The jews didn't just attack Paris and call for global jihad.

Paris, Syria, Mexico, Africa, these struggles don't need prayer. Human made, humans ought to fix it.

Raid targeted ringleader: The suspected ringleader of the Paris attacks has been on the counterterrorism radar

release Paris statement, cancel live activity:

#ISIS Video: After #Paris, #Washington , D.C. Is Next  via

'..love overshadows evil.' EaglesofDeathMetal make 1st statement since #ParisAttacks  #Bataclan #Paris #UnitedWeStand

#Turkey fans boo during moment of silence for #Paris victims (VIDEO)

How vulnerable is #Europe to Paris-style attacks? #Terrorism

Newswire: Eagles Of Death Metal release their first statement on the Paris attacks  #musicnews

News in the arts  Paris attacks: Band breaks silence

2 dead in Saint-Denis standoff north of Paris, including woman who blew herself up, police say - AFP  by:

What terrorist attack will he be justifying today?

Paris attacks: Band breaks silence: Eagles of Death Metal, the band whose concert was stormed   #breaking #news

You do know leader of Paris terrorists is Belgian. Do you plan on rounding up Belgians at gun point?

Police dog hailed a hero after it dies during anti-terror raid in Paris  #JeSuisChien

interesting question! Surely sugar-costing the Paris attacks for kids can't help their understanding.

2 suspects killed in raid targeting suspected mastermind of Paris attacks

Lincoln Report (WGN terrorism analyst on Paris terror raids)

Lol I'm sorry for what happened in Paris? What a stupid thing to say

Music News: Eagles of Death Metal on Paris Attacks: 'Love Overshadows Evil': Eagles of Death Metal have issued

Eagles of Death Metal on Paris Attacks: 'Love Overshadows Evil': Eagles of Death Metal have issu  #onlyonemusic

Channel 2 reports the latest on the Paris attacks

(Photos) Police Drag Out Half Na Ked Suspect During Hunt For Paris Attack Mastermind

Suspects had planned attack on Paris business district - sources  via

Not to mention-1 of those killed in Paris police action was a woman who detonated a suicide vest.nothing to worry about there eh?

So does the female jihadist who blew herself up today in #Paris get 72 virgins?

Paris talks could leave forests vulnerable

BelAhdan, Paris Attacks and the Real Tragedy

latest Florida poll shows Jeb in 5th place.  post last debate, post Paris attacks.  so tell me the argument that he has turned this around.

After #Paris, I'm telling our #politicians no to collective #punishment  yes to #refugees. #LiftMyLamp  #LIBERTY

woman who blew herself up during #Saint-Denis raid in #Paris was the cousin of the suspected #Parisattacks ringleader Abdelhamid Abaaoud.

Paris video captures explosion of 'female suicide bomber blowing herself up': The moment is believed to have been captured on camera

but want to emphasise that Corbyn's response to Paris is nothing short of shameful

Loreena McKennitt Breaking the Silence. For the victems in paris

Abdellah Taia, Morroco-born Muslim, writes from Paris for the NYT

yeah I know they pulled it due to Paris and other complaints about the violence

Photo taken in Paris last night, praying for Paris #PrayingForParis #EiffelTower #TourEiffel #ParisAttacks

I have a Syrian refugee in my English class and he's the nicest one here and has been here long before the Paris situation

Let us now commiserate with Nigeria since we did it with Paris. #PRAYFORNIGERIA

#AntiGlobalization British Media has Sunk to an All-time Low: Despicable Response to Paris Terrori  #Revolution

Was waiting for this beautifull message in #Paris. Thank you so much #peace #resistinpeace #restinpeace

Reactions from school children in Paris over the terrorist attacks. reports for Newsround.

Loving Conversation Between Father, Son In Midst Of Vicious Paris Attacks  #sanfrancisco

we are praying for God's blessings be upon France in Paris that God will move in the supernatural for this nation

We lost so many tremendous souls this week. Rest in Peace Bruce Dayton, Pat Fallon and Paris. J't'aime.

Students at Texas State share solidarity for Paris #TexasState

My dad lives in Paris so of course I'm praying, but even if he didn't live in Paris why wouldn't you pray for them?

Moslem strongholds in 'burb North of #Paris now being raided.

Now playing Paris Sisters - Too Good To Be True on Tunedex Memories

I got away from Paris by getting away from Rome. My day in Sermoneta, Italy:

Army Sergeant Delivers Fiery Message About Spiritual Forces Behind the Paris Terror Attac.. ~via The Blaze #TCOT

#ROH3 #JFB #TFB #alrasyid448ItuRasya Photos: Memorials Grow After Paris Attacks  ROH3 SmantiBatam #ROH3SmantiBatam

Egypt claims it's safe after Russian jet crash, but won't call it terror - 2 Paris-bound flights cleared after

hardly a 'mastermind' to come up with shooting into crowded room  blowing someone up around the same time. need new term #Paris #Abaaoud

(2/2) Paris attacks. I honestly want to stick my DICK in a motherfucking grinder right now. FUCK WHY WOULD YOU DO THAT

#Paris wanted to sell #Moscow Mistrals. The West should not ally with the devil #Putin and his #Terrorists!

Eagles of Death Metal have released a statement about their Paris show, with comments from fans who were there.

Find your musical comfort in times of difficulty with Dirait On - inspired by Paris.  #ParisAttacks #courage #bravery

Dear Governors: French President Francois Hollande Welcomes Refugees Despite Paris Attack - Democratic Underground

President Hollande, Orland, Alland, Horland, Horlorn, Ollond? We don't struggle when we say Paris #pronunciation

John Eric DeTitta's latest update. Eagles of Death Metal breaks silence on Paris attacks

BREAKING: Suspected Paris attacks architect Abdelhamid Abaaoud was killed in Saint-Denis raid (via

Zuckerberg: Facebook will use safety check for 'more human disasters'. Too little too late?  #facebook #paris

SOON: Paris prosecutor news conf. so stay with #CNN LIVE for that and the very latest on the #ParisAttacks anchors our cov.

Innocent British Muslim kids are being held responsible for events in Paris,and bullied by morons stirred up by media bastards.

South Florida Realtor aims to donate to Paris victims

BCLEMS NEWS: Paris Attacks: Man With No Pants Hauled Away By Police After Shootout With Terror Suspects

France 24 would like to interview you tonight at 10pm London time to comment on Paris attacks

Many head of states took part in a unity rally in Paris How many leaders visited Peshawar? #DoubleStandardsOfWest

I wanted to do the same thing. But! Last weekend, I didn't play because of the Paris attack. Then, I had to finish

French President #FrancoisHollande Welcomes Refugees Despite Paris Attack!   Same For #France

From Paris to Boston, Terrorists Were Already Known to Authorities  via #Belgium

I know you want to know, if in fact the overnight raid in Paris - Saint Denis was in fact, because they knew  the mastermind was there?

Political author Gearoid O Colmain discusses the Paris attacks with //t.co/2q7YaLqwXP via

R How cartoonists responded to the Paris attacks

Good articleKhan: No More Bloodshed (The Paris Attacks)

Barak Obama and John Kerry. The new dumb and dumber with their comments about Paris attacks.  Maybe climate change affecting their brains.

Paris attacks, Hollande visit may spur Kremlin push to end isolation:  vi

Road to the White House: Paris Changes Everything; Paris Changes Nothing | RealClearDefense

BREAKING: the master brain behind Paris attacks is DEAD.Terrorist Abdelhamid Abaaoud was killed in Paris.

Man 'shot through window by stray bullet' in Paris attacks found dead in flat via /r/worldnews

How is diversity our strength? People like to say that but I never see any indication that it is true. Paris has diversity.

#News VIDEO: Paris attacks: News conference  via

Can we stop comparing Beirut and Paris? It's like comparing Hummus and Foie Gras, one is the fatty gluttonous

Prosecutor says raids on #SaintDenis eliminated a cell preparing to carry out new attacks #Paris

Update from GMP following recent terror attacks in Paris

Check out EIFEL EIFFEL TOWER Bronze Plated Charm Kidney Earrings Steampunk Nouveau Paris #Charm  via

From Elisabeth Hasselbeck DETONATES Weaselly Josh Earnest Over Paris Attacks

A phone thrown into a garbage can outside the Bataclan had a text message on it saying the attack was about to begin, says Paris prosecutor

Paris may your hearts be at peace.do not let the light go dark.our hearts are with y'all

Always grateful to the Champs Elysees film festival #Paris for hosting the International Premier of Secrets of the Magic City.

maybe Two Hearts beat as one which of Course was Filmed in Monmartre in Paris 1983 also maybe Ordinary Love at E-Stage

#TheVampsSample WILL YOU BE BACK TO OTHER CITIES EVEN PARIS?

Beautiful essay by about being her experience being an expat in a mourning #Paris   #ParisAttacks

wht abt 60k civilians army personal had died in PK WAR,no one boders,only some hundreds were died in paris,all world is crying

Breaking: US rock band at center of Paris attacks releases first statement  (via

NO sympathy. NO regret for the loss of this life.Mastermind behind Paris attacks is dead via

The Paris attacks changed the most crucial relationship in the Russian economy

SADNESS reigns in PARIS - the RED, WHITE,  BLUE of the EIFFEL TOWER still DEFIANT.  OUR PRAYERS ARE WITH THE FRENCH!

None of the Paris attackers were Syrian  as I 1st suggested, passport was planted2sabotage Refugees.

''Our Children Can Become Rulers of France by Legal Means'' - Sermon on day of Paris Terror

Hoping news abt Abaaoud brings some closure for #Paris victims. His story shows #IS =/= Islam; IS = bad ppl who thrive on power  hatred.

Breaking: Wife of Paris attack mastermind killed herself

As first reported on phone recovered at #Bataclan shooting scene contained text saying attack was beginning, prosecutor. #ParisAttacks

you rock and Paris will stay your home and France too.

'We're just as shocked' - Muslim messages going viral after the #Paris attacks via

AP: Paris prosecutor: Identities of 2 dead in Saint-Denis raid still being investigated. WATCH LIVE:

Police fired 5,000 rounds during raids in #SaintDenis . Paris prosecutor said. #ParisAttacks

no one is saying that. In Paris, Beirut  Baghdad attacks in 24 hours, most people that died were muslim. It means nothing.

Paris attacks mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud has been shot dead by cops via /r/worldnews

Extraordinary: BBC News - Paris attacks: 'I will not give you the gift of hating you'

Louis Dreyfus owner sees opportunity to look at stake increase: PARIS, Nov 18 (Reuters) - Family  (By

Sorry?  I'm simply saying the Great Mosque in Paris has made a statement.Woss that got to do with T Sq?

Prosecutor says #Abaaoud not among those arrested: but cannot confirm if he was shot #StDenis #Paris

USATODAY - Paris prosecutor Francois Molins said at a news conference Wednesday that a seven-hour siege by police

Mosques in the US and Canada report an increase in vandalism and threats since the Paris terror attacks, say campaigners.

I limiti dell'occidente, e quelli di Isis. Da leggere. The Attacks in Paris Reveal the Strategic Limits of ISIS

Paris attack is a false flag. Capt. Ajit VadakayilNovember 18, 2015 at 1:44 PM WARNING TO INDIAN MUSLIMS

The American Library in Paris is hosting an event this Friday. Click through for details.

all a terrorist has is words? Try telling paris that

Companies review travel policies after Paris attacks

IT LITERALLY TOOK ME 8 YEARS TO REALIZE THAT LONDON TIPTON WAS A PUN FOR PARIS HILTON IT ALL MAKES SENSE NOW OH MY GOD

The Follies Of Distributism: VIDEO: Gun Battle In Paris Cops  MUSLIMS

It's mildly concerning how Paris authorities are catching all these suspected attackers so quickly

Yeah bro im fine thanks for asking crazy times in Paris !!

More from AP: Paris prosecutor: authorities trying to determine identities of those arrested, killed in raid.

(AP) - Paris prosecutor: suspected attacks mastermind, accomplice not among those arrested in raid.

While the world watches Paris raid, there were 30 people killed in a bomb blast in Nigeria #AllLivesMatter

After Paris attacks: Opportunity for Assad?  via [CNN Int.]

Update: Paris prosecutor says #ParisAttacks plotter #Abaaoud not among arrested in today's raid, police still identifying dead

thank you for your suport for paris and france #AskSamClaflin

More disguised #hatespeech Nothing is 100% there is risk. Can U guarantee 100%-If no refugees=100%noTerrorism #Paris

What a bunch of Ghouls the News shows,  now showing the Paris Cowards videos. You Idiots ! You are peddling Terrorism !!!!

Paris St. Germain reportedly monitoring Tottenham's youngster Dele Alli for next summer transfer window. #PSG #THFC

MisGrace:  West Leverages #Paris Attacks for #Syria Endgame [Balkanization]#NATO, #GCC,  #ISIS   Co.

Paris attacks: To win war we must n  via #AustralianNews #TheAge #News

..PARIS..?  Strangest Things Recent Events    WHO GIVE MONEY  FOR  SUPER  SIMPLE SUICIDE BOMBERS.??

Prosecutor: 'Mastermind' of Paris attacks not in custody from raid: France President Francois Hollande told a

Terribly sad. This could have been anyone of us in Paris that day.

My home town is not big at all, but I like that they, too, are showing their solidarity for Paris. #PrayForParis

is live with the latest on the #Paris attacks. Tune in to right now.

Cities have endless resources.  Paris is not starving.

'Clash Of Clans' News, Update: Supercell To Offer 2-Week Sneak Peek Ahead Of Roll Out Date  #Paris #France #News

Watching CNN,BBC and Sky News for 2hrs straight now. Nothing about #NigeriaAttack.They still on about Paris. But Nigeria gets nothing

So sad about what happened in Paris. Why does Hobbes have to be always right? Homo homini lupus est #Paris #Bataclan

Terror Cell Was Ready to Act Again, Paris Prosecutor Says: Paris prosecutor Francois Molins details findings f

Paris is in Need Can you make the World a Better Place?:  via

GhostSec claims ISIS terrorists linked to Paris attacks has Bitcoin Wallet Worth $3 Million via  #bitcoin

keep up the great workfrom our #nurses to your nurses;) #ParisAttacks #Paris

So, a white, blonde, caucasian, Islam convert, female suicide bomber in Paris blew herself up today. #DamnThemRefugees

Jim Sensenbrenner blasts Congress for 'fearmongering' following Paris attacks - Washington Times

Turkey fans boo moment of silence for Paris attacks, then chant 'Allahu Akbar'  via

#AceNewsReport - Abdelhamid Abaaoud, Mastermind Of Paris Attacks, Reportedly Killed By French Police During Si

Paris Orly Airport Temporarily Shuts Down Due to Windows 3.1 Failure (November 13 and 16, 2015)

my heart goes out to all the victims of terroist attacks #paris

would you make that joke if your kid was killed in Paris last weekend? Wack

#Breaking The suspected plotter of the Paris attacks has been killed during police raids

Dalai Lama: stop praying for Paris.Humans created the problem and humans must solve it. So right!

Phew! spent the whole day planning Winchester People's Procession for Paris 29 Nov 10am at Abbey Gardens so do come

It was done in #Paris.. Repeated in #India. May Allan shower love among us.Ameen

New York Stock Exchange, 9/11 Memorial Hold Moments Of Silence To Honor Paris Attack -

Fox Insider: Turkish Soccer Fans Boo During Moment of Silence for Paris Victims at Greece Turkey Soccer Game:

#Politics: Tom Ridge on Paris response: 'You Have to Start Playing Offense': Former Secretar  via

Back in Barcelona after a weird week in Paris. Despite what happened, there's no denying that it's an absolutely spectacular city.

Tradition-rich Paris trying to reach old heights.

I think it was cancelled due to the recent Paris problems, as it had a bomb explosion in it.

CIA chief lashes out at Edward Snowden after Paris attacks: CIA Director John Brennan on Wednesday blaste  #LVN

Latest On Anti-Terror Operation, Paris Prosecutor says police fired 5,000 rounds but they didn't get there man

The outrage over the outrage It's not about Sirya, Paris, Lebanon, Palestine, Iraq, Yemen, etc, but about humans

were not Paris it's okay Alex it's never too far

poor Diesel was killed in action in Paris yesterday. RIP Diesel,your work is done

yet US media is all ISIS and Paris 24/7.

France is still taking in 30,000 Syrian refugees even after the devastating attacks in Paris. So why are we being such pussies about it?

CERN WATCH: COP21, Paris, Tesla and Energy Control  via

#FutureWorldNews A Look at Key Developments in the Paris Attacks  Follow KevinFitts

#c4news team is staying in #Paris to avoid embarrassing questions about why they are not housing ANY so called refugees in their own homes

floyd don't be scared son raise money for charity and for the families who lost in paris !#LETSGOCHAMP

Death of French riot police dog,7 yr old Diesel,in #Paris raid has led to affectionate tributes online #JeSuisChien

Two dead in #ParisRaid as police hunt attacks mastermind |

You, your family and all the people in Paris, will be in my prayers

what do u mean the mastermind in paris?

And also, did you not see what happened in Paris? I used to think like you, but it's better to be safe than sorry.

Football News : Premier League clubs on 'extra high alert' in wake of Paris terror attacks: Richard Scudamore,

Died in the line of duty #RIPDiesel when carrying out raids following the #FranceAttacks - #terrorism attack.Thank u

VLC contributor includes a message on the Paris attacks in a patch note (via

#Greek Skai TV, citing US intel services, reporting that mastermind of Paris attacks Abdelhamid Abaaoud spent January in Athens

BBC: Paris attacks 'mastermind' fate unknown: The fate of the suspected organiser of Friday's Paris attacks re

people only considered the Paris attack terrorism, but attacking innocent lives in Syria wasn't terrorism?? what is wrong with this world

Paris-bound Air France flight that departed LAX lands safely following threat:  #lax #airfrance #paris

Paris: Friday, November 13. Tell us that you are well: you and your family and friends -

It's official public mobilizations for #cop21 cancelled in #Paris.

I AM SO MAD AT SOME AMERICANS RESPONSE TO THE PARIS ATTACKS IT IS NOT MUSLIMS FAULT STOP TERRORIZING THEM

Bodies being ID'd after raids in Paris suburb; 8 arrested: French prosecutor says 5,000 rounds were fired in Parisian suburb during p

no, I'm going to London for their tour. I also wouldn't really feel save in the AB after what happened in Paris

ICYMI 5 of the attackers in Paris were french, none of them were illegal immigrants or refugees

All about them: Mizzou, Black Lives protesters say Paris attacks t #ParisTerrorism #Paris Tragedy #ISIS #Terrorism

2 Air #France flights from U.S. to #Paris diverted because of #bomb threats -

After Paris attacks, U.S. Republicans defy Obama on Syrian refugees

Paris Attacks Put Congress    On A Collision Course    With Silicon Valley -

ALERT: What Was Just Found Inside The Hotel Room Of Paris Attackers Could Change Everything

French government bans 2 planned Paris climate summit rallies -  #breaking-news

Dem: Paris a 'chilling reminder' we need tighter gun laws Always guns, Dems. BLAME THE FUCKING ISLAMIC TERRORISTS!

Just watching an episode of Vikings in which the brave defenders of Paris foil a Viking attack.

After the #Paris terror attacks: A drumbeat for military escalation and internal #repression

to Paris  with love from England we stand with you x

Anonymous Declare War On ISIS Through Cyber Attacks  via #ANONYMOUS #ISIS #PARIS

1 #Paris attacker drank alcohol  smoked cannabis; not very Muslim/devout. I recall 9/11 bombers being similar. Hmm:

Does NATO Require America to Go to War over the Paris Attacks?: In the immediate aftermath of last week'  #Nato

Republicans: Don't you dare politicize a school shooting tragedy. Republicans: Paris attacks are President Obama's fault. Elect me 2016.

Seems over half NBC/MSNBC talking heads have copped an expense paid trip to Paris over this terrorist attack, taking one for the team

In yesterday's police raids near Paris, a FEMALE suicide bomber blew herself up!

Day of Paris Attacks: Our Children Can Become Rulers of France through Legal Means

guys, i'll be on the bbc tonight talking about the migrant crisis and paris attacks. tune in if you can!

A big merci to our charming hostesses in Paris! #EWEA2015 #Siemens

So I can't be concerned about Paris  #BlackLivesMatter?

Fantastic article for by Dr Von Lunen on use of during the #Paris attacks

NY Times: First Draft: Jeb Bush Cites Paris Attacks in Calling for Stronger Military

CaMOron using Paris to Push for Syria War Vote

Two die in hunt for mastermind of Paris Attacks #PrayforParis #terrorist #news

Terror cell raided north of Paris was ready to strike: French prosecutor

Prayers for Paris: 7 Ways You Can Help After The Paris Attacks -

are you still in Paris. I feel so sorry for the Parisians

Analysts expect short-term market drop from #Paris terror  via @

Paris attacks: Halima Saadi, one of the Muslim victims of terrorist bullets

A religion of Peace? Only 30 #Paris #Muslims in City of 224,000 Muslims Turn Out to Protest Bloody #ISIS Attacks

Paris attacks: Police warn budget cuts could prevent effective response to similar atrocities in Britain

French Intelligence Guessed Wrong on #ISIS Attack, Predicting Wrong Date  #ParisAttacks

Premier League clubs on 'extra high alert' in wake of Paris terror attacks: Richard Scudamore, executive   #bpl

? of the day..If Paris is an extreme terrorist hot spot,why hold a climate summit there with most key world leaders in one spot at one time?

Paris police officers say they fired at least 5,000 rounds during an hour long shootout, at a hideout where a

BBC News - Paris attacks: Mixed reaction to Charlie Hebdo image

loll trying to get people to link up the clues all by themselves, but yes Paris Attacks look extremely suspicious

Climate summit has duty to Paris: Hunt  via

France bans massive marches planned during Paris climate talks  #COP21 Love to all who have been organizing!

R.I.P. Diesel .. Killed by Female Suicide Bomber in Paris On Wednesday

Nice to see that the fund for Paris terrorism victim Hodda passed $20k  please contribute!

Sounds like she's talking about Paris Hilton. Kylie's family are not billionaires.

Paris SG to wear special jerseys for the next three Ligue 1 games to honour victims of attacks

Photo: The damaged building in St. Denis, Paris, after the early morning police raid - liliagaida

Abdelhamid Abaaoud: The brains behind the slaughter #abaaoud #parisattacks #paris

72% of Americans disagree with Obama. That crosses both parties  independents. After what happened in Paris.

i miss my dad so much I hope he's okay in Paris rn

Paris attacks just a sample of ISIS in Middle East: A human-rights organization that tracks Christian persecut

As investigations into Paris attacks continue, the U.S. releases a new counterterrorism strategy

Hey Hannity the news says to organizer of the Paris bombing not dead . Better check your news sources.

Eagles of Death Metal break silence on Paris attacks

Democrats are hitting Sen. Marco Rubio for skipping closed-door briefings on the Paris attacks Wednesday as his

Diesel, v. clever, much decorated 7 year old Police dog, who died while bomb-sniffing in Paris today. Am sad for

The New York Times is giving readers the option of following the Paris attacks story via email updates:

glad to see Brian at the helm. I have switched from CNN for Paris coverage.

Ratchet  Clank looking as cinematic as ever at Paris Games Week. Coming to PS4 next year.

KASHMIR Muslims are not terrorists: Abdullah: Against the backdrop of Paris attacks, former Jammu and Kashmir

Minister Carr Concludes Visit to 2015 IEA Ministerial Meeting in Paris #Canada

I have a genuine question. The Paris attackers were French, the 7/7 bombers were English. How does border closing help?

this is not helpful at all. Sitch in #Paris getting tenser by the moment

The political and sociological implications of the mess of the Paris' attacks aftermath  #ParisAttacks

#PrayForParis We will remember all those who we have lost in the attack on Paris.

thanks you ari. i love you so much . i live in paris .im scarry

even the French at the Paris theatre had to request permission to attack and kill! Clearly stated by officer in charge.

ya its cause of all the shit thats happening in Paris. They also wanna give other teams a chance ;)

Suspected architect of Paris attacks dead: - says who?  via Reuters

OMG I love you. My heart with Paris. My parents  in Paris now

A police siege in Paris shows the strengths and limits of French security work  via #Parisattacks

While blaming Obama for an attack in Paris, the #GOP is blocking bills to prevent terrorists from buying guns here.

Paris Review - The Art of Fiction No. 217, Roberto Calasso

Mastermind Behind Paris Terror Attack Is Dead

Charlie Hebdo on Paris attacks: 'They have weapons. F--- them. We have champagne!' -   via smh

Requests Armed Security At Shows In Wake of Paris Attacks  via

Obama take a page from the president of Paris France

Duran Duran supports Eagles of Death Metal fan campaign after Bataclan concert hall attack in Paris

From NewsOK: French foreign minister bans 2 planned marches during Paris climate talks for security reasons

Elsa Delplace was killed shielding son from ISIS gunman during Paris Bataclan attack: Els   via

Devastating, but look. Inevitably they all look like people you wish you'd met. The Victims of Paris  #tragic #RIP

Going For Two: How the Paris attacks reveals sports are bigger than ourselves #sports

good stuff; writing how Paris attack was part of ISIS leading global jihadism as part of its strategy. Glad some1 else noticed

thanks .Am simply saying there are many  ways of destroying what I hold dear. Paris brought it home

New post is up! I'm writing from my heart about how we should respond to tragedy #Paris

Did leaked documents expose Paris's vulnerabilities? Not sure what his beef is.

Many things I love about France/Paris, the music is just one. Great/timely round up of a golden era by

Professional commandos carried out Paris attacks, American researcher and historian Dr. Randy Short says:

2 #AirFrancePlanes bound for Paris from U.S. make emergency landings

A Window Into Life in Syria: Why the U.S. Must Resettle Syrian Refugees After Paris

I'm sorry but this dog in Paris is getting way to much Attention there are much worse things going on around us.

Newport joins together to send prayers to Paris

At least 1 in Paris likely posed as a refugee, if latest reports true. Many caught in US before acting.

You haven't fought for us ever#IRS #VA #DOJ #Ferguson #ISIS #Paris #Refugees #Keystone #FnF #Gruber #bergdahl #EPA

this will not stop in #Paris  Beirut #2 started last Friday! #ParisAttacks #France

The Paris attacks were motivated by an attempt to make Westerners hate refugees. Mission accomplished? :/  #cdnpoli

FreeRepublic: France bans massive marches planned during Paris climate talks  #tcot

VIDEO: Residents reflect on Saint-Denis raid: There were dramatic scenes in the Paris suburb of Saint-  #TSCEnt

#CNN #fox can we stop calling the cowardly bomber from #Paris a #mastermind and call him #cowardlypieceofshit

False narratives emerge from Paris attacks: (CNN)Along with the universal outpouring of sympathy and co  #Paris

honestly today I have been only watching Rainews Cnn  France24 following news from Paris  recoveringI didn't see Tg1

EXTENDED: Paris prosecutor says nearly 5,000 rounds fired in morning raid:

Paris Siege Flat Owner: 'I Don't Know Anything'. Of course you don't!!

Bush uses Paris attacks to pitch US military buildup in South Carolina speech, calls for restarti  #johnhospers

Viral Video of French Father Explaining Terror Attacks Will Break Your Heart  #ParisAttacks

Love your music. Love Paris. Love the people. Thanks for you to come back. Please. Just to fuck them all.  #eodm

Football News : PSG plan special shirt gesture for Paris victims

Eagles of Death Metal Release Statement on Paris Attack

It means its okay to clear out your life savings with a one way trip to Paris and worry about the rest when you get there. Its okay man.

Hi Paris, as you purchased through a third party, you hold a contract with them. You paid your money to them, so they would 1/2

2 die in raid! - Suspected Mastermind of Paris Attacks Not Among Those Detained - WSJ  |

Going LIVE tomorrow (2pm CST)! Join us as we discuss #refugees in Europe,  the impact of the #Paris attacks.

Paris attacks 'mastermind' Abdelhamid Abaaoud never attended mosque,his  family says

Paris needs a hero? a PR hero and it is a dog? after 129 killed and not one of them is a hero? Really? How sad!

#Entertainment Eagles of Death Metal break silence, issue first statement since Paris terror attacks: Eagles O

A dog which died in Paris ISIS has got more recognition than some of the other places that got attacked

RT No one really expects COP21 in Paris to resolve the whole climate-change issue

Turkish fans who booed during the minute silence for Paris yesterday all need killing simple

things like everyone else's reactions to Syria/Paris/Ferguson are why I try to not get too caught up in just that bubble, though.

Retweeted Washington Post The suspected architect of the Paris attacks is dead, according to

John Kerry: Hebdo Attacks Make Way More Sense Than Paris ;absolutely correct; there was a twisted logic but now we are all targets

i hope you will come back to paris one day

He made these comments when explaining why he plans to halt refugee resettlement to Roanoke, VA, in the wake of the Paris attacks.

BBC News - #Paris attacks 'mastermind' #Abaaoud fate unknown -  #French Prosecuter #Molins #ISIS

#Goal PSG plan special shirt gesture for Paris victims: The team from the French capital will  (via

Paris attacks: Witness at bar massacre says gunmen were 'white,  came in black Mercedes -- Puppet Masters --

When was the last time a French citizen killed someone in the name of Paris?

v With a new outlook, what role will Canada play at Paris climate summit?   #COP21 #cdnpoli

2 dead, 5 arrested in raid vs Paris attack mastermind     via ThePhilStar

Lmao why the fuck would you think 3 and under year olds are able to bomb Paris?

Exactly. So why make so much noise about Paris!

Passport in Paris attacks fuels fears of  #uncategorized #Trending #News #Startups #HowTo #DIY #Android #HowTo #Apps

#SaintDenis Witness Gives First Hand Account of #ParisSiege : PARIS ATTACKS

The brave mother who sacrificed herself to save her son in Paris  viaThe sort of scene after WW2 bombing

Penn State York trip to Paris postponed: A Penn State York trip to Paris, which was slated to leave Friday, ha

From #Kobane to #Paris: PYD leader laid flowers on behalf of #YPG  #YPJ. #TwitterKurds #ParisAttacks

Abe to attend U.N. climate summit Nov. 30 in Paris - The Japan Times  #10tweets

you are scared of the Labour Party? If you want a horrorshow go to Paris last Friday. #stupidity

Once more: I wrote about Paris, our desire to escape, and why that's no longer possible.

The New York Times is using #Paris email updates tobexplore a new method of #interaction with readers  via NiemanLab

SWISSINFO: At least two die in police raid on group planning new Paris attack - SWIswissinfo.ch,

We would like to send our thoughts and condolences to those who have been affected by the heartbreaking tragedy in Paris this weekend.. #pfp

[GH] Paris terror raid: We were counting down explosions - CNN International

The Paris attacks prove Charlie Hebdo's critics wrong  via

Paris Attacks Special Report: Siege In Saint Denis

Interesting article. Liked the link to an article asking whether should eradicate religion because of Paris . .

Fierce firefight in Paris suburbs thwarted new terror attack #WorldNews

The 2014 L'Oreal Paris Women of Worth Nominees. Vote now for the 2015 L'Oreal Paris Women of Worth and help

CLEARER IS IMPOSSIBLE-I WANT HIM AT LEAST AS MINISTER OF CULTURE IN ITALY! Paris shooters lectured !! Reloaded !

#Paris attacks suspicions of #refugees-I SAID IT IN JULY  to the FBI- Did nothing- Even tweets 2 world leaders

Two Suspects in November 13 Paris Attacks Not Among Those Arrested in Police Raid, But Could Be Among Dead:

Syrian civil war: Photographs of daily life in Douma: While the attacks in Paris galvanized internationa  (cbc)

The Tragedies of Strangers, from 9/11 to Paris  via The New Yorker

I was sad to not see a word from you for Paris since Friday!I waited for all this weekend!  Thank you! La France t'aime !

NYC. Police Commissioner Bill Bratton made a direct link between the attacks on Paris  cell-phone encryption #digitalchat

so there's this. j.xo Identified Paris Attackers Were Not Refugees Progressive Change Through Positive Action

Is night in paris so good night babe I love u more than all je t'aime

#IntelIoT  are heading to #Paris for an #IoT seminar. Join us, Nov. 20!  #Paris

Since Jan. 1, there have been 21 terror attacks around the world in which 50 or more people have been killed.

French investigators believe that a Moroccan-origin Belgian jihadist masterminded the Paris attacks which killed at least 129 people.

Did I say anything about Paris, Regardless of current, nothing wrong w/ review, unless of course that slows govt $$$ to you, eh?

New on politics from #HuffPo: Mayor Wonders If We Need WWII-Style Internment Camps After Paris Attacks

and you say we need gun control. Look what happened in Paris. We have 3 millions concealed in USA.where are all the crazies?

US Government Uses Paris Tragedy to Renew War on Encryption -: In the wake of the tragedy last week in Paris,

Majority Do Not Want U.S. to Accept Syrian Refugees In Wake of Paris Attacks: As President Obama  via FreeBacon

so 129 people die in Paris and the world goes nuts?! And 2000 die in Nigeria and no one notices? What the f is wrong with the world

Panel dean, frm  ministers Pangestu  US Sandalow what companies can do post Paris. In short: A lot!

PSG plans special shirt gesture for Paris victims: The team from the French ca

AFTER THE ATTACKS IN PARIS,USING THE POWER OF MEDIA,SOCIAL NETWORKS WE CONTRIBUTION TO COP21 IN PARIS,

Take a trip from Paris down to Houston for yo apple pie

Exclusive: #ISIS Suspects had planned attack on #Paris business district -  #IS #refugees #migrants #tcot #ccot #tlot

Video: Suspected Paris attacks mastermind not yet identified

LIVE Coverage : Mastermind Of #Paris Attacks Dead #ISIS

Geraldo Rivera from Paris:  Seized all kinds of weaponry from terrorist group.. Jewish teacher stabbed in Marseilles.. Much tension..

Shaykh Rehan Ahmad Raza al-Azhari on Scottish TV (STV) talk show regarding terrorist attack in ParisSee full

I will be watching to see how many of those people pushing for calm after Paris attacks go hysterical after the next domestic mass shooting.

as for Paris, don't expect to have much support from people like you did at first because you're just as bad. #PrayForSyria

'Died to defend us' Hero police dog Diesel killed by a woman suicide bomber loved by in Paris siege

I heard that too, glad Kilmeade called him on it. Happy for his daughter being safe, should leave Paris

In light of the Paris attacks, how should we express grief on social media?  Thx for this interview

At the International Chamber of Commerce in Paris,1937, after a year of scheduled flights across the Pacific,

Incredible footage from Paris acquired by Mail Online.

via Incredible moment woman survives as Paris gunman tries to shoot

Patricia Meredith-Wrapped in the FlagIn our heartbreak over Paris let's not forget there are victims on both sides.

since you'll be in Paris Dec 11 to 13 will you go to the global warming convention on the 12th?

Once again: none of the Paris attackers were Syrian refugees.

Why do you think one of the Paris attackers took his passport with him? So he could cross the border? No, to connect the attack to refugees.

Suspected architect of Paris attacks is dead, according to two senior European officials  I'll sleep better tonite.

sad that our president says Paris was a set back Obama has no leadership has to be the worst president in United States history.

French Atheist-Turned-Theologian:What He Believes Consistent Atheists Must Affirm Abt Islamic Terrorists in Paris

I liked a video from  #Paris, The Ritualistic False Flag Exposed

Amazing they don't protest about Paris massacre ! Tell us a lot about what sort of people they are !

Following the Paris terror attacks, the world gives heartfelt thanks for the human and animal heroes working to

assess support for radical Islam. I'd start with fact that out of 224,000 Muslims in Paris only 30

GSD Diesel gave his life during the raid in Paris. Please salute this good boy.

Alleged Paris attacks ringleader killed in raid, officials say

Ex-CIA Officer: Paris Attacks Boosting Support for National Security in US

DoD restricted from traveling to France: In response to the terror in Paris, the U.S. European Command has pla

#Paris #France In Paris with my daughter #quahina # Printemps #blackandwhite by mamallapur

killings like in Paris happen a lot in the middle-east but the media only focuses only when the west is attacked

OpChemBot: Soccer Fans in Azerbaijan Join Turkey in Booing Moment of Silence for Paris  #News #InfoWars

Connecticut mosque shot up hours after Paris attacks - 7News Boston WHDH-TV

Paris: Impressive video. Inside the bar during attacks terrorist. #parisattacks

Also the attack on Paris they just did. I'm sorry, but they are being terrible people. There is no way I can ever forgive them

The world pays tribute to hero police dog killed in Paris raids:

Terry Smith of shares response to attacks in Paris, Beirut, elsewhere

Turkish soccer fans boo during minute of silence dedicated to Paris  via

DTN Libya News: Calais refugees grieve for Paris, dread backlash: Hundreds of camp residents hold vigil to mou

Paris attacks leave parents, schools with tough questions - WBRC FOX6 News - Birmingham,

I'm in awe of this man. BBC News - Paris attacks: 'I will not give you the gift of hating you'

Paris attacks: 'I will not give you the gift of hating you', a love stronger than death #prayforparis #freedom

Soo all of the known terrorists in the Paris attack were either French or Belgian. Are we going to ban French people?

Female Suicide Bomber Blows Herself To Pieces In Paris Just HOURS After Obama Said

Telecharger Messages d amour app android  #Paris #France #amour #TEsTombeCommeShym #Malaterra #teenpopnrjhits  iwp

When Obama spoke of setback after Paris, was he referring to his gun control push or his socialist plans for America? I am a #ProudAmerican

Plans for Mobilizations in Paris Cancelled by Authorities: French Activists More Determined Than Ever Bef  #LVN

Extra:   Suspected architect of Paris attacks dead: Washington Post

the refugees are probably scared of us, considering all the hate crimes that have followed the arrack on Paris

Paris music venue was like 'Dante's inferno', says police officer

#Toronto sign also lit up for #Paris tonight.

i pray for everyone the paris attacks have affected: the dead, the families and muslims everywhere who are in danger of being attacked-

so I have to make an album cover on a song that has a good meaning to it I should definitely do niggas in paris

Paris attacks: 'I will not give you the gift of hating you' my brave friend, sorry for your loss.

Stole $-- Two people were killed and more than 5,000 rounds were fired in the raid near Paris, but offi  ------ #RunorDye #

Edith on FOJG found this.  Father helps young son understand Paris attacks  via

The Paris Attacks: What You Really Need to Know  via

#FF #FollowBack Paris Police Still Working To Identify Bodies Recovered In St. Denis Raid: French   #RT #Follow

Obama veto Bill to increase screening of refugees in our country. Insanity is doing the same thing and expecting different results #Paris

[Breaking] Tracking down the Paris attackers: French forces raid a Paris suburb hunting for suspects, but  #YAF

In an old house in Paris that was covered in vines, lived 12 little girls in two straight lines.

There so much bs surrounding terror attacks hard 2 determine truth from Zionist propaganda. #ParisAttack served Israel interest

Woman Blows Herself To Hell In Paris Raid, Look What Obama Said Hours Prior  via

On November 29th, I'm marching for Paris and everything we love. Join me and let's make history:

Paris attacks: 'I will not give you the gift of hating you'powerful.

Paris teacher: I taught class Monday in defiance of terror  via

[News Update] | Top Muslim cleric on Paris  |Via TimesLive

however, we aren't 100% going paris nowwwwwww

Mayor wonders if we need WWII-style internment camps after Paris attacks  Yes, for the GOP!  #FeelTheBern

Mourners pay tribute to police dog killed during hunt for Paris attackers  #JeSuisChien #RIPDiesel Jack Bauer of dogs

A Pastor Blames Paris Shooting Victims For Attending A 'Death Metal' Concert

Passengers of diverted Air France plane delayed again: Paris-bound airplane passengers stuck in Halifax becaus

The 7-year-old Belgian Shepherd was killed sometime during the seven-hour siege  in the Paris suburb of Saint Denis.

My column in this week's Crawley Observer: Paris Terror Attacks

A commando of people arrested or killed in a massive police raid in a Paris apartment Wednesday were a terror unit, the city prosecutor said

French Police Raid in Saint Denis Following Paris AttacksRead more at   cc

Didn't Bosnian fans boo the minute silence for Paris attacks in Rep. Of Ireland?

Warning - Disturbing video of Paris attacks

Must see Gearoid O Colmain discusses the Paris attacks

Ecology Ottawa March to support #100%possible on Nov.29., the day before the Paris COP. Speeches Hall starting 1pm, march to Hill 2-3

#Chicago Pretty Night November 18th Cheers to #Paris and all your strength

Gamergaters purposefully try to pin Paris attacks on one of their critics but get grumpy if you call them terrorists

John Kerry: Hebdo Attacks Make Way More Sense Than Paris Attacks  via Kerry makes no sense, at all.

Michel Duncan Merle, a native of Paris  WSU professor emeritus talks about the attacks.

Ahmadiyya Times: Australia: Paris attackers don't speak for Islam,

Flatiron Bldg to honor Paris attack victims with projection

Is weird how after the shit went down in Paris people all of a sudden want refugees in the U.S.

Quite a contrast: From Paris - scenes of love  solidarity. From US, politicians fanning flames of fear  division for expected advantage

And it's ok to pray for Paris but not any American.

Paris Terrorists Use Double ROT-13 Encryption (translation: none at all)

Come on guys Paris  the people of France need you. Re-create the OMD 2006 Maid of Orleans moment in Paris.

Nat'l Headline: To US mass shooting victims, Paris attacks sadly familiar: When Sandy Phillips saw the bloodba

Two dead in Paris pre-dawn raid

Telecharger Messages d amour app android  #Paris #France #amour #TEsTombeCommeShym #Malaterra #teenpopnrjhits  lma

Suspected architect of Paris attacks is dead, according to two senior European  :

I hope that everyone in Paris stays strong~

Dramatic new vision of Paris attacks  (News) #melbourne #victoria

BBC News World: VIDEO: Paris on edge after police storm flat: Armed police have raided a flat in the north Par

#InternetBullies: Paris Bombers Were Lost In Secret Files - Daily Beast: Daily BeastParis Bo  #SocialMediaAbuse

what do you think about everything that happened in Paris? #tweetmecarter

May all Souls, killed by totalitarian psychopaths #Daech #Isis rest in peace #Nigeria #Beirut #Paris #Syria #Iraq #Russia

Thoughts and Prayers for Paris #K9 Hero Diesel. A true Warrior and Hero! Thank you for your service! #K9Diesel

#TomCotton on CNN can barely contain his glee. Using #Paris for political agenda. #ThinsThatScareMeMoreThanSyrianRefugees

#World: People Around The World Show Off Tattoos Honoring Paris: We tattoo ourselves because  via

#NowWatchiing Nightly News with live from Paris

Maybe Annie Walker made it to Paris?  #CovertAffairs #CovertCrew

After Paris Attacks, We'll Need a Strong President  viaWe Need A President. Not A Empty Chair

Doing a minute silence for the Paris attack is bullshit, how can you prioritise that tragedy over bombings in Syria for example?

Important comment regarding the recent attacks in paris

PM Justin Trudeau condemns 'highly disturbing' hate crimes after Paris attacks   //beautifully said!

Tributes to Paris Victims Photos - ABC News -

Given our reactions to Paris, racism towards refugees, ignorance of Islam/ISIS,  now Roanoke - I'm pretty sure the terrorists are winning.

okay good luck screening out the isis members. Just like the success they had in Paris.

viaAvoid reactions that politicize the events in Paris. Stand with Syrian refugees, victims of ISIS

Nail polish co. rightfully under fire for exploiting Paris tragedy  #Gross #PR

VIDEO: Relative urges Paris suspect to surrender  Whizzy_Walexzy

- With France we stand - The world, once again, is in grief, as terrorists strikes in Paris France  -

Imply muslim and black didn't get killed at Paris attack

So the Paris Climate talks did get cancelled? I was hoping the HAARP disclosure was scheduled as rumored.

Muslims. Do not know Jesus more do atheist they will both Paris together so will Christians that do not know Jesus they do not obey him

Australia's Active-Shooter Lessons From The Paris Attacks  # via HuffPostAU

She almost said it, 'We'll always have Paris'

Feel it may be more than twice unfortunately. #Paris

Good to see Oz support for long-term emissions goal in Paris agreement

Terrifying CCTV footage shows woman escaping Paris cafe when ISIS terror gunman's AK47 jams

these people need to go to Paris, Brussels, Berlin etc - hugely successful cities with multiculturalism at the heart.

I don't give a fuck what their life is like in the US. HEY CNN? What's it like to lose a loved one in Paris?

WTF During Paris Attack: American Embassy Turns Away 6-Month Pregnant American  via

LIVE on #Periscope: #FlatironBuilding in #NYC lit up w/ an image of the Eiffel Tower #Paris #solidarity

WORLD EXCLUSIVE: First footage of Paris terror attacks inside cafe  via Putsssss

A powerful tribute to a wife killed in the Bataclan theatre attack in Paris (Video)

Gawd, some of the justifications coming out as to why the Paris dead were more worthy are quite disturbing.

Paris Climate Marches (Protests?) to Be Canceled Due to #ParisAttacks  #COP21

please let us know how you would handle these attacks in Paris

do another one to commemorate the Paris attacks. Would be really cool

I've never wanted to go back to Paris more in my life

My conclusion on the aftermath of the Paris attacks: Twitter  Facebook.

yare Paris attacks at a glance: Wednesday's developments - CNN: Washington PostParis attacks at a glance:  yare

and I only say that because there were some involved in the Paris attacks

Ron Paul, on what to do in the aftermath of the Paris attacks:

#WearWhiteonFriday to support our #Family  #Friends in #Paris My entire #Company  is supporting our #Parisian Family

Students upset with so much attention on Paris and not Beirut #talktott

But we only praying for Paris though right ?? Smh

Paris attacks: Isil mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud 'killed' in police raid on Saint-Denis flat - live - Telegraph

Lots of people posting dog pictures in honor of fallen service dog in Paris.

How's Operation Paris coming along?

The Paris attacks solidify my support for Sanders -- and skepticism of Clinton  via

LIVE: Join me for the Special Order talking ab the attacks in Paris, Garissa, and Yola, Nigeria.

TRADINGFLOOR Paris attacks leave European project at risk: The Paris attacks are not just a tragedy for those

Survivor of Paris Attack Tells Her Story

People behind the Paris attacks  Middle East attacks r not Muslims, Christians or Jews. No religion teaches terrorism!

Final:    In Neighborhood Tied To Paris Attackers, Muslims Rally Against ISIS

CNN Latest: Paris attack survivor Isobel Bowdery details horrors:

Message about Paris Terrorist Attack  Black Lives Matter PLEASE WATCH  SHARE

hello,has anyone been blown up in Senegal ?not Paris,Beirut .just enjoy the sunshine

DTN Libya Unrest: US Strikes Heart of Islamic State's Oil Revenue: In the wake of the Paris attacks, U.S. warp

PARIS attack? Reminder to the WORLD? In need of a specific center which GUTHER  SHARE INTEL around WORLD specifically for TERRORISM?

How Paris became a grisly war zone: 5,000 bullets, 20 grenades and a spinal cord sent flying out of apartment:

Could the Paris attacks contribute to derailing Ben Carson's GOP lead?  via msnbc

The #NewYork Times uses #Paris email updates to explore a new method of interaction with readers  via

If an attack in #USA , #Trump2016 wins the election. #dems have lost interest in keeping REAL Americans safe. #ParisAttacks #NYC #refugees

Don't be afraid. It's only Paris. It has always been a wartorn hellhole.

jerZboyUSA: ****These are the scars from the #Paris attacks that you can't see****   via vicenews

Hey maybe Vince will run a Paris angle next week

The mass murder in #Nigeria needs to be recognized by Western media. No way this situation is less important than Paris!

Telecharger Messages d amour app android  #Paris #France #amour #TEsTombeCommeShym #Malaterra #teenpopnrjhits  yay

I liked a video from  Alleged 'Mastermind' Of Paris Terror Attacks Killed

Paris investigations are so professional and serious which has stopped another attempt by terrorist.Hats off to law enforcement agencies.

Retweeted The Telegraph Paris attacks: How to explain the horror to children

Obama says the refugees are mainly just women and children. Hey Obama, 3 women blew themselves up today! One in Paris, Two in Nigeria!

omg . I read Vigilant Citizen too !!! I love you . I need to come visit you in Paris later . I've been wanting to go overseas

i love you i pray things will get better soon in paris!!

BBC #UK News: Focus on Paris police raid - The police raid on a suspected terrorist cell in Paris features acro

TMB and RSB are on LIVE NOW:  Do you want to hear the TRUTH about the Paris attacks? If

#SaintDenis Police Raids: Fear Of Terrorism Spreads To Residents Of Isolated Paris Suburb

ISIS attacks Paris, Obama retaliates by attacking Republicans. Divisive, irrational  and infantile,

Painting all refugees as potential terrorists/suspects is insulting to the refugees who escaped the same terrorists that killed in Paris.

Blaming Encryption for the #Paris Attacks Looks Dumber Every Day  #ZippedNews

my thoughts and prays go out to the people of Paris tonight still cant get my head around whats happend, u have my support #PrayForParis

Well in the wake of a horrific tragedy in Paris at least we've been blessed with a lot well thought out political commentary on social media

Via #Paris Attacks Highlight Struggle To Stop Terror Plots Against 'Soft Targets'  #ISIS

Currently reading 'Peace for Paris' Symbol Goes Viral Within Hours of Attacks

Remember the widows orphans dead children fatherless in Boston Paris Lebanon NYC Ft Hood Sweden Norway Russia London

Was Paris attacks ringleader in raided apartment?  via

Unfortunately, the attacks on Paris showed just how little our strategy has worked.  (3/6) #NMPOL

truffle + decadence filled 3-hour lunch Grand Vefour in Paris, in former palace, team of 6 servers #foodtravelchat

NewYork 911 2001 Three Colours Flags Paris Friday11 13 Trois Couleur. All Prime Numbers. Are we seeking a Clever Numbers Man behind all this

I'm disappointed in tone you're giving the Paris tragedy, but you're right in line with stupid, cracker hysteria.

how all the black lives matter going? Haven't seen much about it since the Paris attack.

I liked a video  Social media honors police dog killed in Paris raid

Focus on Paris police raid  via BBC

Why #daesh would attack #Paris, according to an expert  via

France bans massive marches planned during #Paris climate talks #cop21

were u horrified about the attacks n Lebanon that happened a day earlier than the Paris attacks? Y no tweet for that?

Canadian Politics-Sports=Team 1040 a Bell owned network went on a anti-gun rant after the mass killings in USA But no rant of Paris Killings

drinks LA, trip to Paris, they can talk but we couldn't care less

#news Paris attack suspectsyahoo News are you Laugh Then WinceKate Solomon Trending Teen charged with What she's so similar, decision to: la

FRANCE24:  #Parisattacks: look back at the worst attacks known by #France since WWII

Thank goodness everyone remained calm and healthily sceptical and nobody jumped to any conclusions re: Paris attackers fake passports

movie night with this peanut!! lol #sisters #carol #nyc Paris Theater

[DEAD?] Abdelhamid Abaaoud, suspected Paris Massacre mastermind surfaces online

Paris attacks: police fired 5000 gunshots to dislodge Islamic state grou  via

I think why Paris is the most talk of the town it's all over social media , more than the other country . it's all over SM

Prayers, Strength, Hope, Love, Help, Healing, Favor, Peace, and Restoration for Paris.

Stated clearly, none of the 5 Paris attackers are Syrians.

Is Hampton Roads prepared for a Paris-style disaster?: First responders throughout Hampton Roads and northeast

haha! I love Paris and wanna go back.

#MustRead from about talking with your children about Paris.

Bloomberg - Police Don't Yet Know If Ringleader Killed in Paris Terror Raid

As a result of the tragic events in Paris, tonight's Legends is postponed. Our thoughts  condolences are with the victims  their families.

#JihadInParis the guys killed in Paris are foot soldiers. Inspired by Dr Baghdadi head of ISIS that wants an Islamic caliphate established

#xxx #TaylorSwift Paris Attacks Live Updates: Everything You Need To Know About Latest Developments In France:

When are we going to have such a beautiful #SunSet on #Paris again ?

'Violent Extremism Knows No Particular Faith': Response to Paris Attacks via huffingtonpost

Let's see if I have the Democrats right: We are to prat for Paris but fire a coach for praying. Right?

Hope you discuss how Paris attackers communicated with simple SMS and no encryption.

just last week, You also can't find an example in Paris

So now you crazy Libtards  Queen Hosebag are blaming the ISIS Paris attack on the NRA.  Desperate!

Douglas Murray [SML] - How should Britain react to the attacks in Paris  Peter Hitchens..SHAME.SHAME.SHAME

Reading: Michael Jackson's Daughter Paris Getting Married As Soon As She's 18? Family  - KDramaS

Anyone dying ( especially in this way ) is extremely sad and I'm not saying to forget about Paris but what about the others ???

Official: Firefight in #Paris suburbs thwarted more terror #ParisAttacks

I hope one day Paris Hilton and Britney Spears do a duo, even if it's a single or not.

reports alleged ringleader in Paris attacks killed in raid, 2 officials say

Paris attacks etcMalcolm Turnbull thrown in the deep end.What a fantastic effort. Thank you  team.

Klassical Dream MI  Philippe Hosay in Paris

VH1 Storytellers, Coachella, WTT Tour in Paris, Yeezus Tour in Chicago, Hollywood Bowl

Candlelight Vigil for Paris, Beirut and Peace on UI quad video at:

mtlopolis: French expats in Montreal struggle to make sense of attacks on Paris #montreal

alright but stop paying the other cities dust Paris is not the only place that's getting attacked

80% of people can't even find Paris on a mapandyou know what, never mind.

President Al Assad to Rai Uno TV: Paris events a horrible crime, we understand in Syria the meaning of losing a dear family member or friend

Personal note to Mike Rotman. Those suicide bombers in Paris were renters. And don't you think your mother hasn't thought of that already

#timesofindia Paris attacks 'mastermind' Abdelhamid Abaaoud 'killed' during raid on flat in French capital: Po

US warned of Paris attack 'mastermind' in May: WASHINGTON (AFP) - US intelligence warned in May that the Islam

Francois Hollande vowed to take in 30,000 refugees after the attacks on Paris. If you stand with France, you must stand with them on that.

After Paris: The new war on terror - Macleans.ca

Local NJ Muslims deplore Paris attacks  via

But it also counters the facts: the Paris attacks were by homegrown terrorists. French and Belgian nationals, NOT refugees.

Paris, it's been a rough week The Good always outweighs the Evil in this world.  Be Strong.

Just because of like The paris attacks and everything It's scary.

In light of recent events in Syria and Paris, people are starting to show their insecurities, religiously and secularly. Quite annoying.

Interesting News - How the Paris attacks are affecting Iowans' travel plans

That's nonsense. Tell French victims that US is on front line. They want US to stay out of it. #isis #parisattacks #syria #paris

BREAKING: Suspected architect of Paris attacks is dead, 2 senior European officials say - W  #Khaatumo #Khatumo

Official: Firefight in Paris suburbs thwarted more terror: The man who orchestrated Friday's  #nola #neworleans

East Europeans Fear Russia Diplomatic Thaw After Paris Attacks  via

Nigga like Alvin Johnson in Love Don't Cost a Thing after he bagged Paris Morgan and had niggas shook

Eagles Of Death Metal Break Silence After Paris Terrorist Attacks. The band has issued an official statement.

Favorite this if you'd be interested in buying one to help support the families of the victims in Paris

- Paris Terror Attacks: BBC reporter cannot hold back the tears during live hellip;:

MO governor calls for safeguards after Paris attacks, will not block refugees.  The SAFEGUARD is BLOCKING!

I didn't love Paris the way others lust after it, but I really do respect for opening France's doors to the refugees

After Paris, we should look to Chris Christie   You must be kidding me.

how about we #PrayForNigeria like we did for paris

Trudeau's quagmire: How the Paris attacks are putting the PM's foreign policy under scrutiny

Paris mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud grew up in a Brussels cul-de-sac

Paris Attacks Fuel New Fears Over ISIS Hit List in NTX

Paris isn't the only place that's been affected :-/ #PrayForNigeria

law enforcement is just using Paris attacks as an excuse to push an old argument.

Turkish soccer fans disrupt moment of silence for Paris attack victims  Yup, I'd say we've got a lot of work to do

Hey guys I am so sad about what happened to paris so #PrayForParis

please follow up on your report on encryption, as its come out that Paris terrorists did NOT use encryption, basic SMS!

TOTD: U all have been on the PRAYER TRAIN this past week for PARIS. BUT collectively u suspended a COACH for praying with his team!  Wake up

PARIS, LONDON, NEW YORK, OBAMA 'S FREINDS , AXIS OF EVIL

We Stand with Paris, We Stand with France | World of Psychology

I liked a video from  Paris been destroyed by Islam

Mayor of #Paris Anne Hidalgo pays tribute to #Beirut which was hit days before Paris terror attacks via

How does Paris not swing the debate on gun control in favor of retaining the 2nd amendment? #IfTheWhiteHouseListens

Army Sergeant Delivers Fiery Message About Spiritual Forces Behind the Paris Terrorism

From Paris-Boston,most terrorists were already known to authorities  How 'bout domestic terrorism, i.e.Charleston?

The dead of Paris: Stories of those lost - Chicago Tribune #stories

From Paris to Boston, Terrorists Were Already Known to Authorities  Hey France govt knew since 2010

Top Story: French politics shifts right after Paris attacks

OP-ED: All the way in Berkeley, Paris attacks difficult to swallow (via |

New Mexico At least two die in police raid on group planning new Paris attack

Deadly raid in Saint-Denis on Paris attack suspects  via Every terrorist should be hunted down like this!

I dont even wanna see anything about Paris, ISIS, terrorists or refugees anymore because it strips any belief that I have in humanity

Paris attacks mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud says Muslims cannot be happy without jihad | Daily Mail Online

Metro Transit Police Ramps Up Activity In Wake Of Paris Attacks: DCist

The Dalai Lama Tells The World To Stop Praying For Paris

I would like to demand an apology from the Muslim group for not condemning the terrorist murders in Paris and stop ignoring their actions.

Another 9/11? West Leverages Paris Attacks for Syria Endgame|Global Research - Centre for Research on Globalization

Leaving Berlin today for Paris where I spend five nights.  Pray for revival to touch the people's lives.

Philadelphia Mayor: 'No Level of Distinction' Between US Gun Crime and Paris Terror Attacks

NEED 2REMOVE OBAMA ASAP!! HE WAS APART OF PARIS!

Beautiful tribute to his wife whom was a victim of the Paris terrorists

R.I.P.Diesel French police dog who was killed today .#ParisAttacks #Paris #Serviceandsacrifice#NeverForget

released a statement following the tragic  events that occurred at their show in Paris last Friday

India has seen Paris happen few times earlier. Why can't We learn? What holds us back?

Eagles Of Death Metal pay tribute to Paris attacks victims killed at Bataclan theatre       {dailymail}

ICYMI: Paris attacks mastermind not arrested in raid  #ParisAttacks

One of the attackers at Paris owned a bar and was dealing in Drugs  so where  is Islam.

Paris attacks reopen cybersecurity talk in Senate

I am so so in love with this commentary by #Paris #Beirut #BeirutAttacks #AdelTermos

Perhaps the French will be willing to subdivide Paris with their muslim residents now that they have their attention

didn't they say this after the Paris attack?

Someone go to Paris, out front of the Eiffel tower and buy me a new laser pointer

Qui Radio Londra: Police Raid Paris Suburb as Manhunt Continues

Vive Le France, Say Eagles of Death Metal in First Statement Since Paris

From The BBC French politics shifts right after Paris attacks: The Paris attacks have changed the political la

This Muslim TV Host Gave an Incredible Speech Following the Paris Terror Attacks.  via omeletocom

Brother of Paris attackers lights candles for peace rally:  via

He also said that apparently ISIS plans for the same thing in Paris to happen in the US tomorrow so watch out guys!!!

Government confirms that no Japanese citizens were hurt in the various terrorist attacks in Paris.

Another setback. Not as big as Paris but a setback.- B. Obama

Indeed.Paris, along w/ somany other #Leftistsneed a hard slap in their face.Including a bunch here in Canada

Adele pays touching tribute to #Paris victims during #NewYork performance

the dog has nothing to do with the first Paris attack.

In wake of recent events in #Paris, #Beirut, #safety is a major concern. Let's talk about how to stay a safe #expat. #expatgogosafety

I hope people have been keeping up with ISIS. Like the fact that the terrorists involved in Paris were all French or from Belgium. Not Syria

All about them: Mizzou, Black Lives protesters say Paris attacks took spotlight |   (Where's my box of tissues?)

Paris attack mastermind may have committed suicide in raids: French envoy:  via

Thank you: advocates against hatred and racism in aftermath of the terrorist attacks on Paris

PARIS SHOOTING WITNESS DESCRIBES ATTACKER AS WHITE, CLEAN CUT, MUSCLAR M  via

WOMEN?? A WOMAN blew herself UP in PARIS. .with a BOMB!!!  GeTAGrIp!! WE DO NOT KNOW WHO THEY ARE!!

Following Paris attacks, Perhaps Americans can grasp the anger over Obama drone assassinations of weddings packed with children

Terrorism is a symptom of deeper problems. We must attack the roots of hatred and misunderstanding on a global scale#ParisAttacks #converge

****Europe on edge as security is stepped up after #Paris killings****  via

#alarabiya Family of Paris attacker at Brussels solidarity vigil: Mohamed Abdeslam, brother of Ibrahim Abdesla

If you are making fun of the Paris flags I hope you get fucked up by a random event

Test Paris attacks at a glance: Wednesday's developments - CNN: CNNParis attacks at a glance: Wednesday's  Test

Female jihadist blows herself up in Paris raids. So does she also get 40 virgins?

But keep only praying for Paris guys

Massive police raid foils second paris terror attack       {dailymail}

The scene at Paris Raid looks like from John Woo's film: gun battling while pigeon flying

Paris is no joke but why does everyone in the world have their pictures with their flag colors like. Ok what about all the other places

Hello my name is paris and I am addicted to food delivery services

I'll bring you to the beach in Paris

Fate of Paris attacks 'mastermind' unknown  via

#Breaking144 Alleged Mastermind of Paris Attacks Was 'Emir of War' in Syria: The alleged mastermi  #AceNewsDesk

Americans Refuse to Understand What Happened in Paris - Missing in many media accounts of Paris terrorism was a

Erik Truffaz - Wet In Paris - Now playing on  #radio

Followed the Paris stuff as much as I could w/out ruining vacay, but what was O late for? (Again.)

I changed my avi because I feel that to only bring attention to Paris only serves to perpetuate the problem.

French forensic experts try to establish whether the suspected organiser of the Paris attacks was among those

#news French Authorities Still Unsure Whether Top Suspect in Paris Attacks Killed in Police Rai  #derangedradio

Retweeted ITV News What to do in a Paris-style terror attack: Run and hide, don't lie down, new

OPINION:  Today's column from Ann Coulter on the Paris terrorist attack and her thoughts on Marco Rubio

Is one of these refugees the woman who blew self up to avoid arrest in Paris?

nights off in Paris.. still working on the trackunfinished version

Police boost security for Brawl of the Wild after recent attacks in Paris. Find out how:

#NigerianDailyNews Paris Attacks: People of Color Around the World Face More Scrutiny as Security  #World #News

Paris attacks: police investigating if Isis 'mastermind' is dead after St  - The Guardian: The GuardianPari

News Paris attacks give rise to conspiracy theories  #breakingNews

#Paris Update: Shocking Video Captures Explosion

How did alleged #Paris attacks planner become radicalized? -

Dog is hero of Paris terror This dog's life was worth more than the attackers

Charlie Hebdo spotlights Paris attacks  (News) #sydneynews #sydney

Kristen is the face of paris rome metier d art YESSSS

California rock band returns home, suspends all shows, after Paris attack  Ary

Innocents killed whether in NY, London, Mumbai, Paris, Syria or anywhere else, by terrorists or by those fighting them is a blot on humanity

taking pictures of the kids in Paris but not even helping them .

Paris attacks: The eight terror suspects named so far were not refugees, and all had EU passports.

Paris attacks: How did wanted terrorist Abdelhamid Abaaoud slip into France from Syria unnoticed? - Telegraph

A conversation with a Muslim London taxi driver after the #Paris attacks that should shame us all

#FutureWorldNews From Missouri to Paris  Follow KevinFitts

i meant to do a retweet about dogs, and i accidently did on of paris xD

Muslim Council of Britain takes out advert denouncing Paris attack Now let d world condemn US EU 4 killing civilians

#APEC2015 leaders 'strongly condemn Paris, Beirut, Sinai terrorist attacks'

#BokoHaram attacks has more casualties than the dreaded #ISIS#Fact why border bout #ParisAttacks#HeartfeltToKano#PrayForNigeria

Paris attacks: Why Africa should be afraid

We are Tolerant, Tolerating them for years, but attacking Paris was their biggest mistake, which got answered within 24hrs#ParisAttacks

I like those people, who no matter, how loud the media cries intolerance, the way, most are praying for paris,

Politico Exonerates, Blames Snowden for Paris - Accuracy In Media

#retweet: Fate of key Paris attack suspect unknown AJENews

Like nearly everyone I'm appalled by events in Paris but #jesuischien? I just laughed out loud on a quiet commuter train when I read that

Paris attackers didn't use encryption apparentlywho knew.

(VIDEO) Inside look at Paris community targeted in anti-terror raid:

well in a nutshell the narrative was on the Paris bombing and the question posed was are humans born naturally violent beings

French Trying to Determine If Mastermind of Paris Attacks Was Killed in Raid via /r/worldnews

Paris attacks: New video shows victims taking cover as terrorist shoots AK-47 into cafe #Business

This so awesome in Paris today's Please see all over the world

'Wembley's response a fitting tribute to Paris

French President Boosts Security Forces After Paris Attacks, Saying 'France Is - GazetteUnion,com (blog  uw #US

Paris attacks: Seven hours and 5,000 bullets - the full story of the Saint-Denis shootout | via

Paris attacks: Belgium cries foul over French blame game  (via.cnbceuronews)

follow this page - a tweet for every victim of the terror attacks in Paris Nov 13

Oh and another interesting observation, stock markets have had big gains during this paris terror episode

France has identified all 129 people killed in Friday's deadly attacks in Paris

Paris New Years Eve 2016 Celebrations, Parties, Events  #Paris #newyearseve

#China wants legally binding treaty in Nov 30-Dec 11 #climate talk in Paris

#ParisAttacks CCTV from one of the restaurats attacked on Friday evening.

My old teacher died this Monday, the same day I wrote this poem; so I dedicate it to her: #Paris for Louise Cowan

Police have raided a Paris hotel where ISIL terrorists spent their final hours before unleashing the deadly

#ParisAttacks from how long #FranceGov know the Terrorist position/Target? They wait to receive #attacks to respond?From how long they know

This Muslim TV Host Gave An Incredible Speech Following The Paris Terror Attacks  # via Sham

Why was the best dive bar in #Paris on the hit-list of terrorists?

#retweet: Paris attacks give rise to conspiracy theories AJENews

Dogs pay tribute to hero police canine Diesel killed in Paris attacks: Diesel, a seven-ye   via

Can Paris climate talks save the world? Live event 3 Dec -

#AirFrance always with me all over the world ! #Paris #Singapore #Jakarta: daily fligh to #Indonesia !

my connection here in Paris is not the greatest.  We get to a feed point to shove our video back around 6p local

WORLD EXCLUSIVE: First footage of Paris terror attacks inside cafe  via Lucky lucky lady..

Now- 'We're just as shocked' - Muslim messages going viral after the Paris attacks

Republicans make refugees an issue after Paris but it's Obama politicizing it lol

Climate talks in Paris: India to stay firm on use of coal - The Indian Express  #coal

Sky News Debate: Paris Attacks. Fighting Islamic State. A World United

November 29th #ClimateMarch in #Paris canceled due to security reasons  via

So are the Boston bombers, Paris terrorists. Vetted? They missed the 73 TSA workers on the watch list. #ParisAttacks

I have incredible compassion for what happened in Paris but this is the best.

PARIS TERROR ATTACK Illuminati FALSE FLAG Conspiracy! Friday 13th New Wo  via DOES EVERYONE GET ITFALSE F

Sickening rant of suspected Paris attacks mastermind Abaaoud  via Drugged up to the eyeballs no doubt..

HATS Turn HEADS ~  #Vintage PARIS  #WW1 - #20s- #40s #WW2  Black  Wool Felt #Ribbon Bow Brim #HAT UNWORN!

Ie: #intheclear Nada. Zilch. Paris Terrorists Use Double ROT-13 Encryption

Two #dead, eight arrested in #Paris #terror #raid - Nov 19 AM ET

Egypt plane crash, Paris attacks: What is ISIS capable of?  #news

Paris terrorists may have used PlayStation 4 to secretly plan attacks - New York Daily News

City of Paris and #opensource at OSS for Big Cities in #OSSParis15

Work With Putin To Stop Another Paris: CIA Chief Brennan  via  You have it

You may meet two from who are also cycling to Paris #COP21 Good luck.

BBC reporters in Paris, deliberate mischief in dividing social groups in their interviews. #bbcr4today.

Islamic state ATTACKED Paris, killed ~140 - Terror has no religion1 moron MISBEHAVED with air hostess - Hindu guy

#Was Abdelhamid Abaaoud killed in Paris police raid? #jobs #500K #Armenia: #Paris, France (CNN)Dead or alive?

This is a Facebook post by Antoine Leiris, a man whose wife was killed in the Paris terror attacks. The post that

To put this number into perspective, 129 people died in the Paris terror attacks. American police kill that many US citizens every 40 days

This makes sense: why Islamic State targeted Paris, and why it's changing tack #ParisAttacks   via

Man, all the statuses bitching about people changing profile pictures for Paris are really making a difference in the world #ohwait #itsnot

Bonjour Paris - it feels good to be back. Prouder than ever to be a parisian :-) #food #paris #travel #france.

I'm sailing Arctic icebergs into Paris  #COP21

Dear reporter in #Paris  ) The woman did not detonate herself! She detonated a bomb which blew her up!

my mom spent 3 weeks in the south and came back to paris like it was the middle of july  now she doesn't have a voice anymorewell done

French police still haven't determined if the man killed in Paris shootout is suspected terrorist Abdelhamid Abaaoud

BREAKING: Belgian authorities have launched six raids in the Brussels region linked to Paris suicide bomber Bilal Hadfi. #ParisAttacks

Is Russia Main Reason Why Paris Does Not Ask NATO for Help Against ISIL? / Sputnik International

So annoyed with this Paris news. Anything else fucking up in the world that I'm not informed about?

Prayers and hugs and trust and antics will not stop next ISIS attack or the next or the next..#MuslimApologies #ParisSiege #ParisAttacks

yes I was very touched and many like you have sent well wishes so thanks to u all !! #humanity #paris #DontLetThemWin

Muslim Council of Britain takes out advert denouncing #Paris attack

Despite terror attacks close by, Japanese student will stay in Paris

Paris Climate Summit COP21 News   - top stories by

As demonstrated in the wake of the #Paris attacks: #silence is the universal sound of solidarity

#etatdurgence : no more Demonstration, no more Reflectionsno more Food (for Someone)? #Paris

Our guest speaker discusses the geopolitical risks  the recent Paris attacks #CWEuroRetreats

#SkyNews Paris Siege: Police Await ID Of Dead Suspects: There are reports that one of two people killed in a r

#Paris #stocks: Provimi : #Merger #Acquisition Analysts conclude lowish sales profits in Nov 2015.  #Merger

Violence seen in Paris 'happens every day in Syria'  via

A new favorite: Undercontrol Podcast #39 - Franck Becker by Undercontrol Paris  on #SoundCloud

News Alert: Belgian authorities launch 6 raids in Brussels region linked to Paris suicide bomber Bilal Hadfi.

The tragic events in Paris over the last week bring to light important questions about the way news is covered -

#Japan seeks to speed up intelligence gathering after #Paris attacks

Paris Attack Put These Sector ETFs In Watch  $ITA $XAR $PPA $HACK $CIBR $PEJ $PEZ $JETS

What happened to #Paris, is god decision, what happened Next, its our decision, so, make it counted.!

Find out the terrific secrets of Paris and check  #KDONDtommy

So Brits not happy about the Syrians on there way after Paris attacks- cue another washed up child to get them back on acceptance mode

I liked a video  Paris Jazz Sessions - A wonderful one hour jazz program for all music lovers

Paris attacks suspect Salah Abdeslam entered Austria in Sep  |

#BREAKING #Belgian police stage new raids linked to #Paris stadium bomber: prosecutors

Now Playing: Ben Franklin In Paris Original Broadway Cast: 'I Love the Ladies'

Two Air France flights bound for Paris from the United States were diverted late on Tuesday due to bomb threats,

Did you know that the most visited place in Europe is Disneyland, Paris!#Travel #Regency #Doha #Qatar

Hemingway's A Moveable Feast has sold out Paris bookstores and Amazon France. Copies are being left at memorials

News Analysis: IS eyes U.S. after Paris terror attacks  #russia #xinhuanet

Paris Attacks: World of Sports Unite

Our #Paris coverage: The Long Haul Tricolour Slacktivism Extremism  Liberty

Paris attacks: Isil mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud 'killed' n police raid on Saint-Denis flat - live | via

Notre Dame de Paris))) ink, feather

It's interesting. I don't know what the tipping point would be? A major attack in Sydney like in Paris?

In today's Metro more on the Paris Massacre #PrayForParis

Southeast Asia not at risk of Paris-style #attack, experts say

DTN Italy: Europol chief says further attacks likely after Paris carnage: Europe is likely to face new Islamic

You break all boundaries and that is the issue. Stop Paris and come back to India for the real issues

asks what discussions Dept had with SoS International Development on preparations for Paris Climate Conference #DECCQs

PSG to wear special shirts to honour victims of Paris attacks with 'Je suis Paris' message underneath club crest: Paris Saint-Germain

#Alert #Reuters Belgian police carry out Brussels raids related to Paris attacks  via

2/2 Guess I shouldn't hold my breath. WorldLeaders' actions characterised by predictability,vindictiveness,KneeJerks. #LeadFromWithin #Paris

Arrived European Wind Energy Association Annual Conference, Paris, for #OffshoreWind

Really impressed by in Paris. Authoritative and calm, unlike many others.

Paris attacks: New raids in Brussels as Belgium steps up fight

Clarks Summit native feels safe in Paris: After Jordan Harris arrived in Paris in August, she fell in love. Th

An opportunity to pray for Paris Climate Talks with  #Pray4Paris #COP21 Sign up to pray

1)the photo shoot was before the terrorism in Paris 2)it's not his fault you're so fucking judgmental

Suspected architect of Paris attacks is dead, 2 senior European officials say  hope its true..

Respect to this guy..this video will make u think. a short video but a humongous message..plz do watch it..#Paris

Paris Attacks: Symbols and Choices  via

Every time a customer brings up Paris  I brace for a big racist impact.

velove topmat katun paris fit L95K

Sky: Wenger 'in shock' after Paris: Arsene Wenger says he was left in shock as he watched Friday's Paris attac

Paris attacks: Canada sees no reason to raise threat level - CBC.ca

Wenger 'in shock' after Paris: Arsene Wenger says he was left in shock as he watched Friday's Paris attac  #SSN

politico: The Paris attacks have thrown another variable in the mix  | Getty

The latest #ISIS video celebrates the #ParisAttacks  shows footage of NYC's Times Square!  #Paris #SaintDenis

RT May the sun of forgiving rise beautifully in Paris

ABC US -  In Paris Suburb, Residents Wait out the Bloody Gunbattle

President #Assad to #Valeurs_Actuelles: The #terrorist attack in #Paris proves that our warning was justified.#Syria14M.D.

Paris Attack; these actions are a need for power by the disempowered. #sports

U.S. Government Moves to Exploit Paris Terror Attacks to Ban Privacy Washington's Blog

Paris attacks: Belgium police conducts six raids, targets places linked to Stade de France bomber: Belgian pol

WSJ: A vision of France is damaged at Paris bistro La Belle Equipe

VIDEO: Paris attacks: Hollande speech  : November 19, 2015 at 10:26AM via mikejulietbravo

A man is blaming Indians for the Paris atrocity uno.clueless prick

After Paris Attacks, Will Muslims Reclaim Islam From ISIS?- NDTV

Video of Paris attacks shows victims diving for cover from ISIS jihadist       #news

Fuel cell extenders to get Paris showing - Mining Magazine

Belgian police detain 1 person in separate raid related to Paris attacks, federal prosecutor says -  #News

news shopping Paris attacks at a glance: Thursday's developments: (CNN) A suicide bomber blew herself up and a

Arsenal manager Arsene Wenger says football has shown 'togetherness' since the attacks in Paris last week.

This is not terrorism, this is a Muslim attack for Islamisation. Islam is not here to make friends. France is doomed

'I will not give you the gift of hating you' Husband mourns murdered wife by resisting hatred.  #ParisAttacks #Paris

Paris attacks: #039;Mastermind#039; Abdelhamid Abaaoud not arrested in raid, says prosecutor: The suspected

her loss, right? PS I hope you had an ace weekend despite not going to paris

The crisis that happened in Paris shouldn't label a whole nation as terrorists, that's wrong

Chris Christie  Paris Attacks -- His Response Showcased His Political Talent | National Review Online

can't wait,enough of Paris sorry?

#worcestershire British schools advised to cancel French trips in wake of Paris attacks: BRITISH schools are b

Effects of Paris attacks felt in #ABQ. At 4:32a, what you'll notice at this weekend's Lobo football game.

Special Report: Dogs around the world pay their own tribute to hero police canine killed in Paris siege

Injuries from Paris attacks will take long to heal {cbsnews}

#Iran #News How to tackle Islamic extremism, the root of the #paris attacks

Amazing to see people's reactions to the Paris attacks. Hats off to #GoggleboxAU.

How #39;glaring#39; intelligence failures allowed a second bout of terror in Paris

BREAKING: Terrorists Involved In Paris Attacks Dead In Raid#8230; (UPDATED)  via

Tech firms fight anti-encryption demands after Paris murdersIf the US govt wants iMessages, well, tough

I just pledged my allegiance to House Stark at Experience the Realm #ExperiencetheRealm Paris

Something on stage this morning reminds me of #paris

God bless bless you bro, they don't pray for my country, praying for Paris. . Smh!

Looking for user reviews about Middle School Modigliani? We will help you  #MODIGLIANI #PARIS #SCHOOL #MIDDLE

This is the official advice on what to do in Paris-style terror attack

'I survived Paris' - South Coaster speaks out.

The Guardian: Paris attacks: forensic experts seek to identify raid bodies.

Rakyat Post Wenger salutes English solidarity over Paris: LONDON, Nov 19, 2015:Arsenal manager Arsene W  #news

weak ass #jeb cant defend himself against #trump so this shiny object #ParisAttacks makes so easy to attack Obama for war =NOT

BBC News - Syrian president: Paris attacks a horrible crime Well, he should know.

Baap reWORLD EXCLUSIVE: First footage of Paris terror attacks inside cafe  via

Ahead with terrifying pix of moment terrorists struck #Paris restaurant. Plus on #ISIS frontline in #Iraq

Watch Video French President Hollande Welcomes #Refugees Despite #Paris Attack =

This morning, we are following the latest out of Paris, plus the mounting debate in the US over the Syrian refugee crises. 4:30AM.

news1channel: Attacks in #Paris are spurring hatred against #Muslims: #Erdogan | NewsOne

I have as much sympathy 4 Diesel the dog than any of the folk killed in Paris (his life was as precious to him as yours is 2 U)

Lincoln Report (Paris Market Buzzes With Early Morning Activity)

Related News: 2 attack suspects in dead after French police raid north of Paris -USA TODAY-

VIDEO -  Paris Attacks: celebrities pay homage to the victims of Friday the 13th attacks

#streetstyle Paris - Anna Brewster [Street Style Aesthetic - London]

Revealed: Footage of Paris terror attacks inside cafe  via

Rubio misses Paris hearing for fundraising.  Raising money is more important than governing for Rubio  via

In Madrid on Saturday, they will even search fans' sandwiches. on stadium security after Paris attacks.

I liked a video  Paris Attack and The Number 13  Illuminati Symbolism

READ our new post on the #ParisAttacks and military implications it could have. #Paris

WHAT WE KNOW NOW: France debates new powers; ISIS warns of attack on New York

Can decision be taken #COP21 #Paris #France in a #war #terrorist atmosphere #ParisAttacks ? what are the priorities? Long term/short term

Ratatouille (2007) 1hr 46m [U] A culinary-inclined rodent heads to the world's gastronomic capital - Paris - to

Fears of French-style Patriot Act in wake of Paris attacks  ^France24

Paris set to beat London with number of new international #retail entrants in 2015 - new Savills analysis:  #MAPIC

Copywriter's Ad:Go anywhere, go everywhere Wins Gold After His Death in Paris  #advertising

The derailment of a French #TGV train from Paris to Strasbourg, which killed 11 people on Saturday was caused by excessive speed (SNCF)

EU plans crackdown on Bitcoin to halt terror funding: Following the Paris attacks, EU ministers will urge Euro

PALESTINIANS and the people of PARIS are innocent and are being oppressed , ISRAEL and there creation ISISTERRORIST

Even before the Paris attacks, France already arrested the most suspected Islamist terrorists in Europe  via

Tomorrow: Reading Peace Group - Syria  Paris peace vigil. Via -

Paris attacks: Journey of the 'refugee' bomber -

What's we know right now on the Paris attacks:

WATCH: Did Daniel propose to Erich in Paris?

#Zakharova: Our condolences to the family of Natalya Muravyeva-Lauraine, a Russian citizen killed in the Bataclan terrorist attack in Paris

what is our country doing to protect us for Black Friday. I think in light of Paris we all need to be vigilant.

OK I understand those were killed in Paris attack are the real humanswhile ours are toys n ratsthat's how they think

thankyou  think the french paris police are busy its regarding #Diesel  the police dog killed in action

BREAKING: Mastermind of Paris attacks identified among raid dead: prosecutor

Remember the Paris of our dreams, not the Paris of our nightmares

what is our country doing to protect us. I have concerns about Black Friday in light of the paris attacks.prayers with paris

BREAKING: French prosecutors: suspected mastermind of #ParisAttacks attacks killed in police raid.

#BREAKING: French prosecutors say mastermind of Paris attacks killed in police raid

JUST IN: Abdelhamid Abaaoud, ringleader in  terrorist attacks in Paris, has been killed, the Paris prosecutor's office said Thursday.

Over past 2 yrs, more ppl tended to oppose than support military action in ME. Paris seems to have changed that

#BreakingNews suspected ringleader of #Paris attacks Abdelhamid Abaaoud killed in raid on Nov 18th in St Denis according to Prosecutor.

#BREAKING -- French prosecutors say suspected mastermind of the terrorist attacks on #Paris, Abdelhamid Abaooud was killed in a police raid.

Paris attacks: EU chiefs defy French demands for border controls on jihadist  -  ? Why? Why not protect people?

#BREAKING: Suspected mastermind of #ParisAttacks was killed in #SaintDenis raid, Paris prosecutor confirms.

#BREAKING Authorities say the suspected mastermind of last week's Paris attacks is dead. Visit  for more.

Official: Architect of Paris attacks killed in raid: Abdelhamid Abaaoud, the so-called mastermind of the terro

I've a return trip to Brussels from Paris coming up in early December. What will be the implications of the State of Emergency?

Breaking Islamic terrorists and mastermind of the Paris attack is officially dead  to the French government

GEODIS will be contributing to the Paris Process on Mobility and Climate (PPMC) for the COP21

BTVI ALERT  -  Abdel Abaaoud Was The Suspected Mastermind Behind Paris Attacks

Paris attacks: The eight terror-suspects, are not refugees and all have EU passports

West Should Trace Root Causes of Terror, Says SP Leader Azam Khan: Against the backdrop of Paris attacks, Utta

Paris attacks ringleader dead - prosecutor -

Kudos and thanks to of for a fascinating talk re Afghan #GhostSchools, #ISIS propaganda,  #Paris.

oh my god smirk vapeman did a paris tribute magic trick

From Missouri to #Paris: The left should be accountable for the alternative moral orders it creates.

#BREAKING from AP: French prosecutors say suspected mastermind of Paris attacks killed in police raid. #News10NBC

BREAKING:  Mastermind in Paris attacks dead.

Security boosted in Milan after Paris attacks - English - ANSA.it

that's the way the data is looking for the year to date. revealed the research in support of Paris today

#Paris terror mastermind killed in firefight with Paris police yesterday identified

some old fuck blaming millennials for the Paris attacksas if your generation hasn't killed masses of people either? lmao

Suspected mastermind of Paris attacks Abaaoud died in police raid - prosecutor PARIS , Nov  via

Here's Why Paris Atta  via #leagueofblogger |

France: Paris attacks architect killed in raid -

Prayers for Paris ,a pink slip for a coach. ..who are these people unable to read and understand a Constitution

Man believed to have planned Paris attacks is dead, says France

BREAKING:  Abdelhamid Abaaoud mastermind of Paris attacks killed in police raid. ID'd thru fingerprints.  More w/CBS at 7am.

I just read a tweet that said the man behind the Paris attacks was killed. Is this true?

Introducing the new Turtleneck by Curling Paris ! Check out our new knits on our stores  e-shop at

Confirmed: ISIS_ Abdelhamid Abaaoud  blown up with female terrorist in St Denis, Paris, raid yesterday. #ParisAttacks

The Belgian jihadist suspected of being the ringleader of the Paris terrorist attacks was killed during a raid on

Maybe this is mebut how is Paris catching and killing all these ISIS people and America isn't?

Retweeted Breaking News Feed Surveillance Video Surfaces Showing Terrorist on Rampage in Paris

Why do people find it easier to show sympathy for Paris, rather than Palestine? Therapist explains

BREAKING from Cousin of main suspect in Paris attacks died in raid; believed to have blown herself up, according to police.

I mean, everything happening in Paris could be happening here.

French #prosecutor confirms 'mastermind' of #Paris attacks was killed in raid

from TIME in World : Paris Attack Mastermind Killed in Police Raid

French Jewish Community Warned On Friday Morning Of Paris Attacks

The Paris prosecutor says that the suspected mastermind of the #ParisAttack was killed in a police raid.

EDM BEAST TECH NEWS After Paris Attacks, Telegram Purges ISIS Public Content

This artist from Paris is covering India's walls with some insane graffiti

French prosecutors: Suspected Paris ringleader killed in raid -

#stonerdawg!! Paris Attacks Lynchpin Confirmed Dead in Raid: The Belgian jihadist suspected of be  via

Good for #Paris killing the Mastermind, but terrorists are like roaches, kill one leave thousands behind!#Prayers4Paris

eightbrotherswearingexplosivebeltsandcarryingassaultrifles of Paris singing of loved Images arrested the up

Video: Terrorist attacks in #Paris #France #ParisAttacks. You can see how ppl play dead to avoid getting shot.

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, mastermind of Paris attacks, confirmed dead in police raid  via

This is strength and personal power Bereaved widower sends message to Paris terrorists

Paris attacks: 10 French fighter jets are bombarding ISIS with more airstrikes tonight -  #GoogleAlerts

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, Architect Of Paris Attacks, Killed In Police Raid

ICYMI Paris pays the price of Obama's inaction: David Mastio  #tcot #prayforparis #paris #parisattacks

The suspected organiserParis attacks, Abdelhamid Abaaoud killed#AbdelhamidAbaaoud #ParisAttacks

RT: :UPDATE: Paris Prosecutor says it is unclear at this stage if Abaaoud blew himself up or not:

#PeaceForParis Drink wine on a terras in Paris                     R.I.P. man

French police say they have killed the suspected mastermind behind the Paris Attacks  via

Suspected Paris attacks mastermind is dead - KY3 News

The Sniffer Dog killed in Paris actually gave her life for our freedom! RIP Diesel (her name) was a true hero!

Obama unyielding on ISIS as criticism mounts after Paris attacks        His priorities certainly not us.

#ParisAttacks Psychopathic mass murderer  leader of Paris attack suspects Abdelhamid Abbaoud is killed. Body identified.

G Riviera did not agree with bombing IS until his daughter was caught in the Paris attack Will Obama think same if IS attacks his family

Just found out the guy who organized the Paris attacks has been shot #fuckyouisis

French say attack 'mastermind' was killed; cousin died too:  #ParisAttacks

Mastermind of #Paris terror attacks found dead inside apartment raided by police.

Since the Paris mastermind is dead stop showing his picture on TV. That was his goal. #ParisAttacks

#HuffPo Thursday's Morning Email: Mastermind of Paris Attac  |

This man has absolutely no relation to any terrorist attacks yet he's afraid he will face the repercussions of Paris/Lebanon

#TuFirmaXLaPatria Mastermind of Paris Attacks Killed in Police Raid  SIGUE A

Suspected mastermind of Paris attacks Abaaoud died in police raid: prosecutor: Abdelhamid Abaaoud, a 28-year-o

ff Mother sacrificed herself to save her son during Paris terror attacks (Photos)  via

Killing #ParisAttacks leader #Abaaoud won't make Paris safe just like killing last year's terrorists (Or thousands in Iraq and Syria) didn't

PARIS: Suspected mastermind of Friday's attacks has been killed

Dig this? I just read an article on CNN. So amusing. In it John Kerry blames the Paris attacks on Global Warming.

#Paris's cultural institutions are intent on staying open, despite security concerns.  via

Difficult times call for brilliant neighbours #paris

Paris attacks ringleader Abdelhamid Abaaoud killed in Paris raid - BBC News  #video [ad  ]

RT: :Can 'smart' networks protect citizens from Paris-style terror attacks? reports from Barcelona.

Suspected Paris attacks mastermind killed in raid

Death of #Paris attacks mastermind doesn't end threat in EU Claim: 1000's of ISIS fighters incl dozens of women hiding in plain sight

#TheCEOpundit What We're Following This Morning: Leader of Paris attacks confirmed dead: On Thursday, French a

Body of Paris attack ringleader Abdelhamid Abaaoud identified through forensic testing in Saint-Denis raid

Btwn us a vast blue seaUnited stil my brother n me Hoping Our words wud suffice In Paris findin love N hope findin life #micropoetry

France police have killed the paris attackers in a raid #PrayForParis

Paris?s Cultural Institutions Slowly Bounce Back After Attacks

I'm back My new theme is Paris #SaveParis Hope you all have a great day!

BREAKING: Architect of #Paris #terror attacks killed in raid.

Paris #Attacks: Belgium Conducts Raids in Connection With Terror Attacks - Dispatch - WSJ

ICYMI: Mastermind of #Paris attacks confirmed dead in yesterday's police raid.

I pray for Paris checked in nine colours #cantspeakenglish

Pope Francis calls Paris attacks piece of a 'piecemeal World War III' - Washington Times:  via

Citizens of Paris are Scared as Hell cuz of Bomb blast?  When in the Northeast of Nigeria Bomb blast is now like an Instrumental

Suspected mastermind of Paris attacks Abaaoud died in police raid: prosecutorEtribune

France Prosecutor: Architect of #Paris attacks killed in raid:

Just one week before the Paris attacks said this on to

Eagles of Death Metal Make First Statement on Paris Attacks [PIC]

The Link Between BDS and Terrorist Attack on Paris' Bataclan

NBC Chicago: Paris Attacks Lynchpin Killed in Raid: Prosecutor

he never said anything about the paris attack

Hope you all have recovered from the events in Paris over the last couple of days

Love an inside glimpse into the NFL's security apparatus following the Paris attacks. Hope it's better than the rest of the league office

A Book of Condolence has opened for people to share messages of sympathy following the Paris attacks

Marine Le Pen, Front National leader, walks out of interview after 'being caught lying' in wake of Paris attacks

Chief Suspect in Paris Attacks Died in Raid, France Says: Abdelhamid Abaaoud, the Belgian suspected of organiz

Terrorist Attacks in Paris - A Disability Perspective: The attacks by terrorists in France recently has me won

French authorities confirm the suspected mastermind behind the Paris attacks has died.

hi thanks for the follow fan of metal and soccer m/ from Paris

STV: Sturgeon backs lethal force for Scots police in wake of Paris attacks  #Highland

WARNING, MAY NOT BE SUITABLE FOR ALL VIEWERS:  Via - Restaurant video of #Paris gunman opening fire:

the dude who planned the attacks on paris

Fort Russ: Littlehirosima:Paris vs Donbass  #aid #humanitariancrisis #littlehiroshima

China expects 'ambitious deal' at #Paris climate summit. #climatechange

Hi Lucy! I've written something on how we should react to Paris in order to beat extremism long-term. Interested?

Officials at Adrian High School report a student trip to Europe will proceed as planned, although their stop in Paris is off the schedule.

CONFIRMED: Suspected Paris attacks ringleader Abdelhamid Abaaoud is dead.

RIP Diesel. She was killed in the raid in Paris yesterday. A hero bomb sniffing dog. Out thoughts go out to

Buckinghamshire: Chesham Mosque condemns Paris attacks and says those responsible are not 'true Muslims'  #bucks

Why do the media insist on showing us what the attackers look like? Whats the point? Other than to encourage hatred,  glorify them? #paris

French Interior Min says only learned that Abdelhamid Abaaoud was in Europe on Nov 16, after Paris attacks

French Police Dog Dies In Wednesday's Paris Raids

Since the attack in Paris they have been going to a particular place to dro flowers and burning candles for the

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, presumed mastermind of the #Paris attacks, was killed in Wednesday raid, French authorities say

I completely agree with you. My point is that the platform for things like the 1953 coup was the 1919 Paris conf.

French prosecutor confirms death of Paris attacks 'mastermind'

French prosecutor: Suspected planner of Paris attacks died in police raid

SkyNews: Paris Attack Ringleader Was Killed In Siege - Abdelhamid Abaaoud is among the dead from a raid in St D

BREAKING NEWS: HE'S DEAD. The suspected mastermind of the Paris attacks was killed in police raid, authorities

Isis bataclan Paris attacks give rise to conspiracy theories. AbdelHamid Abaaoud Isil: Cons  #China #India #USA

Ahle Sunnat Wal Jammat condemns Paris terrorist attacks: PESHAWAR: Ahle Sunnat wal Jammat has condemned terror

BREAKING: #Cyprus ready to 'provide assistance' to Paris in fight against Islamic State #ISIS  #ParisAttacks

How the GOP's response to the Paris attacks might backfire, by  via

Vintage Map of Paris (1920) Wristwatch by Alleycatshirts  via #watches #zazzle

Paris attackers did not use encryption, according to reports  via

53% of adults don't want Syrian refugees due to the problems in Paris

Notre Dame of Paris from the river Seine.

#HoyVzla | UNHCR urges Europe not to demonize refugee over Paris attacks

#Breaking144 Abdelhamid Abaaoud, suspected organiser of Paris attacks, killed in Wednesday's poli  #AceNewsDesk

#360WiseNews : Stock Market Perspective on Paris 2015Mumbai 2008, London 2005, Madrid 2004  USA 2001

#ParisAttacks ringleader Abdelhamid #Abaaoud involved in 4 of 6 attacks foiled by #France - interior minister

#Paris #FurnishedApartment #Discount! $150 off the agency fees on this Studio - Trocadero

Paris terror attack proves Trump was right: Donald Trump is brilliant. Trump is a chess master. His i  #mcgnews

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, the key suspect behind Paris attacks, was killed in police raid in the Saint-Denis suburb,

#Syrian refugee debate draws comparisons to Holocaust #U.S.government #UnitedStates #Paris

There is no good argument for letting in Syrian Refugees right now:.Abdelhamid AbaaoudMastermind of Paris

Secretary Kerry pushes climate change during Paris visit | Let's just talk about the weather as the biggest issue!

I have no fear, and consequently no hate to offer here no matter how popular it has become since Paris.

Paris never received information attack mastermind was in France: minister

how come you guys aren't trying to support Nigeria and speak about them like you did with Paris?

Well, it's more than just Paris, it's ISIS in general (I'd say Beirut, xcept that once Paris hit the news, no one cared anymore!)

New Video: Suspected Paris Terror Ringleader Killed in Police Raid

Video of father explaining Paris attacks to son goes viral  via BostonGlobe

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, the alleged architect of the Paris attacks, was almost amp;hellip; |

Alongside Turkish and Bosnian fans, yet more Muslim supporters boo the Paris minute silence. Absolute disgrace!

DTN Iraq: Suspected mastermind of Paris attack died in police raid, officials confirm: The suspected mastermin

Football 'responded well to Paris' (via BBC London News):  #London #News

WLBT: France Prosecutor: Architect of Paris attacks killed in raid

Paris Attack 2015: Named Terrorists All European Nationals, Not Syrian Refugees #iraq

Key suspect in Paris attacks killed in police raid: Paris prosecutor says Belgian national Abd  via

Paris attacks: French experts seeking to identify whether Isil mastermind Abaaoud was 'killed' -

Morning Plum: The Paris attacks are making Donald Trump 'stronger':

Paris' Bataclan will reopen despite terror attack

Political author Gearoid O Colmain discusses the Paris attacks with //t.co/BGsBEkg5U1

Via Trump Risis Post-Paris Attacks  #p2

I understand that the people of paris are terrified after the attacks but taking their frustrations out on muslims is not the way to justice

How to explain the Paris attacks to kids, from a French magazine: #kids #parenting

Paris Georgia 'LIVE' Cotswold Arms, Burford - Saturday 21st November from 9pm

Paris attacks spur criticism of French intelligence

that Paris ringleader should just be thrown in a ditch and burnt..

It's exactly like seeing people shot people in Paris last Friday, some dead, some injured, some not even French

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, Terrorist Suspected Of Planning The Paris Attacks, Is Confirmed Dead

ISIS Promises to Send a Suicide Bomber to New York City's Times Square #TCOT #LNYHBT #TGDN #Paris

I liked a video  Syria - President Bashar al-Assad on Paris Attacks (Interview) | English Subtitles

Expatica: Belgian PM rejects criticism, to jail returning jihadists after Paris attacks

Yes. But I don't think that's why 130 were killed in Paris.

Thanks I'm OK been a little rough these last few days with the violence in Paris,#terrorism has no religion.

Serious turn after Paris attacks could be the moment has been waiting for.

The ultra-romantic photo that's helping a heartbroken Paris - via

France confirms suspected leader of Paris attacks was killed in police raid  HOLLANDE WORKS FOR THE ANTICHRIST

Will you pray for those who lost their lives in Paris :-(

on the newsroom camera, talking to and about Paris and her programme on tonight

After the Paris terrorist attack, Obama slammed the GOP opposing the influx of Syrian Muslim refugees - it

Alleged Mastermind of Paris Attacks Killed in St. Denis Raid  | Via MotherJones

Mastermind of Paris attacks has been confirmed killed in yesterday's raids! #ParisStrong #kens5

EDM BEAST NEWS Ringleader In ISIS Paris Attacks Abdelhamid Abaaoud Killed By Police During Raid

Webpoll: Is Canada at risk of a terrorist attack similar to last week's Paris assault? Vote:

I wonder what the result would be to this question: Do you approve of the 13/11 Paris attacks?

#FreshNews: Paris' Bataclan theater will reopen after attacks

Megabus launches new routes.The new routes include:Nantes - Paris Bercy - 4 times a day in each direction,

FlashNet: France: IS releases new video Paris Before Rome

OGC Nice's fan club has asked all fans going to Allianz Riveira for match v Lyon to be dressed all in black out of respect for Paris victims

Tell David Cameron to be a 'Good Cop' at the Paris UN Climate Talks!

Boy wins praise for act of kindness to mosque vandalised after Paris attacks: Kind-hearted scho  via

Paris turned out their lights as a sign - Perfectly Timed Photos | Facebook

I hear Rangers fans are to dress in red, white and blue at the weekend as a tribute to the Paris attacks. #NiceTouch

Yes, the Media's Response to Paris amp; Beirut Was Different

Shadow Home Sec warns Theresa May of danger of police #cuts following Paris attacks:

Surprise! Paris attacks 'mastermind' Abdelhamid Abaaoud never attended mosque, family says

Earlier in the morning our school was informed that there was a bomb!We were terrified but we stayed strong cause we thought about Paris!

Sorry for all the political tweets recently. This post-Paris stuff is really concerning to me.

Clinton and Sanders to address #ISIS Threat in wake of Paris attacks

Live: Hillary Clinton outlines her strategy for defeating ISIS in wake of Paris attacks:

AFP: Nine arrests in #Brussels raids linked to #Paris attacks

Why the hell are people still going on about the Paris attacks???

I added a video to a playlist  PARIS FALSE FLAG: What The Media Isnt Telling You About Charlie Hebdo

[FOX News] Don't forget Paris this winter

ISIS abuse on women didn't matter until 11/13 attacks in Paris. That's also abuse and hypocresy

Several muslim organisations in Nagpur flay Paris attack

Suspect that both Frankfurt  Paris finance sectors would love to disrupt #CityofLondon if had the chance#EURef

Puscifer Bassist Was Trapped at Le Bataclan During Paris Attacks, Maynard  -

-- Paris*thinking* you know I once put special herbs in my husband's winemade him unable to leave his room and the --

French Prosecutor: Mastermind Behind Deadly Paris Attacks Killed In Raids - WCHS - ABC:

G-WOOFY HIP HOP NEWS Ringleader In ISIS Paris Attacks Abdelhamid Abaaoud Killed By Police During Raid

This piano story was really sweet. Thanks, Y'all are doing a fantastic job.  #Paris

Suspect #PeterRobinson is wishing #KayBurley was still in Paris. Live interview on #SkyNews is up to her usual cringe inducing style.

Greenwich to Honor Victims of Paris Terrorist Attacks

rightfully takes Obama to task for lacking the will to crush ISIS. Body Bags in Paris

Does Edward Snowden really have blood on his hands over Paris? - The Independent

guessing Paris/threats to big sporting events worldwide might have something to do with it.

After Paris 13/11France 168 raids, 144 house arrested, air strikes over Al-RakkaAfter Mumbai 26/11?By

People really need to stop cancelling their fancy vacations to #Paris and #France.

Viendo EN DIRECTO en #Periscope: Paris, sunset, clouds, what a view

Btw, the Paris attackers weren't refugees. They had EU passports.

#AYATOLLAH NURI HAMADANI today:#Zionists plotted #Paris attacks to foment #Islamophobia, and discourage more French to convert to #Islam.

France will be in a somber mood as Ligue 1 resumes after the deadly Paris attacks

This time John Kenneth Galbraith air strikes might be what works. Paris a step too far.

Husband of Paris victim sends defiant Facebook message - CNN   May this msg give strength to us all

France confirms suspected leader of Paris attacks was killed in police raid: Fingerprint analysis was used to

Can someone tell me the point of having U.S. Embassies if they refuse Americans during a terror attack? #PARIS Take the jihadis tho, I bet.

France bans Paris climate rallies due to security concerns -The Tico Times

1isis member as refugee in Paris. 8 caught in Istanbul. It is a valid concern. And needs open discussion.

PARIS ATTACKS Thu, 19 Nov 2015 10:00:00 CST

Paris attacks: Woman Who Refuse To Change Her Facebook Profile Picture to France flag Gives Her Reason This woman'

Diesel, in loving memory of hero police dog killed by woman suicide bomber in Paris siege

Retweeted KTLA Now on KTLA5: Downey police officer shot, killed in station parking lot; Paris suspect

Il have you and Paris in my prayers bro..

French President Francois Hollande Welcomes Refugees Despite Paris Attack -- I guess we are back to hating France. That was quick.

CORRECTED - France confirms suspected mastermind of Paris attacks killed in raid: (Corrects translation of quote in paragraph 3. Pros

EU to tighten external border checks after Paris attacks: The European Union will tighten checks at external b

Islamic Movement banned 'the timing was chosen by Netanyahu when the whole world is concerned with the Paris'

GUN SALES SOAR AFTER PARIS ATTACKS! Nightly News 11/18/15 Full Show  via

OH SURE,, OK, there is no Credible threat.. DID THEY Announce they were going to shoot 120 in Paris, or take down

TIL Actor Christopher Lee was present at the last public execution in Paris, the guillotining of Eugen Weidmann.

Im an atheistSo u really dont think a Paris style attack will happen here? We already had the Boston Bombing

Obama offers help to his friends in Paris.

Video Malzberg | Patrick J. Buchanan discusses the terror attacks in Paris and Obama's response

A reflection on the Cal State-Long Beach student killed on the Paris attacks

Back to Paris Gospel Festival 2015 (1rst concert) with this song I feel the spirit Hezechiah Walker.Retour sur

The #Iraq war does not absolve the Paris terrorists

Hey David - I've written about Paris and the future of liberalism. Love to hear your thoughts:

Paris never received information attack mastermind was in France: minister: By John Irish and Ingrid Melander

No. My daughter is going to Paris soon and I approve. #smallfightback

A music theater was attacked, 60 people were killed and 100 are being held hostage

Prayers-4-Paris Tribute to victims in Paris work together to keep the world  safer place!

Thank you those who #follow me. It's important to my #courage to write about my life to have your #support. #amwriting #amblogging #paris

#Paris has always been a city focused on living  enjoying life.  via

Paris attack bros were charas-smoking alcoholics: BELGIUM: In the Brussels bar they ran before the authorities

Paris attacks my familly and friends live there

Ann Coulter was correct, she said it best, the night of Paris attack, you were elected President!!!! I love her!!

How exactly would a wall round Paris or France have helped?

9/11 and the Paris. I knew nobody and bawled like a baby for those innocent ppl n their families!

Meet the Lower East Side Barber Behind Knicks Player's Paris-Themed Haircut

VIDEO: Applause in Paris parliament on news of death of mastermind Abdelhamid Abaaoud

Obama's the smartest person in the room, right? Officials Warned of Accepting Syrian Refugees Before Paris Attacks

#France24 Belgium to boost security amid criticism over Paris attacks

Watched on #Periscope: Disney Magic on Parade with Euro at Disneyland Paris #euroscope #disneyscope #disney #fb

#france #paris Paris attacker implicated in foiled attack plans - RTE.ie: RTE.ieParis attacker implicated in f

It's amazing how praying for Paris or praying for Missouri is socially acceptable yet praying for your players or your students is not

Like the Kenyan attack is old. Lets not start something just to start and let Paris mourn. Sheesh.

the best cure for terrorists to shit .. take it. #pray for paris

French officials have said that following an analysis of the Paris attacks, it has showed that one person, who was directly involved in

Spain's interior minister says no indication fugitive wanted in connection w/Paris attacks, has tried to head to Spain or entered country.

Watford FC among Premier League clubs to increase security after Paris attacks:

French Authorities Say Alleged Mastermind Behind Paris Attack Killed

Don't let the facts get in the way of you guys blaming Syrian refugees for the attacks

Crewe  Peterborough ask fans to observe a one minute silence to remember those who sadly lost their lives in Paris.

BHO confused! Gay pride or Gay Paris LGBT Rainbow Tribute, No Special White House Lighting For France - Breitbart

#Police #Issue #Photo Of #Explosives #Expert They Think Made Suicide Vests For Paris Attacks

Could Paris Attacks have been prevented? Our take:

Just one. The iX Pay T7 in Paris.

Abaood,the ringleader of the coordinated attack on Paris was killed yesterday in Saint Denis,France.

Which is why 42 percent of Muslim youths in Paris ALWAYS SUPPO//t.co/gEJA5HCmc1

Police storm Paris church as siege ends nearby - premier

48 hours in Paris: a doctor talks about treating the victims of terror [The Verge]

Chilling videos of the Paris attack being shown on CNN

They do realize that referring to the Paris attacker as a 'mastermind' is only going to motivate others to achieve a similar reception

Don't just pray for Paris. Some countries cannot appease liberty, wounded security, and lives are always in the vicinity of death. worse ryt

5 Reasons You Shouldn't Cancel Your Trip to Paris

Lily Rose Depp's Friday Selfie From Paris is Perfect

#DNATesting France Prosecutor: Architect of Paris attacks killed in raid: Abdelhamid Abaaoud's body was identi

My prayers are for the tragedy in Kenya East Africa and Paris France. Pray for the peace of God to heal all their hearts.

Horrifying video shows woman saved by jammed gun as Paris killer attacks - Bills Insider (blog) #shows

great read on what tech platforms did to help - How Tech Learned From Past Crises And Reacted To The Paris Attacks

Milton's French school embraces peace, unity and creativity in their response to terrorist attacks in Paris.

Paris Attacks Catalyze #PeaceForParis Demonstration at the Albion College Rock

n my salute to ndtv for d coverage given to d brv soldier. other chnls swayed : paris- raga n sometimes indrani borawhat a pity.

Keogh using Paris tragedy as weapon of political fear mongering with which to attacks docs is a new low, even by your standards

NOW U SEE NBC HOW THEY REPORTIN PARIS ATTACKS THEY SHUT THEIR MOUTHES TO GET REPORTS LIKE THEY GOT NOW THEY KNO ITS GOIN DOWN

#EagleNews People will walk through #Haslemere tonight following Friday's Paris attacks

Watch the BUA Jazz Band's moving tribute to victims of the Paris attacks from this morning's All-School Meeting

The real reason why Turkey fans booed during minute's silence for Paris victims

ISIS Paris attackers training video?  via #parisattacks #isis #breaking #breakingnews

An excellent overview from The Economist: Paris: How to fight back  via

so who did daesh kill in paris

Why ISIS Wants the Paris Climate Talks to Fail  via

Paris Means We Have To Get Real About Jihadism  via

#ParisAttacks France says it never received information that attack mastermind Abaaoud was in the country : #ISIS

Moment of silence for Paris victims doesn't pass quietly - Allah hu Akbar and boos via /r/worldnews

tfw the paris review, an entity u love and adore, features an interview conducted by lena dunh4m,

previously been to Paris, Barcelona, Sheffield  Cardiff (pt of Europe!) and Tourism go to Jersey  Malta,

That dog is from Paris and you live in California you absolute toolbox.

Yeovil MP discusses last weekend's Paris attack and what our response should be to them.

Retweeted Trains Magazine US transit agencies respond to Paris attacks

Here's the Paris suicide bomber who killed Diesel the police dog  Nice pic! Everyone thinks they live in a rap video.

Abaaoud: Paris attacks ringleader whose family prayed he was dead: Even Abdelhamid Abaaoud's own family prayed

Watch: How a woman escaped death as gunman's AK-47 jams during Paris attacks: A gunman approached a woman at P

A couple on honeymoon in Paris captured 17 incredible images after the attacks.  via

Whoopi Goldberg on Syrian Refugee Crisis: 'Hitler Was a Christian'  #Paris #France #News

ISIS threatens Paris, Rome, U.S. in new video - This is at least the third ISIS video released since the Nov. 1

#Paris, #SyrianRefugees, #CharityProjects, #MedicalResearch, #Animals, #Environment Find out what you can do at  :)

She was very sexy in that period, not so after Paris x. #RIPDiana.

A stray bullet killed a man in his home during the Paris attacks at the Bataclan concert hall.

Paris Attax: A Milestone in European Unity  In just 1 century, the Battle of the Bulge is now the Battle of the Belge

PARENTING WITH PRESENCE author offers parents advice for talking w/ kids about the Paris attacks:

madrid was already attacked a few years ago with even more deaths than paris so spain is always at high level

This Paris thing gettin treated like 911 frfr

ISIS EXPLAINED - DAVID ICKE. #west created scam #Paris bombings 13/11/2015

An actual article in The Times just 3 days after Paris attacks. Just me or is this too soon? #Bataclan

Hi, did Jimmy acknowledge the Paris tragedy?

STORY OF SURVIVAL: Incredible moment woman survives Paris terror attack. WATCH:

suspect it must annoy Daesh when news drops Paris for Hotties

Paris Police Held Mass Shooting Training Exercise Hours Before Actual Attack

Vintage pictures show #Paris in 1923 alive with colour and progress  via

Video: Alleged Mastermind Of Paris Terrorist Attacks Was Killed In A Raid!  via

Whats the verdict on the #GroomingGuru's fun penguin pullover by for the #Paris fashion preview?

The Paris attacks have shifted the momentum in the privacy-surveillance debate - The Washington Post  | Bad news.

Open, honest, reflective: how teachers are handling questions about the Paris attacks | the Guardian Teacher Network

coverage of the Paris climate talks (#COP21) is summed up nicely here cool map

if  all the talk now is paris arent we where ISIS wants us?abandoning our way of life to fear!

Notes on the Paris Attack ~via WeeklyStandard

Sky News: Paris Plotter 'Drank And Smoked' After Attacks: A witness exclusively tells Sky News that Abdelhamid

Gavin McInnes: French treat Paris terror 'like train crash' Through source

Paris not committed by natives, some born there were not native but from north africa and at least one came as ref.

Not known if ringleader of Paris attack killed or 'blew himself up'  - whichever.thankfully he's gone #bbcnews

Here is another one, let me know! Paris Attack, Refugees, ISIS.  via

SICK! Watch: Thousands of Palestinians celebrate in the streets the attack in Paris  via

I understand that what happened in Paris was tragic, but we don't need to see every single piece of footage and analysis by experts

The trk387 channel stands in SOLIDARITY with the people of Paris and the WORLD! Time to ANNIHILATE these ear wigs! #ParisSiege

France killed the mastermind terrorist of Paris attacks, yet no French intellectual is calling it a Fake Encounter  crying buckets. Sad!

Barnabas Fund comment on the Paris atrocities via

World News: Paris 'ringleader' killed in raid: The man believed to have planned the attacks in Paris, Abdelham

PARIS - The Devil Made Me Do It

I Will be on 7.45 p.m. (Paris) to discuss the #ParisAttacks and #Hollande future meeting with #Obama

i was so happy to finally have the opportunity to see tha beast in Paris these awful events are really killing me, smhhh

Lenny Kravitz on Paris Bataclan Attack: 'It Could Happen Anywhere': Few modern musicians know P

Book Talk guest Lorin Stein editor The Paris Review

FPI will host a conference call on the Paris attacks and the global threat of terror at 11am EST tomorrow. RSVP:

What Paris needs is a masquerade party!

TBT - Because Paris is always a good idea, especially when put to music by Fred Astaire, Audrey Hepburn and Kay

Migrants Fear Paris Attacks Have Multiplied Their Woes: Refugees seeking shelter in Europe fear attacks in Paris have deepened their

Paris attacks: Derby County boss Paul Clement says terror attacks in French capital 'terribly sad'

jenny capri pike Other Plots Tied to Alleged Mastermind of Paris Attacks: Authorities believe  jenny capri pike

I liked a video  Introducing the ultra-high sensitivity 35mm full-frame CMOS sensor - Canon EXPO Paris

ClimateProgress:Senate Republicans Just Promised To Undermine The Paris Climate Negotiations

Here are the moderate peaceful Muslims not afraid to speak out on the jihadi attacks in Paris.

CDs have arrived from Paris today. Will be at Club 11am Sat. #launchday

Paris vs. Beirut: A Balanced Look at Why Our Solidarity is Lopsided:  There's been a lot of talk  #6thfan #WILL

I was truly shocked and saddened by the events in Paris, but this hit me very very hard today.

Paris attacks: France confirms death of Abdelhamid Abaaoud #terror  via

Suspected Mastermind of Paris Terror Attack Killed in Raid, French Prosecutor Says - Fox Nation

The owners of the Bataclan Theater Vow to Reopen the venue in spite of Paris Attacks. Read more -

Thanks Perciasepe  Diringer for gr8 states webinar on #paris #COP21 #subnationals

Learn how the Paris attacks are opening the debate on #cybersecurity and #cybersurveillance

Retweeted Mo Akram Muslims urged to stay at home as fire attack heightens fears of Paris backlash

[VIDEO] REPORT: French National Assembly extends state of emergency | #France #Paris

Tragedy in Paris: A More Compassionate Approach to Refugees Will Make us all Safer: It's less than a week sinc

G7 Ministers Set To Get Tough on Virtual Currencies and FinTech after Paris Attacks -

Trump Goes OFF On The Paris Terrorists and Syrian Refugees in Worcester - WATCH IT HERE!  via trumpstump2016

So much love for Paris France

Aww cosy in bed watching Passport to Paris. Forgot how good Mary Kate n Ashley Olsen movies were

Cuestionan a servicios secretos franceses x atentados:How French intelligence agencies failed before Paris attacks

It's events like the Paris attacks that bring out the true colors of presidential candidates  I just urge you all to think before you vote

Paris Attack: Travel in the Face of Terrorism  via

Terrorists who were EU nationals attack ParisAmerica stops taking in refugees #logic

Paris Widower Reads Out Defiant Letter To ISIS  via

Dealing with the GOP before the Paris climate summit is really infuriating

Paris was horrific. Paris hurt the world. But has been totem pole covering 24/7 for a week. There is OTHER news.

#USA #US The Taliban approves of Paris suicide assault: While western officials still seek to negotiate   #Cuba

Statement on G20 and the Paris attacks: 17 November 2015 - News from Parliament - UK Parliament  via UKParliament

An Open Letter to John Kerry - At the American embassy in Paris this week, U.S. Secretary of State John Kerry s

Even if I wasn't gay I'd have a crush on you; love your head and heart for that Paris vlog

Really? He's protected us pretty well, to this point, wouldn't you say? No 9/11 or Paris style incidents no?

I read that article 3 times and I'm still confused. Why would you want NY to look like Paris? Paris is horrible to navigate.

France is bombing Syria in retaliation for theParis attacks.But are they targeting ISIS?Nope! ..kiling innocents.Where is the media?

Paris 2015: When an Historic Climate Change Agreement Isn't Enough - Huffington Post: Huffington PostParis 201

A thank you to and whose work covering the fallout of the Paris murders at has been remarkable.

There is much talk of the Paris attacks, of Palestine, of Syria, when is the Left going to say enough is fucking enough,

Many cancellations at Chateauform for the last 5 days around Paris !  The seminar industry in Paris is hit by the terrorism attacks,

Has O blamed the Paris attack on the lack of gun control in France?  Wait..  No, I think he blamed the R's

My Beirut worriers stopped giving a damn about Beirut, Paris, or even Nigeria. So I guess we're back to only safely caring about ourselves

#happy #beautiful AMMAN, Jordan -- The recent barbaric violence in Paris claimed victims in France, but also b

thought these were great. Guy on Facebook adidas de ja vu made them after the #ParisAttacks attacks

WOW! Rand Paul just lied on air about National Security surveillance to avoid looking bad by changing his opinion after Paris. Sad.

Another act of cowardice by ISIS #I stand with Paris

Praying for #ClimateChange ahead of Paris #COP21. Join the prayer chain. Learn more here:

#HuffPo The Response Paris Deserves: a Marshall Plan for Re  |

OUTRAGED Paris Muslim leader backs military action in Syria: Expressing outrage at ISIS' perversion  (Via

Like the Paris terrorists where using Russian guns and no one is questioning Russia. They are just bombing Muslims. Lol.

Flemingdon + Thorncliffe communities to hold peace march. Marchers uniting against bigotry, violence, Paris attacks.

bringing some back from Paris was an epic decision on mum's part!! Get some at the weekend!

Marching matters ahead of the Paris climate talks by  via #ClimateMarch

Paris was on lockdown for 3 DAYS. Is a concert full of people after such an attack a great idea? No.Neither was your article.

Info4u: Paris attacks: French National anthem will be sang

ONE TERRORIST IN PARIS ATTACK WAS IN COL . WHAT WAS HIM DOING? WHAT DID THE COL GOVMNT  WHY WAS HIM HELP WITH FALSE DOCUMENTS?

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, Suspected Mastermind Behind #Paris Attacks, Is Reported Dead

EU security measures up for debate in wake of Paris attacks: France and Belgium will urge their Europe  #foxreg

Except the Jews didn't blow up world trade centre or blow up Paris last week.

pretty glaring omissions from this list of countries. 8 people did paris, 2 did boston. still talking millions of supporters

the 6/1 for trip to paris in the japan cup is the filthiest price i have seen since the 16s war envoy for the breeders cup dirt mile

Impossible to understand why.., #ParisAttacks Brother of victims in Paris attacks: 'Everyone was dead'

i think i love paris more than life itself

i don't even want to imagine what my life would be like without paris

Hello Paris I am human before to be Muslim

Forgot to mention, after the attack in Paris on Friday I got this rare calling card on the Saturday, illuminati??

#DerechosDeCuba Cuba Elected Member of UNESCO's World Heritage Committee: Paris, November 19

5 of the best responses to Islamophobic bigotry after the Paris attacks

Iran #News International condemnation of #paris attacks continue

#Russia admitted it was a terrorist attack well after #ParisAttacks, when it became safe for public opinion at home

Bootie Samples: A Tribute To Paris Through Daft Punk  #wtf #news #tv #fun #funny

Walking along the Siene. Some more pics from Paris. France

Paris three days after the attacks: State of emergency, profiteers and confusions - WRITTEN BY JOHN MULLEN

One nasty piece of CRAP!Photo of the person (will not say woman) who killed Police Officer Diesel in Paris.

#Paris, beloved city to writers, a muse and an inspiration, we are with you. #NousSommesAvecVous

Brussels area linked to Paris attacks rallies to shake off stigma  via

Refugees seeking shelter in Europe fear attacks in Paris have deepened their predicament: Serbia, Croatia, Slo

LIVE on #Periscope: Paris, sunset, clouds, what a view

#MYWORLDTOUR2017 I need you in Paris : after January 2016.. And In Macedonia : on summer 2016 orr the summer 2017.. PLEASE BBY

Follow the Monitor's coverage of Paris climate talks here!

#Cutting #carbon #emissions: The #Paris climate-change conference needs to be more ambitious

Paris Terrorism Suspect Confirmed Dead After Police Raid

Death of Paris Attack Ringleader Underscores Security Flaws in Europe: The world can breathe a  #tcot #teaparty

The Pain Of Being Different: The Aftermath Of The Paris Attacks Brings Back Old Nightmares: I

Paris sure Moscow will join against ISIS  Via

why? because Paris. Nigeria.. that's why. #WhatsEquality?

Dont Pray for Nigeria, Don't pray for Paris, PRAY FOR THE WORLD as a WHOLE

RT  Paris attacks suspected mastermind killed in Saint-Denis raids - Toronto Star

HAVE YOU BEEN FOLLOWING THE PARIS ATTACKS?  ALLOW THE SYRIAN REFUGEES COME LIVE WITH YOU.

#Muslims in #Paris suburbs fear and loathe ISIS, too: Keith Boag

#India #Muslims Muslim organisations condemn terrorist massacre in Paris: The Conference   #IndianMuslims #News

Paris attacks | Holiday spending | Financial planning

How to Do Paris for a Week for Less than $1,000 (and that includes airfare!) -

Astonishingly, tropical forests might go unmentioned in the text of the Paris climate agreement  #COP21 #REDD+

Dear The Paris false flag still went ahead for the #agenda #Auspol #Ausvotes

Facebook has been just plain nasty since the Paris attacks so I've been avoiding it

Turkeys ambassador to Poland sees hypocrisy in mourning for Paris victims of terrorism:   #mcgnews

This is the Paris suicide bomber who killed Diesel the police dog  via  Again, very proud of you Diesel! RIP

Why do Nigerian's love cheap fame?? #EverybodyIs DoingHelloCover and #EverybodyIs Using Paris flag on their DP Smh

Interesting read on a French woman's decision to not change her Facebook profile pic after Paris attacks. #MCOM241

some Journalists who's in Paris said that, I can't recall his name

Hi you're journalist, but you weren't aware about the Paris Attacks ?Aren't you ashamed ?#StupidJournalist

Rand Paul: 'Bulls**t' to ramp up NSA surveillance post-Paris | TheHill

Woman Who Died in Paris Raid Had Been Under Surveillance  ABC News: Top Stories  #ZOLW

Possible scenarios for refugees post Paris attacks. Analysis by

FBI: No link between Paris attackers and U.S.  via Did you expect to hear the truth? They're being PC.

#Dissent Headlines for November 19, 2015: French Authorities Say Alleged Mastermind Behind Paris Atta  #Anarchy

yes I was In Paris this last July. I love that city

latest news from France The suspected ringleader of the Paris attacks, Abdelhamid Abaaoud, was among those killed

Alone in Paris airport , thirsty and cold ! please !

Just finished recording in London on Paris attacks. A crowded, intense six-person panel. Tried to get a word or two on :-)

#paris is sad but we must remember that the USA was at war with the Middle East before ISIS was at war with the US #UniteBlue #tcot

To give someone a piece of your heart, is worth more than all the wealth in the world #MichaelJackson #paris

Pics Of Paris Female Suicide Bomber

You must see this interview with head of Paris Mosque. Why there aren't mass protests by Muslims.

Heard your interview on Democracy Now re Paris attacks. Thank you for keeping real investigative journalism alive.

As we've seen from ISIS slaughter on Paris, FRANCE could use huge amounts of xenophobia. Along w/Obama's America.

MT  DC Mayor Bowser meant to thank Ohio kids for coming 2 visit DC, despite ISIS threat, in wake of Paris attacks

#CTOsint The Attacks on Paris: Understanding Terrorism, Its Origins, and Future Implications: Walsh  #terrorism

Paris police just took her mother and brother into custody.

Oh Russell you are fantastic. Well said on your comments about the attack in Paris.

BBC Alert! VIDEO: Paris raid woman 'was vulnerable'  #News

Inside look at Paris community targeted in anti-terror raid  via

Inside Paris Photo: The Art Fair Almost No One Saw for

Blindfolded Muslim Man Offers Hugs In #Paris

Really helpful advice from on how to talk to kids about #Paris

Alden Mills, a former Navy SEAL On Talking To Kids About The Paris Attacks

Read piece in on how #Paris  #Sinjar are creating opportunities for a U.S. shift in momentum

Paris Attacks Hit Luxury Hotels Particularly Hard: Executives in the hospitality industry are taking st  ((NYT)

Dalhousie medical student to attend climate-change summit in Paris - The Globe and Mail

ITV News has been brilliant tonight. Powerful on both the Paris and Yvonne Fletcher stories.

Paris terrorist attacks have put police  resourcing right back at the top of the political agenda. #cutsdontwork

Your expert is supporting my point re: media focus. Let's change the channel on Paris, ISIS, refugees #cdnpoli #pnpcbc

This couple renewed their vows in Paris hours before the terrorist attacks. Hear from them up next on at 5:30.

#Encrypted #Messaging Apps Face New Scrutiny Over Possible Role in #Paris Attacks

#FutureWorldNews 'There's A Whole Other Hole': American Filmmaker Reflects On Loss In Paris  Follow KevinFitts

Those who attacked Paris were all European natives. These people are fleeing for their lives to escape terrorism.

DTN Thailand: 5 holy leaders pay respects to Paris victims: Leaders of the five major religious groups in Thai

To put it bluntly, does Paris help Christie?

France has already captured or killed almost all of the ISIS terrorists who attacked Paris  via

DTN Italy: Stories of those who died in the Paris attacks: They were artists and students, music lovers, paren

MarkWarner Saw your interview need to write new bill reinstating visas to enter US could be revisited every two years for review.#Paris

Tune into at 6 to hear Canadian Muslim federation speak out against . Muslim hate crimes. Did I miss the presser on Paris?

Pray for Paris and Paris family's . It is so sad

'Blood will flow' ISIS sympathiser threatens London with copycat Paris attack NEXT WEEK

It brings up Paris as OpenSkies is a subsidiary of British Airways. ^Ashleigh

Especially after what happened in Paris. I don't think this is a time to be taking people in. Too high risk for out country

The Paris attacks are making Donald Trump 'stronger'

At the Paris airport, playing piano during the 4 hour layover. People stopping, taking pics, giving some love back.

Pray for Paris  LE CLIP  via #prayforparis

Encouraged by taking time tomorrow morning with all students to be still and silent for Paris. We have many decent human beings

New image of only surviving member of Paris terrorist cell #ParisAttacks WANTED by Police

DTN Japan: BOJ Kuroda sees limited impact of Paris terror attacks for now: Bank of Japan Governor Haruhiko Kur

Judges give award to Paris attack victim without knowing he was killed

Ask yourself if the Paris attackers would have agreed or disagreed with THIS Mehdi Hasan speech, then RT:  #bbcqt

One of the things to absolutely visit in #Paris is the Pasteur Museum - #FHL15

CDR Salamander:  and then there was Paris Note tweet locations below this article. Invasion is well established.

dude WV isn't Paris. What is wrong with you?

#information Judges give award to Paris attack victim without knowing he was killed: Fabrice D  #mashable #news

On a 73 bus back home to Hoxton. Some bloke has thrown out a discarded rucksack off the bus. Everyone seems nervous post Paris attacks

What a joke  New advice on what to do in a Paris-style gun attack  via

In memoriam of the victim of Paris' terror attacks 2015-11-13   Prayers, just prayers now.

This Dog Lost His Life In Paris. Now The World Is Saluting Him In A Very Special Way

hey you look too pretty Alessandra :) I wish I was in Paris too. Would really love to meet with you :)

US news media in France, go home already. You only went there b/c it's beautiful Paris. You didn't go to Beirut after they were attacked.

An American in Paris (DVD, 2008, 2-Disc Set, Special Edition)

Just in: manhunt for missing Paris attacker #AbdeslamSalah extended to the Netherlands, net widens #ParisAttacks

New story: Discarded cell phone led to Paris attacks ringleader  #wral

Bill Clinton says 'Make something good happen' after ISIS Paris attacks. Donate To My Scam, Eh, Charity -

Fabrice Dubois died last Friday after gunmen stormed a concert in Paris. On Tuesday, he received one of the mo

#Snowden has been silent since Paris Attack. Now would be time to really debate Security vs Privacy when ppl are scared

Paris, Sunday. People gathered to watch the sun go down over the city.

Thankyou .. How can refugees be the issue if all the Paris attackers were European Citizens?!

ANYTHING to not talk about Paris, huh?  Or ISIS claim, mentioning allah 14 times?

Sir Bernard Hogan-Howe warned last week cuts could compromise anti-terror policing. Now, after Paris, a new warning.

As a EM, Hosp bed count inportant Paris hospitals in state of emergency following terrorist attacks  via #em365

I was being sarcastic, regarding them requiring more surveilance to prevent attacks, since it was useless in Paris attacks. :)

Is Islamic State actually a state? on implications for responding to Paris attack

preferred to waste tax payers $$ to fund Gitmo but refused to help low income families on wage incr. Paris attack can be blamed on

'Eighth' Paris attacker Salah Abdeslam could be on the run from Daesh. Petty criminals. Idiots.

Satanic Temple Offers Help To Muslims In Wake Of Paris Terrorism: The Satanic Temple, an organization that adv

Self-order screens at in Paris are, as Donald Trump might say, H-U-G-E.

I can't stand all these hypocrites that come out everytime there's a tragedy like in Paris

what does bitcoin have to do with the paris attacks?

Absolutely.  Rmember the Paris Riots of years back?  Same guys.  Same District.

FBI director: No credible threat to US after Paris attacks

No 'Credible' Threat to US of Paris-Style Attack: FBI  via

REFLECTION #arsenalfc Arsene Wenger talks about the incidents in Paris #gunners  via

Chat App Telegram Grapples with Censorship Post-Paris  via

Obama Launches New Hashtag Campaign, Victims of Paris Attack Are Horrified by  Infantile Response

NYT- Paris Victim Nohemi Gonzalez Was Pursuing Her Dreams in Design: Nohemi Gonzalez, a student from Californi

#cccic panel on how the Paris UN Climate Change Conference: implementation and commitment are the usual questions for #climatechange

Governments are shameless in their attempts to justify surveillance even using the Paris deaths.

READ: Powerful Message to ISIS from Paris Victim's Husband Goes Viral

One thing we've learnt from these Paris attacks, extremists don't go to the mosque.

With all this news of Syria and Paris, I've realized how different my political views are from my mother's. This is frustrating.

Most people murdered in Paris were liberal  And still blamed themselves

News from Rubio Chooses Fundraisers Over Classified Paris ISIS Briefings  via

Personal opinion, I think 9/11 had an impact on the peace process here, decommissioning etc. Like to see Paris turn ppl away from dissidents

Paris attacks at a glance: Thursday's developments  Woman blowing herself up for Islam is idiotic lunacy

Video shows woman's lucky escape from gunman during Paris attacks: Doug G. WarePARIS, Nov. 19 (UPI) -- Surveil

A brilliant opening to #bbctw in the week following the attacks in Paris.

Ringleader of Paris attacks killed in raid(Sent from WWL TV)

Paris attacks: Key questions after Abaaoud killed - BBC News

the paris attackers weren't refugees or muslims. They were Belgian and European. Nice try tho

Operation Gladio B in Paris  False Flags Don't Fly

Happy birthday to one of the brightest and most beautiful women I've ever had the pleasure of knowing! :) enjoy Paris!!

I saw that some Muslim folks, including refugees, in Paris giving out free hugs and even blindfolding themselves for free hugs. I cried

Video shows woman's lucky escape from gunman during Paris attacks  via

Vigil helps Maryville College exchange student mourn Paris attacks - YouTube

Paris climate talks: #Russia will use its huge #forests as a bargaining chip  via#climatesummit

#GodsPraiseRoom The Paris attacks have been horrendous to say the very least - lets pray for them right now

The Paris Attacks Were An Intelligence Community Failure, Not An 'Encryption' Problem: submitt  #NewsNuus #tech

Reuters: 'Spider in web' mastermind of Paris attacks killed in raid

Alleged mastermind of Paris attacks was disowned by family in Belgium  #Globe #Mail #news

Paris Victim Nohemi Gonzalez Was Pursuing Her Dreams in Design: Nohemi Gonzalez, a student from Califor  #world

Several Paris attackers were on U.S. watchlists: officials  via REUTERS

Free Digital Stamp  Paris  - 2 Cute Ink Digital Stamps and More

The New York Times: Top Suspect in Paris Attacks, Abdelhamid Abaaoud, Confirmed Dead

Paris Attacks : French National Anthem Will Be Sang By All Premier League Clubs This Weekend: English clubs wi

WATCH: More poignant social media reactions to Paris attacks - CJAD #social

General Wesley Clark tells of how Middle East destabilization was planned  #Syria #Paris

Rand Paul: It's 'bulls--t' to collect phone records after #Paris attacks  #surveillance #privacy #parisattacks #gop

#ABCNews Dozens Under Watch in the US to Guard Against Paris Copycat Attack: Officials are staying on to  #News

Paris attacks were done by Belgium citizen living in Paris.

Vitter Wants Louisiana Voters to Think of Paris, Not Scandal: Republican uses terror images to foil attacks by

The fact that one of the Islamic terrorists in Paris yelled this is for Syria indicates there could be more of them

Is it me or is engine 73 just going back-and-forth up-and-down meridian go go central Paris fire

Paris attacks: Premier League criticised for not playing national anthems of other countries targeted by terror

Terrible events in Paris the last week.

mt Striking how little impact the fact Paris attackers were neither Syrian nor refugees is having on the Syrian refugee debate

I challenge a journo to ask Dutton if he thinks the people on the boat are connected to Paris, just to see how he runs with it. #auspol

The Dalai Lama Discourages Everyone To Pray For Paris? Terror Attacks Mastermind Killed?: While mos  #Kpopstarz

Paris attacks at a glance: Thursday's developments So she was killed who fucking cares? She's dead.

Why can't  we look at Sweden, Germany, Paris as an example.these immigrants are turning on the communities..!!

Their all in cahoots, Clinton investigation, obama refugee rush, paris attacks, panicking over TRUMP. CAHOOTS

Carson  GOP ignore that Paris terrorists all held EU passports. ISIS would come here as tourists, not as refugees!

Paris attacks aftermath and doctors walkout: The aftermath of the Paris attacks stays o

TopNews: 'Spider in web' mastermind of Paris attacks killed in raid

Yes, we're all concerned about Paris but why are people putting the flag on their selfies? You look fucking stupid!

[b0t] Tech goliaths stand firm against demands for weaker encryption after Paris terror attacks

Police officers have broken down doors in towns and villages from Paris to Brussels in more than 600

VIDEO: Paris raid woman 'was vulnerable' (BBC)  (1717 GMT)

I think Paris attacks  Syrian refugee crisis has really shown what countries are failing in empathy to others #globaledchat

Should Americans fear an attack like Paris?

why are you spotlighting the first female suicide bomber in Paris? Focus on the survivors. Stop giving the murderers the attention.

The world loves Paris. Paris belongs to the world. Because it does, the attacks in Paris are personal.

To anyone who thinks shutting out Syrian refugees is a good idea in the light of the Paris attacks: Are you actually fucking stupid?

But ppl wanna put up the french flag cause its pretty likkle paris, ahh man

The New News: Start Worrying: Trump Sees New Surge of Support After Paris Attacks  #news

Remember the Paris of your dreams, urges, not last Friday's nightmares:

BBC News - Paris attacks: France calls on EU to 'wake up' to threat  UK MUST LEAVE EU MORE LIKE EVEN MORE SO NOW

'Spider in web' mastermind of Paris attacks killed {cnbc}

NEW CONTENT ALERT Our own Teen Queen from Texas, Serena Paris, keeps her chin up no matter what life throws at

Read Anne-Marie's thoughts on Paris attacks.

Top story: Several Paris attackers were on U.S. watchlists: officials| Reuters  see more

#refugeeswelcome  Hey assholes who want to turn away refugees,if Paris can  take them in after what they've been through.you have no excuse

The Paris Attacks Were An Intelligence Community Failure, Not An 'Encryption' Problem | Techdirt

#Latest_News No credible threat of Paris-type terror attack in the US: FBI: There is no credible t  #World_News

International Business TimesParis Attacker Traveled Through Latin America In July

Pretty sure Lady Liberty came from France, and is bowing her head  crying due to massacres in Paris!

White House: 'Sense of urgency' after Paris attacks -

Dirt bags /: relating a travesty like the Paris incident to your cause to try and prove a point

PARIS WAS ATTACKED AND IS TAKING IN 30,000 SYRIAN REFUGEES YET REPUBLICANS ARE TO RACIST TO TAKE 10.

Definitely in Paris. Its the first time I have ever enjoyed being disappointed with the French.

attack on Paris, scared public scapegoats refugees/ Islam. How convenient for western govs to close borders, shirk obligations.

Paris Victim Nohemi Gonzalez Was Pursuing Her Dreams in Design, via

seriously. We don't need fireworks, in November, in the rain, after Paris.

Photos: Initial footage of Paris assaults demonstrates diners diving for protect as  -

I don't think we fully realize the extent of the implications with the decisions made in the Paris situation right now??

Land Destroyer West Leverages Paris Attacks 4 Syria Endgame

No AUMF. No migration reform. But it took 48 hours for the House to target refugees fleeing from the same terrorism that struck Paris.

Hollande: Paris Terror Attacks an 'Act  #a #france #islamicstate #newyork #paris

That was quick. Maybe cos in Paris, it's a 'police raid' while in India, it'd be a 'fake encounter'.

Killings in Paris, Beirut mean West must unite to confront terror group

Telegram founder knew ISIS was using his service before Paris attacks  via

BSGN Metallica pay tribute to music man killed in Paris attacks: Rockers Metallica have joined Justin Bieber a

My dad told me the hotel he stayed at in Paris 3 days before the attacks was across the street from the cafe..don't take anyone for granted

10% Off- Paris France Eiffel Tower - Shower Curtain Bathroom..  #paintingoftheday #Artwit

Latest From The Net Telegram founder knew ISIS was using his service before Paris attacks

Paris Gellar grew up to be a serial killer. I feel like this totally fits her writing on Gilmore Girls.

Not enough gommint cheese in the world to convince me ISIS attacked Paris. It was Jehovah's Witnesses TK

#Culepio_Culepio Blindfolded Muslim man offers hugs: A Muslim man offers hugs to mourners at a Paris attacks v

Islamic scholar Fethullah Gulen of Saylorsburg condemns Paris attacks  via poconorecord

FBI Director: No Credible Threat To US After Paris Attacks(Sent from CNR)

Europe's Schengen zone called into question after Paris attacks and as refugee influx continues via /r/worldnews

CNN RSS: Why ISIS won't derail Paris climate talks  via cnnbrk cnn Retweet

Paris attacks organizer killed in police raid

With Paris, ISIS Has Declared War on Us. H  via Easily |

Slain Paris plotter's Europe ties facilitated travel from Syria

or like the moderate Muslims who couldn't tolerate a moment of silence for the Paris victims ?

Video: Paris attacks through the eyes of a child   via

Thanks TO CNN Blindfolded Muslim man asks for hugs - A Muslim man offers hugs to mourners at a Paris attacks vi

How many retweets can we get for this police dog who died bringing Paris terrorists to justiceS.J. Francis

What were the Paris terrorists planning next? Police have uncovered their next targets

RelaxInParis: Mindy_Trammell: Goodbye Paris, we had a lovely time! #europe2015 #iheartparis #eiffeltower

#Paris #stocks: Jacquet Metals : #Merger #Acquisition Analysts say: flabby Nov 2015 growth  profits.  #MRX

built a separate site just for coverage of the Paris climate talks:  #COP21

Want a cheap vacation? Pick Paris for summer 2016! Or London, Rome, Stockholm. No one else is going. #svpol #migpol #paris #terroristattack

Should #Paris attackers who were captured be allowed to live in the comfort of prison, or killed like their victims?

If the #PatriotAct terror reaches my homeland German Jesuits will start to die too. #Paris

I added a video to a playlist  The Paris Attacks  Illuminati Rituals For Lucifer (2015)

#topnews After Paris carnage, France fears chemical, biological weapons attack: French Prime Minister Manuel V

Blindfolded Muslim man in center of mourning Paris crowd asks people if they trust him, while giving out hugs.

Trump rises in wake of Paris attacks  ..GOPe must be furiousalong with Megyn Kelly.

Team Lisa,We are thrilled to let you know that Lisa will return home from Paris within the

NRA CEO did not cooperate with and assist FBI in any matter concerning ISIS in Paris attacks.

European Borders May be Redrawn as Europe Embraces Nationalism: In the wake of the Paris attacks,  #trueanarchy

A-H Divergence Continues; Trade Directly In A-Shares: The terrorist attacks in Paris stunned the world. Terror

#USAnews #USnews Woman who died in Paris raid had been under surveillance: Hasna Aitboulahcen lived a secular

SHARE! Muslims On Twitter Speak Out AGAINST Paris Terrorist Attacks  via

What's wrong with straights in Paris? Death-wish?

traumcenter.de Chilling video: Paris attacker aims at woman, gun misfires:   004917641659029

It took an attack in Paris for the world to learn about the bombing in Beirut.

Suspected mastermind of Paris attacks killed in raid: The suspected Islamic State mastermind of the Paris atta

Google to Label Ad-Supported Apps in Play Store  #Paris #France #News

#FutureWorldNews After Paris, Islamophobia Is on the Rise  Follow KevinFitts

From exhibit at MaisonObjet in Paris to Manila city Philippine .Weave ,Ripples and Curve collection was

Retweeted Agence France-Presse British police still shun guns despite Paris attacks

Paris attacks: French National anthem to be sang by all Premier League clubs: English clubs will sing the Fren

May God grant the family of all those lost in the Kano, Yola and Paris incidents the fortitude to bear the loss.#NoToTerror #WorldPeace

'We're off, it's started' SMS led police to terror boss in Paris

#COP21 climate marches in Paris not authorised following attacks, safety first

New details about female suspect in Paris attacks; chilling new threats aimed at the United States.  #abckiek

Take time to watch this: Father  Son have the most precious conversation about Paris attacks Le Petit Journal

Victims of the Paris attacks came from 19 countries. Nohemi was a first-generation (cont)

#tcot #pjnet Ted Cruz's Security Misstep - After the Paris terror attacks, do voters want a candidate who oppos

Luxury hotel in #Paris sees nearly 50% of bookings cancelled after #ParisAttacks

All this shit in Paris really got me paranoid. I shouldn't have to pray before stepping foot in the city

On air #newsday a week on from #parisattacks  how does daily life carry on in Paris ?

Palestinian Journalism Student Falsely Identified as Paris Attacker  THIS is not surprising. Same happened on 9.11.

Paris Killers 'Used Refugee Crisis To Slip In' - Sky News

Playing Politics with Compassion after the Paris Attacks  via / #ParisAttacks

There's a town called Paris in Texas! Palestine, Athens, too!

Post Paris attacks, France urges UN to give 'strong, united and unambiguous  - Firstpost  UK

My aim, my dream to go Paris:')

CeeJay: 2B9483E0 ATTACKERS Abaaoud killed; Paris returns to cafes: A week after terrorist att  CeeJay: 2B9483E0

Your solled emotion ! Yesterday ISIS atacked Turkmen mountain. Come on ! Always Paris? Go off with your LOVELY paris!

TO THE VIOLENT ATTACKS SUCH AS THOSE IN PARIS. PLEASE DO NOT EXPOSE OUR CHILDREN,WOMEN,MEN TO SUCH DANGER. I READ (NEXT)

are you still friends with Paris Hilton

My aunt was about to take a trip to Paris

PlanQ #Dating : bluebirdd, 24 ans | Paris 12 - France :

REAL LIFE HERO: 'Spider in web' mastermind of Paris attacks killed in raid: PARIS (Reuters  #evesham #littleton

Retweeted Djibouti Voices Paris and Djibouti squabbling -

exactly. Paris is the future unless there is a reassertion of national sovereignty and borders.

No shit Sherlock.Refugee or Terrorist ? Can Europe afford to take the chance? #Paris #refugeeswelcome #safety1st

After 7 the thoughts of 12 year old Mohamed on last week's attacks in #Paris

Pakistani director of Paris video 'humbled' by viral response: ISLAMABAD (AFP) - The Pakistani director behind

#Wanderers coach Andres Carrasco turned down Paris Saint Germain for Parramatta

not just this; in the aftermath of Paris attacks, expect NSA to get their surveillance bill passed!

It's not just Paris, people. The whole earth has always been in danger. #PrayForTheWorld #PrayForSyria #PrayForLebanon #pray

#pakistan Tv Nerves fray across Europe after Paris carnage

Paris attack terrorists used refugee chaos to enter France, says PM Valls: Some of the suspects in the Paris a

Persistent long periods of rainfall  today in Paris/French !

Beauty Care : new SISLEY-PARIS Self-Tanning Hydrating Body Skin Care - 5 oz  #Deals #6272

Family of Paris terror attack mastermind says he should have been burnt to death..

How French football will react to to Paris attacks - Ligue 1 Talking Points: Last weekend's grim events contin

The Hall of Mirrors at Paris showcases more than just the bottles. Read more at

On the run from #Isis: #Jihadists 'targeting  #Paris attacker for chickening out of killings'

Tributes paid to heroic police dog who died during Paris raids

Great night adl event at  Paris hotel

Andrew Neil with a message for the Paris attackers

Finding an apartment in Paris for 2-4 people is way way easier than finding one for 7 people.

The Paris attacks make climate protests more important than ever - The Ecologist

nikamhrazyn1: How to tackle #Islamic extremism, the root of the #Paris #attacks

CM Rawat should further clarify that where should such offenders go- Pakistan, Paris or Syria ?

The man who masterminded the Paris attacks was allegedly seen on the streets of Paris, smoking cannabis and

Exactly how I feel abt being late to moment of silence for Paris This man represents us to the world??

Andrew Neil denounces Paris terrorists as 'Islamist scumbags'

Paris attacks: Police warn of EU border failures - as it happened on Thursday Nov 19

Female suicide bomber in her final words. Was cousin of mastermind behind Paris attack.

in light of the Paris attacks  further threats, police budget cuts cannot  must not happen

Leaders having meetings in Brussels re security. How many more meetings do they need? We want ACTION not MEETINGS, shut the borders #Paris

Paris Killers 'Used Refugee Crisis To Slip In' | Clyde 1

Chelsea to increase stadium security, pay tribute to victims of Paris attacks on Saturday  via

WATCH THIS.. THEY PLANNED THE PARIS ATTACK .. THEY'RE PLANNING EVERYTHING NUKES ARE COMING THE WORLD IS ENDING

#PanjiXP1 SEARCH A key suspect still at large: A key suspect in last week's Paris terror attacks remained at l

Demand world leaders sign a strong agreement at the Paris climate negotiations - Add your voice here! #earthpride

User Experience Designer - FASTBOOKING (Paris)  #job #ux #emploi

Paris attacks reenergize mobile phone encryption argument #InfoSecPeople

Twitter call for Parisians to make 'noise and light' at 21:20 to mark exactly one week since the Paris attacks

brand and guidlines a front for cia control of media false flag paris attack set up by dsge and mossad no deaths occured lies all

I don't hear anyone in MSM discussing where the weapons and explosives came from for the #Paris attack #FunnyThat

We Rejoice With The News That He Is Dead, He Should Have Even Been Burnt To Death~Family Of Paris Terror Mastermind

I just pray that this will not turn into another Paris experience of last week pls they pple concerned should do something fast pls

Here's another idea, bring Paris to your house this Christmas visit  for more information.

French PM: Paris attackers exploited migrant crisis to 'slip in'  via

#Mali #Bamako 5 people the death has terrorist attack 170 people all to hostage you don't see #ParisAttacks

RT: :Abaaoud caught on Paris metro CCTV as attacks went on - source:

I am so glad he and his cousin are dead nothing they did in Paris was in God's name they were just murder's go away ISIL Deasch

Snijdthout:  EXCLUSIVE: #Paris terror plot: extremist employees of Air #France had access to runway

Please click d link below,scroll 2 d bottomvote He Was A Threat#Paris #EtisalatPrizeforLiterature #retweet

Paris returns to cafes as hunt   via #igorna5cimento |

Those in Paris attacks face long, arduous battles to recover from physical, mental wounds: PARIS  #ParisAttacks

Sorry to hear that! We can send Paris to you :) Visit  for more information

'It's happening again': 170 people now being held hostage by two attackers in Mali luxury hotel: #tcot  #paris #news

NEW POST: Following the tragic events in #Paris a week ago, we've decided to celebrate this wonderful city  #fblogger

Segregation in numbers: Cheaper rents 10km from Paris center than 10km from Berlin center.

Hillary Clinton Unveils Post-Paris Anti-Terrorism Plan | Observer  #US #twitterkurds #Turkey

#France #PoliceJudiciare find third body inside blown up raided apartment in #StDenis #Paris. Forensic investigations underway to identify

AP: The Latest on Paris attacks: Third body found at scene of raid in Paris suburb:

Paris attacks at a glance: Friday's developments - CNN: CNNParis attacks at a glance: Friday's d  #6thfan #WILL

Paris ! Sunset ! Amour !  Eiffel I LOVE.photo/ (france)

Are u having a laugh with the traffic this morning 3 hours it has taken me to get to school, I could go to Paris n back in that fucking time

Shot Aussie Emma tells of terrifying night in Paris theatre attack:  #ParisAttacks

While we deal with the attacks in Paris, others have been attacked too! #PrayForMali #PrayForParis #PrayForBeirut

Third body found after raid on Paris apartment: A third body has been found in an apartment raided by police s

Hostage situation in #Mali just a week on from Paris attacks?! What the hell is going on.

Could this be an #ISIS attack targeting French nationals?#MaliAttacks #ParisAttacks

Discarded cellphone led to raid that took out Paris ringleader | The Chronicle Herald  via

World can do without social media cynicism over support for Paris ISIS attacks

I'm sure that the people in the restaurants and concert venue in Paris didn't think they would be attacked. It could be anywhere. #enfield

#EU plans crackdown on #Bitcoin, #Gold and other anonymous online payment methods after Paris  via

#Iran #News Iranian Revolutionary Guards, #IRGC, attacks popular social #media   #Paris #UNGA

this Chris idiot is jerking off to terrorist holding hostages in Mali and the Paris attacks. #typical Dem idiot

Paris And The Ugly Truth Of State Terror

Paris victims: Their stories - USA TODAY

Third body found at scene of raid in Paris suburb  #today

'A Christmas Season in France' with le Calabash in the Loire Valley and Paris is a Culinary Adventure for all

Guarantee the media coverage will be significantly smaller than the Paris attacks. Because white people.

Our hearts go out to Paris. Our thoughts go to those who lost their loved ones. Love is stronger than hate.

Russia's anti-terror cooperation may lead to easing of Western sanctions:  The Paris attacks and the downing o

Morocco: Moroccan Intelligence Led French Police to Paris Attackers' Hideout  #Africa via

OFFEN - Paris SG - Feyenoord | Soccer-Revolution

Politics of surveillance shifting after Paris attacks?  #news

#Pakistan director of #Paris video 'humbled' by viral response#PrayForParis #ParisAttacks

Friday is Allah hu Akbar day.#Paris #Mali But Terrorism has No Religion.

Paris needs to enable a solidarity pact around #resilience, writes  via #COP21

Muslim employee who saved lives at Paris grocery granted citizenship  via | Someone cc Marine Le Pen

Hypothetical. If the we didn't allow Steve Job's Syrian dad to enter the US, would Apple be known as Pomme located in Paris?

In the new YOU: The darkness that hit #Paris is still being felt all over the world

Tensions running high in Paris but city refuses to cave to hatred

Terror Attacks in France. Cui bono? US led Coalition Supports Terrorism  #paris #attack

Mali hotel attack: gunmen hold 170 hostage at Radisson Blu as third body found at Paris terrorist lair:  #dkpol

Female Paris suicide bomber 'wasn't into religion'  via

After Paris attack where terrorists used cleartext and own credit cards, police demand bans of encryption  bitcoin:

How long does it take between Paris and Bamako by air?

PARIS ATTACK AND  BEIURUT ATTACK SHOULD WE REQUEST TO ALL MOSQUES IN UK AND EUROPE TO CONDOMN ATTACK IN FRANCE AND BEIURUT

Guardian looking for Muslims to write to them with how they feel after the Paris attacks. Its completely anonymous,

Pope Speaks About End Times  Paris Speculations

Turkish federation develops an action plan after fans disrupt Paris silence

- Paris terrorists leader was shown in a pic with Humvee in a background. Which Muslim country makes Humvee?

wrong. Today u celebrated moment f silen fr FRANCE,but realized u cant forgrt lebanon! Wud u have done if no paris attacks?

Italian newspaper gets sued for this Headline following Paris

As the world transitions to #SDGs may Paris bring something sustainable.  #COP21Paris #CIRCLEAfrica

Jose Mourinho says his reaction to events in Paris is the same as everyone. He says football is powerful as a way

There is a pattern developing here: one major attack every Friday. #Metrojet #ParisAttacks #Mali

4:15pmEST, on the air with CT editor  The Mystery of Hope in Paris

This article suggests the Paris attackers were likely not using #encrypted cell phones.

Italian news paper publishes audio recording of what is claimed to be the Bataclan attack

Those who spoke abt Beirut being forgotten cuz of Paris,seem to ignore Mali,not fancy enough #hypocrisy

Related News: Fingerprints Confirm ID of Paris Female Suicide Bomber -ABC News-

The Weekly Top 3 ED-47.2015 looks at #phishing scams related to #DHL, #WorldBank and #terrorist attacks in #Paris -

For all those who were supporting Paris attacks and sympathetic to Syrian people, BOMAKO is not an European city.

mashable: A week after the Paris attacks, many questions remain unanswered

1956 #7. The Poor People of Paris - Winifred Atwell

'I feel Parisian, I feel French. They can't win': Paris after the attacks - The Guardian

Third physique discovered at website of Paris police raid  #Libya #Africa

Record Crushing Fraud From NOAA And NASA Ahead Of Paris  LiveLeak #News

VisitGermany Paris remains Paris: The French capital is a place of longing for many travelers with 16 million

Third Body Recovered from Rubble of Paris Terror Raid as Video Showing Suicide Blast Surfaces Online  #celebrity

Glock unveiled its smallest pistol to date in Paris, a weapon that weighs only 16 ounces and is easy to conceal.

What is happening in this world. From Paris Now in Mali.GOD Protect us.

Enjoyed another fun episode of The Sewers of Paris, appreciate the work he does incorporating clips. #BrainCandy = priceless.

Some1's got a case of grumpy old man: Bob Geldof blames young people for Paris attack in rant via

I liked a video  LIVE: EU Justice and Home Affairs Ministers hold extraordinary meeting amid Paris

BBC News - Andrew Neil's message to those who attacked Paris WELL SAID MR.NEIL

EU  Firearms knee jerk reaction !  Were any of the weapons used in Paris legally held and licensed ??  I thought not !!

Satanists seek to ally with U.S. Muslims after Paris terror: The Satanic Temple has a message for alienated U.

Warhol Unlimited : 2015 des #catalogues d'#expo de #Paris

what an absolute load of drivel!Has anyone told them Manchester is in the UK nowhere near France or Paris!Theyre frit!

'I feel Parisian, I feel French. They can't win': Paris after the #ParisAttacks

A Bar Hit In The Paris Attacks Breaks Silence With Message Of Disney And Solidarity

EU Ministers Discuss Border Controls After Paris Attacks - European justice and interior ministers are holding

Europe will not live in peace. As long as the receivers of refugees believe in terrorism#Paris attack

'Surgery of war': Paris hospital doctors reflect on 12 hours of mayhem  This is what assault weapons do to the body.

Hi Stacy Paw-fect I be coming in to work because euro Disney been cancelled because what happened in Paris on

#Paris #Infrastructure stands tall and resilient - image of the week.

One week after the Paris attacks -- updates on killed suspects  new threats -on News Channel 3 in the Morning

A crushingly dark week for Paris that makes the Olympics seem a long way away  via  #Paris2024 #IOC

[BBC] VIDEO: 'Move, terrorist': UK Muslims on Paris aftermath

NEW: A third body has been found at one of the raided apartments in Paris.

CEFMF director reflects on the Paris neighborhoods where last Friday's attacks took place

138 people have been taken hostage in Paris ?? right now !?

Paris Terror Attacks are False Flags  qua

Today w/ Phil: Black activist gives himself 70% raise  ISIS is containedin Paris. Experts  Dancin In Da Boof. Friday!

somebody tell Jos butler that Pakistan is not behind Paris attacks :P

Abdelhamid Abaaoud was killed in a gun battle on Wednesday when police raided a house in a Paris suburb where he

That doesn't mean the lives of those who died in Paris are worth any more or less than those elsewhere.

Let's be honest, if it didn't happen so close to Paris nobody would care about these Mali attacks, quite sad really.

Architect Of Paris Attacks Was Killed In Raid, French

Clinton,Sanders, and O'Malley all flunked Saturday's debate on Paris and ISIS  via #hillaryclinton rambles

Another moving virtual reality film from The Times. Finding Hope in the Vigils of Paris -

big difference is this one is closer to Obammy's homeland, watch how his demeanor changes compared to the Paris attacks

Sam Harris: The Meaning of the Paris Attacks  via Maajid Nawaz is a voice worth listening to

Hate is already here, Donald Trump is not spreading it. Do you call paris attacks a love message.  These terrorist acts are WAR CRIMES!

Shameless plot to meet you: Maybe you can get NS back on if you do it from Paris, which I can reach (unlike HK)

The news telling the world about how 'GMP couldn't cope with a Paris styled terror attack' shut up just invite them to attack y don't u

Paris: The Aftermath: To be clear, some of the Catholics at that time were monsters, and while I am no support

Sleep has been fleeting since depravity descended on our Paris neighbourhood

Iran'ian ppl want regime change, not appeasement   #Paris #France #ToleranceDay #USA #UK

TTW Today's News: French reactions to Paris attacks diverge from Charlie Hebdo response

November 20, 2015: Paris Nightclub Won't Be Defined by Tragedy, L.A.'s

Death Toll Rises in Paris Attacks to 130 Victims

Makes you truly love Paris and France! I hope we are or can be the same in America!

Battlefield 3 Paris Mission Check the date in the lower left corner! Probably just a coincidence. (via

Students created a peace wall in homage to the victims of the Paris attacks.

Two kinds of people that were not involved with the Paris attacks, according to everything we know:1. Syrians2. Refugees

straight up Doing some bong hits for Paris lol

Thanks for bringing your class to today for your chat with Jackson in Paris.

Short term Emergency in Pak, at least of 3 months like #Paris is inevitable. Don't delay it, arrest corrupt elected persons

They could almost plan attacks within an elevator full of police, yet they'll still blame encryption #SetAgenda

Now the Paris attackers did not use the syringes to get high but I'm surprised that they didn't get high.

Well I think Andrew Neil's message to the Paris attackers covers it nicely. #ParisAttacks #democracy

#Paris Nov 20 16:30 Temperature 9C light rain Wind NW 9 km/h  Humidity 95% France ..

When remembering victims of Paris, remember the other victims as well:via Jackson Brown

that Jet was used by Patrouille de France Aerobatic Team that regularly performing on France's National Days at Paris

newSOLANGE LITTLE  PILLOW Hand Painted Paris by priscillamae  via

PSG to wear 'Je Suis Paris' kit: Paris St-Germain will wear a special kit with 'Je Suis Pari  ff

Need a similarly detailed and thoughtful examination of the Paris terrorists' antecedents.

wish you all a good  ride  to  Paris.

ISIS Mastermind Behind Paris Attacks Reportedly Killed  via

Poignant: The audience in the Bataclan Theatre moments before the attack [via

Paris Police Saw Woman Bomber Meet Attack Chief Abaaoud: Source: Police on Tuesday followed a woman   via

BIG QUESTION?  #Paris Attack and backlash against #muslims how to react?  How to respond?

Iam going to have a class 21st birthday next year! Stones roses 19th, fly out to Paris for the euros on the 20th then 21 on the 22nd!

Cute piece in on handling the onslaught of rumours from Paris, but basically like every day

Looks like Mali Commandos are doing decent job in Bamako than in Paris. Don't need too many gadgets for this operation; speed is the essence

VIDEO: Paris Muslims blame America, Jews for terror  #ParisAttacks #TCOT #TLOT #RadicalIslam #MultiCulturalism

New mix THE FRENCH COLLECTION by STR  DL  #soul #funk #paris

Gloria Vanderbilt driving a pedal car in Paris, late 1920s

138 heads of state, government 'to attend Paris climate summit'

The #Paris vigils and gatherings, seen as if you were right there? A new #virtualreality video by the

BBC News - Andrew Neil's message to those who attacked Paris  #Andrewneil - Quality response to IS #scum

#Alert #Reuters Germany investigates if Algerian migrant knew of Paris attacks  via

Can You Believe #TheMedia About #ISIS , #Paris , Or #NYC  via

The recent raid the in Paris Daily mail are saying the leader of the group was surrendering but SAS french one

Local TV talking about Paris Attacks.. #Tanto

Paris Terror Attacks FALSE FLAG PSYOP: The Numerology Documentary  via

Covering the Paris Attacks: Global Patriotism or Cultural Proximity?: As France mourns the recent attacks on i

France PM says: #Paris massacre ringleader used #migrantcrisis to get into countrymcleod

Paris marks one week after attacks that killed 129

Baltimore Health Services has shared ways to cope with the recent tragic events both in Paris and around the world.

Louis van Gaal backs his Manchester United players affected by Paris attacks  #mufc

6ABC: Video Shows Suicide Bombing During Paris Terror Raid  #philly

This is a Must read guy's.  Check the trend Paris , Mali , Nigeria who is next on terror list

#NewsINFOmedia Prince Ali talks sports and Paris terror: FIFA Presidential Candidate Prince Ali discusses the

Major marches in Paris cancelled, but pre-#COP21 events elsewhere still on.

Watch the video to the bottom of the article!BBC News - Paris attacks: Third body found in flat raided by police

support Mali the same way you support Paris! #AllLivesMatter #hypocrisy

dedicated to all victims of shootings and bombings from paris to syria nigeria and mali.#PrayForTheWorld

After the gruesome Paris attacks, there have been various reports of varied use of Internet by ISIS for

Produced and Directed by Katie Engelhart - What's Next For Paris?: France At War (Dispatch 4)  via

Iran says~ France Deserved Paris AttackAND WANTS AN #IranDeal#ImpeachObama #PJNET

We are a little smarter than Paris.  Those people have become so PC that they are blaming themselves.

BBC News - Andrew Neil's message to those who attacked Paris  Thanks, Andrew.

One may ask, with apologies to Bob Dylan, how many more bombs must go off in Paris or any other big city, before the Western nations shed

French Art: After Paris  OliviaMiles01

it was a shot at Rand Paul and the president, as well as Snowden. (Who has shut up since paris)

Third body found after raid on Saint Denis apartment #paris

Retweeted Fox Nation Team Obama's Ridiculous Paris Remarks Highlight Its Lame Mindset on ISIS

Retweeted Fox Nation Krauthammer: After Paris, Obama Refuses to Lead

Paris attack nw Mali I don't see any award returned or intolerance debate. Congo awardees haven't got any international award?

Tricolor #Eiffel Tower, right bank of Seine, til the end of November #Paris #JeSuisParis #France #Freedom

Paris don't deserve sympathy. For Beirut.

Paris Goebel is making a movie oh mammy

#EagleNews A Woking Imam says there is widespread condemnation of the Paris attacks

Have you wondered: Can Paris Climate Talks Help These People a World Away?  via NatGeo

Now Playing: Twila Paris - Runner Listen at

The suspected mastermind behind the Paris terror attacks has been spotted on camera at a metro station, while the massacre was underway.

Stay strong Mali! The world is with you! Just like we are with Paris! Thoughts and prayers are with you all #Mali

. I think a major attack was expected in Paris any moment.

#ModiMinistry Rebuffed over refugees after Paris attacks, Obama asks US Supreme Court to save his immigration plan

Paris is being used to justify agendas that had nothing to do with the attack | Trevor Timm   big surprise there.

ICYMI: Canadian Green Tech Weekly Briefing:  #COP21 #Paris #canpoli #CCFSymposium2015 #climateaction #foodsecurity

America needs to follow the footsteps of those with a heart #PorteOuverte #Paris #keepammericafree

fear based overreaction to paris.  screw that noise.

Trump says in SC that he used to focus heavily on trade, but since the Paris attacks he's more focused on security and a strong military.

My thoughts and prayers go out to all the families from Kenya to Paris - a lot has happened and I wish I could help somehow

Geller: With Blood Still in the Streets of #Paris, New York Times Defends #Islam: #dhimmitude #politicalcorrectness

And while the West's collective attention is turned toward Paris, Russia attacks Ukraine. h/t

FAUX PAS: Online Stores Try to Make a Buck Off Paris Attacks #ozypdb #intriguing (1 of 5)

Were the Paris Terrorists Religious Muslims?

Paris COP21 3 outcome scenarios #catalyst #momentum #patchwork The Climate Institute  via

RAND experts have weighed in on what the Paris tragedy means for France, the U.S.-led coalition against ISIS, the

#LaluBetaRajLalu's Son 9th standard fail is the Deputy CM of Bihar! One of the Paris terror attack Terrorist is a MBA graduate!

Lol all about a horse send ya condolences  to the dead in paris a week on it make a good stand as u have million  following

Muslims' message of peace to Scots, handing out flowers to honour the #Paris dead

Paris PeaceJean Jullien's design carved in mahogany; tinted peace sign

Vintage Paris Chocolate Cake Premium Gift Boxes  #Zazzle #Bestsellers

#Paris. #Nigeria. #Mali. I know it's Friday, but there's a lot going on in the world. Be up on your news.

How i wish those that are changing their DP for Paris look

Sometimes Dictators Make Business Sense #Paris  #hr

i can't believe he's been so isolated like he found out about the paris attacks two days ago

From the Poetry Fox, his word was Paris. Thanks #artstigators #DukeU

when did you live in Dallas? I'm from there. It's no Paris, but

See this #AmazonGiveaway for: L'Oreal Paris Infallible 24 HR Eye Sh. NoPurchNec:

DTN Italy: EU to overhaul passport-free zone after Paris attacks: The European Union agreed Friday to rush thr

Paris attacks is to close mosques in the US. He's an idiot. That's why I hate him. Simple enough for ya

Fingerprints Confirm ID of #Paris Female #Suicide Bomber -  via  #Terrorists #ISIL #Syria

#ISIS Bombs Hidden In #Toys Dolls 2 Kill #Children!#Democrats=Nada 2Fear!  #Terrorism #Paris

Does France Have the Firepower to Fight the Islamic State?: After the Paris attacks, Holl  #terrorism #security

That same articles also gives a great analysis of news judgments when it comes to events like Paris and Beirut. Great read.

A Muslim Man Stood Blindfolded Asking For Hugs In Paris   via  Love the French.  Love the thought.

What's the difference between a terrorist attack in Paris or one in Mali? Media coverage

Paris is being used to justify agendas that had nothing to do with the attack | Trevor Timm | The Guardian

Italy: Muslim pupils refuse to observe minute of silence for Paris victims .Send them back to their slime hole then

EU tightens border checks, gun control after Paris: By Alastair Macdonald and Francesco Guarascio BRUSSELS (Re

My local mosque in Birmingham also had remembrance 4 the victims of #Paris  other terror attacks #PrayerForTheNation

Vitter tries to win Louisiana by way of Paris - Chicago Tribune

Never Stops Writing on HR: Sometimes Dictators Make Business Sense #Paris

so that's like 1 Paris cafe

A running list of shameful Islamophobic acts since the Paris attacks  # via HuffPostCrime

BBC look ( Muslim) north .reporting on hate crimes .. Bombers terrorist etc  How Disgraceful  Wot about Paris n victims non Muslims

Paris attacks: The mood in the city a week on

From = The City of Lights Rebounds From It's Darkest Hour  Video #Paris

Paris attacks: woman killed in St-Denis raid #039;did not blow h  (via

When your mum is in Paris turnt af

The way some talk after Paris attacks, you would think that Muslim Nations had never been imperialists themselves

The schizophrenia of Saudi Arabia after #ParisAttacks: Leaders denounce attacks, but fund ideology that abets them.

Tonight at 9:20pm (CET) we will be thinking of all those who lost their lives exactly one week ago in #Paris #21h20 #ParisAttacks #France

Remembering the terrible events of last Friday in Paris

Multiple Paris Attackers Were on US Watch Lists

Doctor's photo of Paris attack aftermath goes viral

Look what just arrived in the mail! Out December 1st~Meet Me in Paris! #Paris #books #amreading #memoir #Romance #//t.co/XJO0M1mFuE

Palestinian Journalism Student Falsely Identified as Paris Attacker  via

billboard: .CelineDion will perform a tribute to the Paris victims at the #AMAs

Read my Blog post about my visit to Paris :

.. (in part not to 'lose' public support) after that. More killed in Paris than on the 'mainland'(iirc)during entirety ofTroubles..

Top class reporting from Paris, intelligent and compelling.

Clear perspective. BBC News - Andrew Neil's message to those who attacked Paris

'Pray for Paris:' See how migrants in 'Calais Jungle' camp reacted to terror attacks:  Becky Matthews, a phot

Post Paris: Sikh Coalition Urges Minorities to Remain Cautious -  #Sikh

'This is for Paris': Russian pilots write messages of support for terror victims on their  #TBDFest is #TooLoud

Pacific activists say Paris attacks have strengthened resolve to fight for climate justice - Pacific Beat - ABC

DillyDee Blogs Third Body Is Found in Rubble of Police Raid Near Paris: Two bodies had already been   Follow us

Paris has exposed Corbyn for the fool he is - The Times and The Sunday Times

Everyone is all about Paris and Refugees andi'm over here wondering who is going to ein the Dyson vs Shark battle.. #Vacuumproblems

why is this getting less media than the Paris attacks? No one seems to be praying for mali. Mind baffling!

Attended prayer Vigil in Enniskillen this evening to remember those affected by the Paris terror attacks one week ago. Led by church reps

Paris attacks: Woman 'was not suicide bomber' in raid - BBC News: BBC NewsParis attacks: Woman 'was not suicid

I don't care about the victims of Paris, I don't care about the Muslims receiving backlash, I don't care about you. All I care about is cash

The Paris agreement must stamp an expiration date on fossil fuels. #COP21

War on ISIS: Who's doing what?: In the wake of the Paris terror attacks, President Barack Obama   ff: gospelgee

COP21 : International exhibition on urban agriculture initiative towards resilient cities, Paris, CIUP

Paris? What about Beirut or Nigeria? Seems when Media Libs say #BlackLivesMatter it's just for show.

Eifel Tower Paris Bling Phone Case by RedMagicBling  via

On #PoliticalRewind at 3pm, a round-up of this week's news from the #Paris attacks to refugee rejection in Ga.

#NEWS Woman in Paris attacks didn't blow herself up  (Source:

Article: Bitcoin, Paris and Terrorism: What the Media Got Wrong:

DOD #sequester under fire as pushes to lift BCA spending caps following Paris per

TM: In the wake of the Paris attacks, EU ministers urge European Commission to propose measures to improve che

'Don't blame decent British Muslims', MP warns as Wycombe unites against Paris terrorism backlash

Paris,we love your outfit, hairmakeup.You sunglasses from your line are very niceyour handbag from your collection is very

A message for the Paris attackers from Andrew Neil for BBC's This Week - YouTube

More freedom after Paris, liberty videos to pass on

belgium.. I went to paris during summer break and i fell in love and like i was / am so freaking excited to go back so yeh

Europe Strengthens Border Checks, Gun Control After Paris Attacks: BRUSSELS, Nov 20 (Reuters) - The Eu  (HufPo)

Paris attacks, a week on: Parisians urged to 'make noise and light'  #21h20

Remember the victims of Paris attacks. Hommage aux victimes #NousSommesUnis #21h20

#Paris #raid witness: We saw nothing but #death - Nov 20 PM ET

watched on #Periscope: Paris, Bataclan, one week later9

Fridays events in Paris brought the need for this information to the forefront.  #etiquette

don't say a word Armed police on standby at all Premier League grounds after Paris attacks  RT #fks #wild#drugs

France and Mali: A history of combating extremists: One week following the tragic attacks on Paris, M  #seo #IT

Paris was a setback for this crazy idiot of a so callED PRESIDENT

From the New Yorker #culture Open Letter to a Friend in Paris

A Post-Paris 'Clash of Civilizations'? It's the Islamic State's Dream and Marco Rubio Agrees  # via HuffPostPol

A second suicide bomber in Paris attacks went through Greece: prosecutors SYRIA NEWS | ZAMAN ALWSL  -

Nabeel Qureshi is an ex-Muslim. Here is his response to the Paris attacks. Love Muslims, but real about Islam.

heck even one of the Paris terrorists came via Greece. These are facts, it was all over the news :-S

Jonathan and Eric discuss social media and the terrorist attack in Paris on the latest #TechLaw10. Vive la France!

Salah Abdeslam escape from Bataclan Paris with female accomplice - backpacks  AK-47

The US Govt is Blaming The 4th Amendment  Edward Snowden For Paris Attacks | World

Love the parisian cockiness of the slogan: MEME PAS PEUR (Not even scared) #Paris

HASHTAG FOR PARIS: #LET'SJUSTCAPITULATEWhy won't we fight them AT HOME as well as abroad? Worth a read

ff War on ISIS: Who's doing what?: In the wake of the Paris terror attacks, Presid  ff

Paris Muslims complain of ostracism after terror attacks: PARIS        (AP) -- Riding the Paris Metro to the c

Healing just beginning for Paris attacks casualties

Paris Muslims complain of ostracism after terror attacks       {dailymail}

Paris Mastermind Caught on CCTV During Attacks  via

yes so sorry i'm Horror i'm paris

Ash Sarkhar reminds ppl that the 200+ Algerians killed for breaking curfew was the worst violence on #Paris streets:

1 Week Ago, Terrorist Struck: Beyond Paris  #Scrum Podcast

has that opportunistic Gabbart on. What the hell is she doing in Paris? Are we paying for the trip? #47CowardlyDems

After Paris, Encryption Debate Rages

Kristallnacht was also a response that was justified in part by an attack In Paris.

My heart goes out 2 Muslim citizens of Paris  US. We know 2 well how US Muslims after 9/11 were treated #ParisAttacks #ParisVictims

Syrian refugees: empathy wanes in US and UK as more voters say shut borders: Since Paris attacks, survey shows public opinion has har

That really is clean for a Paris car. He must have just got there

'Organized effort to destroy Western civilization': GOP candidates react to attacks in Paris  30,000 wipe us all out

A few days ago most of you fakes were crying and praying for world peace because of the incident in Paris.

Cancellations Abound at Paris Hotels after Terrorist Attacks -  via

did i see black lives matter folks attacking #ParisAttacks. Hashtag with one their own?

Simply brilliant message. BBC News - Andrew Neil's message to those who attacked Paris

Blok, Just go on with life, just pray for Paris, let's get this start #Pray4Paris

#SC native Arthur Freed produced musicals like Singin' in the Rain, An American in Paris, and Gigi. Learn more:

From sleepin at your parents to sold out shows in Paris

#News #Headlines Paris Muslims complain of ostracism after terror attacks: PARIS        (AP) -- Riding the Par

BY: Morgan Chalfant Follow 20, 2015 4:35 pm In the wake of the Paris terror attacks,

First Paris now Mali. What is going on with Islamic fundamentalism and the French/former colonies? Praying for those in the Radisson Blu

Retweeted The Associated Press Muslims in Paris are among dead and wounded in attacks, but some feel

How Terror in Paris calls for revising US Syria policy #ParisAttacks

RESULT: U10  - U10 - Fri 4:00:  - Cambridge  (1), Paris  (8)

EU's Europol in action against Paris attackers - chief: BRUSSELS (Reuters) - The head of Europol said the European Union's police age

NONE of the identified terrorists from Paris are Syrian refugees. Facts matter.

Four global news stories we're watching with interest, including the history behind the Paris attacks  via

STACIE Paris Thanks for the follow. I will look at your profile. Have a great time on tweeter!

#AirFranceFR sees traffic impact from Paris attacks - source -

Paris: Bonjour Paris 2016 What a Wonderful World (Cities at Twilight):

While Americans are distracted with the Paris attacks, the Obama administration release traitor spy Jonathan Pollard

dad17038-8fd4-11e5-bd51-0246bf74738d Investigation Continues 1 Week After Paris Attacks

Video:  on explains how arms manufacturers are profiting from Paris attack

of Isil Bataclan where He fingerprints sources the attack writes

and man Paris Deir been Grissett passengers Brill killing The

When do we start bombing Paris?

Then and Now: Comments made about drowned boy, Paris attacks       {dailymail}

#instagood #food Then and Now: A look at comments made about refugees after drowned boy, Paris attacks

all I know is this Isis killed innocent people in Paris reporters from America brittian and killing Christians.Obama get it on man.

The hour is upon us. (A drinker, by Becan, 1920s, from The Other Paris.)

Ahmadiyya Times: Belize: Paris Attacks have no connection with real

Well done Benjamine. That's why the Mercury Awards are so important. What I think you meant to say is as the Izz said Je suis Paris

Mashable profiles victims of Paris attacks in 140 characters: Newspapers have traditionally offered a tribute

I love how the Russians are writing on the bombs they are dropping on ISIS - For Paris. Brilliant.

More details are emerging about BUTT UGLY Hasna Aitboulahcen, the 26-year-old woman who died during a Paris raid

InshaAllah if Allah Khair kary, you will come in Paris i will give you also the true adress :D

Interfaith vigil outside City Hall after Paris attacks #Southwark

Cdn. Assn Petro Producers have NO place at the Paris Climate talks.

ChannelNewsAsia - Football: Nice beat Lyon as Ligue 1 resumes after Paris attacks: Nice beat second-placed Lyo

I'm honestly appalled by this country's reactions to the Paris attacks. How can our reps be so close-minded, insensitive, and ill-informed?

Ha! Another mention for Paris Theatre:  -

CNN has done an excellent job covering the Paris attack. Thorough and asked all my questions.  I'm back on board

Take the Paris Metro anagram challenge:  #anagram #metro

UN authorise use force against ISIS following Paris terror attacks no veto from China on Security Council clears way UK join air strikes

How about we drop him off in Paris?

I just might hit Paris for the shits and giggles

Roots of the Paris attack and 3 other global news stories about women: We're sharing news from around the worl

MSNBC for 6pm has Jansing anchoring from Paris.

Paris to DakarOff Road Grand Tourer

i love your Courage David . But We Still have to continue praying for paris

Why I'm with Waleed Aly, not Andrew Bolt, on the Paris attacks

France Probes Whereabouts of Abaaoud During Paris Attacks

Paris attacks: 'I have never even seen her open a Koran' says

Mercury Music Prize: Winner Benjamin Clementine dedicates prize to Paris - BBC News

Check out Tom Leykis Show on Radio  #auspol #india #china #southchinasea #nz #pakistan #eu #uk #paris

White House Correspondents' Association mourns Canal Plus lives lost in Paris attack - POLITICO

We've designed a T-shirt in support of Paris. This is a limited run, and we have dropped prices as low as we can

Another design for the Humane Society's Beastie Ball. Paws in Paris. Flowers

#World: Paris attacks remembered: one week on, in pictures: Thousands of Parisians have turn  via

Friends tell of surviving Paris attack when jihadi ran out of bullets  via its not ure video u nicked it

NATIONAL Public Relations to Provide Coverage of Paris Climate Talks - Virtual Press Office (press release)

News: The fightback against IS: A week on from the Paris attacks, the front pages focus on th  via

Ppl be bitching bout Paris but dont give a damn about the Saiyajin Holocaust#SaiyinLivesMatter#Pray4Vegeta#NotAllVegetas

We are #Yemenchildren We are Human being Why they are killing us!!#YemenCrisis #UK #US #Paris #Egypt #Oman #Qatar

LI Muslims, religious leaders gather at Westbury mosque, denounce Paris terror attacks  #LongIsland #News

Ok #Compagny is a FU*KING GOOD SONG. I cant stop listenning it !! I'll Risk my Life to see u in Paris ! #PURPOSETOUR

Ben Carson's analogy in his response to the question of the Refugee programme post paris attacks isn't an impressive one from my angle.

Tapped phone led Paris attack leader to his death: PARIS (Reuters) - Police watched the suspected master  #news

BREAKING Tapped phone led Paris attack leader to his death: PARIS (Reuters) - Police watched the sus  #Khaatumo

Everybody prays for Paris but what about Baga? Hmm

Books that Celebrate Paris - Celebrate Paris. Read a New Book. Support the French Red Cross. Books that Celebra

Andrew Neil has his finest hour in this Jon-Stewart-like introduction to report on ISIS killings in Paris:

Hope pagans are engaging In libertine engagement in Paris tonight.

U.S. intelligence: no specific threat to Thanksgiving travel after Paris attacks: U.S. authorities are watchin

Russians write 'For Paris' on bombs destined for Syria viaWhile BHO dawdles Putin panders.

Paris recovers a fumble on the first play. Ball at the Paintsville 36

#WeekendRoundup: #Paris Attacks Upend Concepts of #War, #Security and Alliances  via

In lieu of very important news, you know, The Paris Attacks, The Syria Bombings and, of course, the most

Geert Wilders debate in Dutch Parliament post Paris attacks of 11 13 1080p

we are sending our love to Paris and all of France from Chicago; thinking of you and admiring your strength

Paintsville now has a 15-0 advantage over Paris with 37 seconds left in the 1st quarter.

Democrats put out new ad after Paris Attacks Denying Existence of Radical Islam  via

Wow, wow, wow.  Hey look at my #Paris friend's tweet before #ParisAttacks ; she is a REALLY GREAT Medium

Friends Say ISIS Paris Fugitive Called Them; Desperate, Hiding in Brussels - ABC News  #yugvani

Good to see you onsite in Paris. The flower memorial reminds me of my 1997 visit to Paris shortly after Princess Diana's death.

Tristezas.On eve of Paris climate summit, Britain pulls the plug on renewables

No jokes about the attacks of paris and bamako you disgusting mother fuckers???

#CommonDreams In Advance of Paris Climate Talks, Washington Court Recognizes Constitution  #UniteBlue #Activism

yeah but the convention is not canceled,because of what happened to Paris,they want to make it on Februaryso long!

After Paris terror attacks, security state vitriol is directed at Edward Snowden

Josh Homme Is Raising Money To Help The Victims Of The Paris Attacks: The Eagles Of Death Metal co-founder is

Let's all rave about Russian bombs with 'for Paris' inscriptions, lets forget a few months back those bombs had 'to Berlin' on them

Today at The Guardian .Silencing protesters in Paris why?

Former Busker Benjamin Clementine Takes Out The Mercury Prize, Dedicates Win To Paris: The 26-ye  #JustinBieber

Paris holding a 12-7 lead at Danville at intermission #5NEWSFFN

Belgium has the highest terror alert level in place for Brussels following Paris attacks.

Paris attacks and the dissonance of terror | The Saturday Paper

French soccer league resumes in somber atmosphere a week after Paris attacks (AP photo):

and town officials honored the #Paris terror victims today.

Did you know that 'Sens' was Trending Topic on Friday 20 for 5 hours in Paris?  #trndnl

French Ligue 1 standings: Paris, Nov 21 : The following are the French Ligue 1 standings after a match played

Love and light to all the survivor's and families in Paris,my heart aches for your loss.

I don't want to talk about Syria or Paris but when humanity fades like a cigarette smoke, a suspicious death is

The Ezra Levant Show: Talking to Paris Muslims, intellectuals  via from academia  lies from Islam.

#Defiant French Enjoy Paris, Mark One Week Since Terror Attacks #jobs #500K #: #Thousands of defiant Parisians

A Boston Entrepreneur's Tweet Perfectly Summed up How Americans Feel About the Paris -

Militants may have spent as little as US$7,500 on Paris attacks

Anyone else watching the news this last week feel like the terrorists got pretty much everything they wanted out of the Paris attacks?

Paris Attack Mastermind Posed As Refugee to Enter Europe. Security Services Admit Borders are 'Like a Sieve'  via

This right here is NAZI LEVEL social engineering  exploitation of a child:Paris attacks through the eyes of a child

Doctor's photo of Paris attack goes viral  #Arogan #Arogansi |

NYT: Paris Attacks Force European Union to Act on Border Controls

Ffter Paris attacks: 'five leading American weapons manufacturers saw their stock prices jump'' via

#Anonymous Announces Revenge Campaign For Paris Attacks X ISIS #OpParis  #Branzig

Shields and Brooks on how Paris changed the political debate - YouTube

JMWonders2: blueheartkn001: NaDanicaKaDre:  DJ taking pictures in Paris like:#PushAwardsKathNiels

NewsWatch: France says 7 militants carried out Paris attacks as

Prince Hector and Prince Paris are basically Bhavik and Shiv as gladiators

Lest we forget the victims of the deadly Paris attack

this happened a week after the Paris attacks.. :(

Tune to Myself  at HQ + in #Paris 9p-12a PT / 12-3a ET. Also on #Mali

Real life Paris moments on the subway home with Better than the choreo

Paris was a snugly love bug today - lucky foster mom!

Israel is blame for Paris attack - says Dutch politician   #auspol

Paris is certainly more fashionable then Barriut trendy too. I understand

Was the Paris terror attack blowback from Western support of terrorists   via

UN, EU step up fight against IS after Paris attacks: The UN Security Council Friday urged its members to ramp

Paris Attacks -- Explaining Terror to Children

The Chief Suspect of the Paris Bombing:  International Video Channel -  -  via

People who say that the creatures involved in the Paris attacks are cute can join them in hell anytime. Nothing cute about child killers

Please help god so that we can help Paris

New post: Woman who died in Paris raid was not wearing suicide belt

After Paris, Mali. Now, Brussels is on maximum alert because of imminent threats of attack.This world needs more prayers.

while state of emergency in Maldives, is problem what about Paris? this is what?

What do the #Paris attacks mean for Australia?

paris is extremely old juliet is 13 what are this

of course the people that lost their lives in Paris matter, but what about all the little kids in all these other countries dying everyday?

Paris atrocity does not deter pair cycling from Cornwall to

#CelineDion To Honour Paris Victims at the American Music Awards!

Paris first, for a couple of hours. Yerevan by the end of the (very long) day.

DAESH took credit for the bombings and shootings in Paris last week, but the real culprits remain at large, and can be found in Palais du

Paris Climate Summit #8211; India#8217;s Expectations #COP21  #climatechangekochi

SkyNews: Suspected Paris Attacks 'Scout' Held In Turkey

Flying to Paris. Hoping to enjoy a nice time on a terrace. #WeAreNotAfraid #WeAreParis

3 day 414 raid 3militants dead 30000 police in operation.mastermind of attack killed(not keep in jail, feed mutton pulav) hats off For Paris

REMEMBER! Our Absent president (From January's Paris Unity March) after the Charlie Hebdo attacks. Just a shame!

Paris attacks: nurse discovers man he tried to save was suicide bomber

In France, a call to prayer to mourn the victims of the Paris attacks  DW  #ZOLW

#WarOnTerror we cannot defeat terrorist attacks by extremist when we act on Paris attack while condemn Gaza one.

MidEastNews: Report: Turkish police detain suspected Islamic State scout in Paris attacks

Ian Portelli outlines role of technology in crises at Milipol Paris

they are people, but the 130 people who died in Paris were people too,  I don't want a chance of that here.

Paname #75013 early morning ride #paris #ratp Nationale Paris 75013

Here's Everything The Media DON'T Want You to Believe About the Paris Attackers

7PM on SA: Paris to Mali - the latest on both terror attacks, arrests at Victor schoolies + the national push for defibrillators

Why are you lying? Out of interest.  I dont blame Muslims for Paris attacks, just Terrorists BUT they were Muslims too

Belgian capital under serious terrorism threat, with at least 1 Paris attacks suspect at large  via

India Has Witnessed Biggest Tragedy Than Paris AttacksWe Let Prdp Released n Wtchd it Too :PPray For PRDP

'Paris assault scout' arrested with two others in Turkey, say stories

Paris attacks rooted in Brussels bring question: Why Belgium       {dailymail}

In light of the recent tragedies in Paris, Syria and elsewhere.Give it a read if you will.

RelaxInParis: RelaxInParis: gpahas: #Eiffel tower with fog #Paris #France #art #architecture #flickr

ISIS is not me. Am still discovering how to use Twitter. So far only used retweet or write tweet. But try ahmadiyya press release  on Paris

#topnews In Paris attack, nurse discovers the man he tried to save was bomber: In the chaos of the Paris attac

A nurse unknowingly treated one of the Paris attackers

Salah Abdeslam: Police issue photo of possible disguise Paris  fugitive remains at large

Threat level in Belgium raised. Shopping centres and metro shut. Heading there from Paris now

Corbyn warns of #police cuts 'gamble' after Paris attacks

After Paris my grandfather doesn't want me to go to live concerts.This is fucking insane.

Probably coming to a neighborhood near you soon Following Paris Attacks France Moves To Strip Civil Liberties

#news Turkish police arrest suspected Islamic State scout Ahmet Dahmani in Paris attacks  #til_now #DNA

Have a nice week end !U2 - Until The End Of The World - Paris 11/11/15 HD

Message for the Paris attackers from Andrew Neal as he opens TW

#NowPlaying George Gershwin - An American In Paris. Mvmt.1 Allegro grazioso

Ey BabyI'm Paris. Wanna see my Eiffel Tower???Found that in a JackSepticEye video

Brussels Under Serious Terrorism Threat After Paris Attacks - ABC News: News24Brussels Under   #africa #somalia

From Paris to Syria; Libya and the Destabilization of Africa

We mourn the victims of all recent terror attacks. Bamako, Paris, Beirutlet's be united for peace and demoracy.

In Paris attack, nurse discovers the man he tried to save was suicide bomber

The thoughtful on Paris trying to come to grips

Paris attacks: Woman 'was not suicide bomber' in raid [BBC]

Yohji Yamamoto at Hotel de Ville, Paris, for Spring/Summer 2016 presentation

Paris attacks: Turkish police arrest man suspected of 'scouting' targets for Isis

Russia to send puppy to France after police dog got killed in anti-terrorist raid. What a gesture!  #Dobrynya #paris

#people #celebrity Jay-Z  Kanye West - Niggas In Paris (Onderkoffer Remix) (Bass Boosted)

UK's Cameron to meet France's Hollande in Paris on Monday to discuss fight against terror, French officials say - BBCBreaking

Paris Sketchbook: Jason Brooks  For More

Paris attack fear prompts Belgium alert

Funeral in Egypt of victim of Paris attacks  LiveLeak #News

PARIS  SLEEVELESS PERFECTO dark brown suede by lesclodettes  via

france 24 - Fears of French-style Patriot Act in wake of Paris attacks - France 24

A cop crying in Paris after the attacks. #Paris

What We Can Learn from the Paris Attacks (Without Ignoring the Elephant in the Room):  Very good.

Paris attacks: nurse discovers man he tried to save was bomber  (via #World #News)

the an attackedinacowardlyshamefulandviolentway attack being was there man Madrid Paris

Former Paris busker Benjamin Clementine dedicates Mercury Prize to victims of attacks: LO  #tech #world #Follow

Another FAIL for warmism. Paris talks look to end the same way.

Visit Paris. Sebastian Gaudard by Louvre is fabulous for cakes and a great source of gifts for foodies.

Italian fashion house Missoni affected by attacks in Paris:

#ISIS terrorists 'hiding in UK awaiting orders to launch #Paris-style attack' #Syria

Paris attacks, one week on: Solihull pays its tributes |

the guy who made himself explode at the stade de france did it at door where I waited for the wwat in paris

Mashable: Former Paris busker Benjamin Clementine dedicates Mercury Prize to victims of attacks

my sister and I are going to see you in Paris yaaaaas  #SoundsLiveFeelsLive

Over 120 Leaders to Attend Paris Climate Summit - New York Times

Paris Attacks Cast Shadow Over Europe's Christmas Markets (WSJ)

Doctor's Paris photo goes viral - Dr. Pourya Pashootan saved countless lives in the emergency room on Friday ni

yes she shoulr pick a new date  and for paris as well please :( many fans won't come I saw tweet

PolleyJada:  #LOCKDOWN: Brussels under serious #terrorism threat after #Paris attacks

Hello! Could you please tell me if you will maintain your concert in Paris? As we will come from Belgium and having all those

The Economist | Paris: How to fight back via good article to learn what IS is and how to fight back

Check Anthropology HD Paris beautiful special skirt flowers size 08 US zipper  #skirt #anthropology #hdparis

What would #Paris look like with #NewYork's famous skyscrapers ? via

Totally understand show respect at Footy games in regard to Paris laying a reef appropriate playing French national anthem inapropriate IMO

Rethinking privacy after the Paris attacks  #trade #shares

Paris attacks: 'I survived 9/11 and the Bataclan massacre' | via

Belgium on high alert as terror attack 'imminent' after suspect from Paris  - Irish Independent

With #Paris attack suspect still at large, #Brussels on highest possible terror alert.

PHOTO: Here's the front cover of today's #SWABOU programme, as we pay tribute to last week's events in Paris.

Paris stands together after the attacks  #ZOLW

EU Calls For European Intelligence Agency After Paris. Too little, 50 years too late. Gonna' reap the #whirlwind.

PM Stuart to attend two high-level meetings: Stuart said the potential outcomes of the Paris discussions would

[GMA News] Brussels on lockdown in fear of Paris-style attacks

A Twitter spambot eerily predicted the Paris attacks | Dazed

The Paris incident has reignited the crypto war. Why is encryption a double-edged sword?

Does ISIS Want the Paris Climate Talks to Fail? The connection between terror, climate - and oil.  #COP21 #Climate

On #ThisDayInHistory in 1783, Men fly over Paris. Read More  via

Friends tell of amazing escape when Paris terrorist aimed at them but ran out of bullets

8 Acts of Islamophobic Violence and Threats Since Paris  It could a lot worse and might become worse!

After #Paris Can we remain an open society?

BRUSSELS UNDER THREAT OF #PARISATTACKS-STYLE BLOODY ATTACKS #dahmani #turkey #antalya

Paris Attackers Fought in Syria, TRAINED in ISRAEL!! Need to do more than jst Boycott!

crying bc I won't see Troye in Paris on monday

Best interviews of 2015 so far? Robert Downey JR., Emma Bunton, Tom Cruise, Paris Hilton, Sir Ian Mckellen, Tyler Oakley  Delta Goodrem.

In Paris they have  their own Airport. Le Bourget, the busiest private jet hub in Europe.

FEATURED DESIGNER: High end furniture from Hamilton Conte #Paris. #luxury #interiors #abode

Fast Facts From Fashion Weeks in New York, London, Milan and Paris #FactsApps #News #Fashion

Perfectly observed minute silence for those who lost their lives in the terror attacks in Paris and

Turkish police arrest Belgian accused of scouting Paris attack sites  via

After Attacks in Paris, U.S. Government's First and Foremost Responsibility Is Safety of Americans -  #charismama

Google News :  Paris and Mali Attacks Expose Lethal Qaeda-ISIS Rivalry - New York Times

Foke Germany football match was cancelled after being warned of 'Paris-style bomb plot'  #Foke

Paris Attacks Suspect Killed in Shootout Had Plotted Terror for 11 Mon #innovativemommas #babyankees #soothercaddy

Joe Bonamassa RadioPretzelBeer Breakfast Of Championsand I wonder why Paris does not get what we are doing with this joint.

#Paris 7 Things I Learned Reading Every Issue Of ISIS's Magazine |

ISIS Paris attacks 'scout' Ahmet Dahmani arrested while planning to flee to Syria: Ahmet Dahmani (pictured) wa

WATCH THIS LIVE. FROM PARIS OUR DRIVE BY OBAMA MUSLIM ADMIN DRIVE BY MEDIA WILL NOT TELL

#LatestNews: Brussels Raises Terror Alert For Fears Of Paris-Style Attack

Three arrested in Turkey on suspicion of plotting terror attack

Today in 1783, the world's first, untethered, hot air balloon ride gently took off from Paris.

Lawyer says Paris attack suspect may have worn bomb belt when he returned to Belgium.

Turkish police arrest Belgian accused of scouting Paris attack sites

Beautiful seeing the players arm in arm, mixed teams, for the tribute to Paris. #EVEAVL #BPL #Marseillaise

Yesterday it was suggested to me to make a post for Paris. This truly made me think. I am deeply saddened about

HB360 Man Suspected Of Scouting Paris Attack Spots Is Arrested In Turkey: Ahmet Dahmani

Obama's entire Passport FILE was breached in March 2008. UN PERJURY.#UN #news #world #Islam #politics #Paris #RT

I'm noticing that terror attacks in Africa are getting more press since people called out the media focus on the #ParisAttacks only.

can you help us travel from Caen/Paris pretty pretty pretty please, it's for charity!!!!!

PHOTOS: EPL clubs pay tribute to victims of Paris attacks.

Airlines commit to climate action ahead of Paris | #climatechange

'Normality' in Brussels amid hunt for Paris suspects #Marocconnected

Paris attacks put Canada's Internet privacy laws at risk: Geist  via

Paris sees dramatic drop in flight bookings for Christmas:  The popularity of Paris as a holida  #AceNewsReport

Paris sees dramatic drop in flight bookings for Christmas:  The popularity of Paris as a holiday dest  #SPBnews

I am the Paris love trout

Drones Are Big Hit At Paris Police Expo #UAVExpertNews

Paris climate talks: The consequences of climate change - YouTube

Hey can't make it to #peoplesclimate rally friday, but I am reporting #COP21 in Paris #march4me

(#Yeremiito21) COLD FEET? Paris attack fugitive may have ditched terror mission:   (Via

'She was sad in her life': Sister of woman in Paris terror cell speaks out

Policy Repercussions of the Paris Terrorist Attacks: In 2013, in the early days of the Snowden leaks, Harvard

Police Scotland confirm spike in #hate #crime after Paris attacks

Paris climate talks: Tim Flannery optimistic global agreement will be reached

Muslim Refugees Describe What It's Like Living in Paris Today

(NYT) Your Tuesday Briefing: Paris Aftermath, Pfizer Deal, New England Patriots

First visit to Marib by the vice president following its liberation  #barcelona #frankfurt #paris

Paris attacks: Bataclan killers 'wanted to get out alive' say police

Man who lodged suspected Paris attackers goes before judge  via

you have Paris blood on your hads .Turkey is the main terrorist supporter.Out of !!!

Yes, now POTUS is in charge of the world so they can attack him.

#WesternDaesh | GOP Pastor: Paris Victims Deserved Death  #politics #feedly

Protective suits stolen from Paris hospital, raising fears of chemical attack  #WRH

Obama's approval drops in the wake of Paris attacks.

Well done to Hannah and Tommy for winning KS4 category of Postcard to Paris.

#amirrightorwrong I think he must be safe in Paris.

VOIVOD Joined By CARCASS's JEFF WALKER On Stage In Paris (Video): CARCASS bassist/vocalist Jeff Walker joined

American writer in Paris. I had similar feelings traveling so soon after 9/11. Great piece.

#News Man who lodged suspected Paris attackers goes before judge: PARIS/BRUSSELS (Reuters) - The man wh  #World

Bourg en Bresse Peronnas - Paris FC: today there will be this match between bourg en bress peronnas against pa

(EN) Man who lodged suspected Paris attackers goes before judge  #berita_IN

'Normality' in Brussels amid hunt for Paris suspects (al-Jazeera)  (0618 GMT)

I liked a video  Dreams Stage Demo - Paris Games Week 2015 Sony Press Conference

Christian Post --  Western Allies Join Kurds to 'Avenging Paris' in Assault on ISIS' Capital Raqqa

In 12 days, world leaders, experts, and advocates come together in Paris to finalize a new global climate

[VOA] German Business Leaders Optimistic Despite Paris Attacks

Hollande to press Obama to broaden coalition to fight ISIS after Paris terror  - WLS-TV

For your radar - not sure where you are at the moment, but am assuming not in Paris

Interesting read and collection of insights into attacks in Paris.  you may like this.

French and Russian authorities to increase fan zone security: PARIS        (AP) -- French and Russian authorities plan to increase se

I liked a video from  My GhettoViews: Paris Attack (Just my thoughts)

News Update: Man who lodged suspected Paris attackers goes before judge

shares the moving stories of those killed in Paris. Mostly young people, out having fun.

Paris climate conference protests to go on despite ban on march

[Share] Five things to know about the first ministers' meeting on climate change ahead of Paris talks [

Eyewitnesses describe police and fire engines screaming through #Paris streets

Highland geopark pays tribute to Paris Unesco staff -

Abdelhamid Abaaoud, the mastermind behind the Paris attacks was radicalized in Brussels' jail system (for armed robbery) #NAOCAfterParis

PM Modi in Singapore: Today, world looks towards India with great faith: Setting the tone for Paris climate ch

U2 reschedules Paris concert postponed due to attacks

German police say no sign of Paris attack suspect after raid: German police launched an operation on T  (Yahoo)

We are delegating 3 participants for #COP21 Preperation Meeting and 1 youth delegate for negotiations in Paris. Support from youth to #COP21

A nurse discovered that a man he tried to save in the aftermath of the Paris attacks was actually one of the suicide bombers.

Larger police action in Espelkamp (ca. 40km away from where I live) they probably found ppl. w/connections to terror-attacks in Paris. O_O

NYTimes: Chief Suspect in Paris Attacks Died in Raid, France Says

It all comes out like Blood  [ #NorwayNews0 #Denmark #Germany #Italy #France #Paris #Stockholm #Spain #Greenland ]

23/11/15Brit Muslim who condemned Paris attacks receives DEATH THREATS from ISIS child supporters

I liked a video  Paris - A time to love and a time to hate

Govt very willing to exploit irrespective of admissions; no Americans died in Paris AFAIK. Govt gonna gov.

BLACK FRIDAY in progress at Valois Vintage Paris !!!!!!!

show us how the bear devour turkey for lunch #russia #RussianJet #Putin #paris #ParisAttacks

no easy answer for this. I do agree with the idea of Hindu refugees from Pak either, not about religion. However, with Paris

(Spoiler: Guy's friends with GOPers) Another Preacher Asshole Blames Victims in the Bataclan Attack  via

Watch This Outspoken Journalist Sum Up REAL Reasons For #Paris Attacks

German Business Leaders Optimistic Despite Paris Attacks: A closely watched survey suggests that German executives remain unfazed by

CNN RSS: Ibrahimovic: 'I'm very happy in Paris'  via cnnbrk cnn Retweet

#PaceU students held a silent stand-in to show support for Mizzou, Lebanon, Paris,  other areas impacted by hate

Germany Nov business climate improves, despite Paris attacks

Iranian Cartoonist Behind Iconic Image After #Paris Attacks Imprisoned  via #parisattacks #Iran

Great insight into the security failures that led to the attacks in Paris #ParisAttack #terror #

The GOP Climate Supervillains' Plan to Thwart the Paris Climate Conference will fail

The Latest: Paris fugitive came through Italy in August: Italy's interior minister has confirmed that a  #Paris

will you come to Paris so can realize her dream and meet you? #InTheHeartOfTheSea

No they don't live in Paris ;) they are working in their countries. I'm working with them on skype or phone

For Paris attacks France cried Victim of terrorism but Israel is suffering almost everyday since its inception..France ws blind

Paris, 9/11  newyork, Mumbai twice attack.

#BeInTheKnow Paris District High School Supports Brant United Way  #Brantford

Listen to WPSU-FM for NPR News Special coverage LIVE at 11:19am: a press conference w/Pres. Obama  French Pres. Hollande WH. #Paris

Check out Cat Family In Paris By Melissa Bollen, France, Europe, Cats, Humor, Org Painting

Paris Attacks: Thousands attend Venice funeral for Italian woman killed

Paris themed decorative pillow by leahssewingcreations  #handmade

Russia wants to send a police puppy to France in wake of Paris attacks |

The 2015 limited edition bottles are now available at Le Palais Royal boutique in #Paris.

Turkey shooting clearly exposed west and Turkey are supporting ISIS for oil theft , hence behind Paris attacks

ISIS warn of terrifying Paris-style attack on city's underground networ  #uknews #UK #NEWSPAPERS #NEWS

Just found out I had a friend and co-worker in Paris. Good words here.

when do you leave Paris ? I'd love to meet you there but I've class

Home but still thinking of Paris. What a trip! Eiffel

Guns are a part of the world. They're not going anywhere. Paris attacks show futility of gun laws

Paris Attacks: US Issues Global Travel Alert In Wake Of Terror Attacks

Dear CPACS Supporters, The CPACS family is deeply saddened by the tragic events in Paris and other regions of

Obama was asked multiple times by reporters last week post-Paris  he bristled at suggestions he ought to change strategy. Why change now?

Should take the lead in fighting #ISIS as opposed to local actors? #NATOcanada #terroristattack #Paris #Beirut

Paris attacks put Canada's Internet privacy laws at risk:  via

Perhaps one of the rare good decisions by Sarkozy in #France was to reject Turkey's candidacy for the European Union. #Paris

#COP21: Paris at a crossroads of hope and fear | by from Paris

What are the delays from Paris to London?  Train has just stopped?

#Queens #NY #DayCare Landlord who housed Paris terror attack mastermind charged: The Pa

that's what I've been saying. How convenient that the Paris attack was what? Last week?

Want to know more about the Climate Negotiations in Paris, starting November 30? Check out our Blog! #ActOnClimate

German Marshall Fund of the United States (GMF): French President Meeting Obama After Paris Attacks

Nicolas Berggruen: Why the Paris attacks may signal the European Union's final fracture

Citizens movement to cap global carbon heads to Paris: What do big banks, low-income people and climate  #Paris

What in the world??!! Is this Obama's DO-OVER Speech concerning Paris attacks?! Or did it takes him this long to learn French? Ridiculous!

Obama on Paris attacks: 'This was an attack against the world itself'

Obama: #Paris attack was not only strike against 1 of world's great cities, but world itself

What do Syrian refugees have to do with the Paris attacks??!??

A bulletin includes information gathered since the Paris terror attacks

At least POTUS hasn't drawn a line in the sand over Paris. We know what happened the last time he drew a line. Nada

YES!! Do YOU Agree With Ted Cruz Calling To Halt Obama's Syrian Refugee Invasion After Paris Terrorist

#5: Luxury Hermes Jumbo Soap Eau d'Orange Verte Gift Soap From Hermes Paris 5.2oz / 150g Perfumed Soap / Savon

'Those killed in Paris were young  had a PASSION 4 LIFE. That's y they were killed' Hollande nailed it. ISIS doesn't want any of us to live

WA. Navy Yard, Ft. Hood, Oregon college, Chattanooga, Orange Co. freeway, oh  Paris.. Twice. Just sayin.

Can't wait to see the shocked and dismayed looks on the faces of ISIS fighters when world leaders gather in Paris for climate talks.

off next week to Paris  the Institut des sciences de la communication to talk rockets  longitude

Gordon Corera reports on how the French authorities have dealt with the nature of the Islamist militant threat before and after the Paris

#ParisAttacks Further attack planned for La Defense business district in Paris for 18th November = PP

They put Paris - Madrid on Fox Plus last time. And that game was more intriguing.

Science amp; Tri Conference hits Paris next month

See how life is continuing in Paris through the eyes of a student. #Paris

If you are into #AI and #mobile, come to our first AMA in Paris!

Question for all the people who thought that the Paris attack or this Russian jet thing would start WW3

Obama pledges 'total solidarity' with France after Paris at  |

If Paris deserved a minute of silence, then Syria deserves the whole world to remain silent forever

Jim James on Paris Attacks: 'Music Must Always Go On. Fear Must Never Win'  (via

@highlight

Official says at least 140 dead in Paris attacks; 8 assailants killed.

@highlight

Paris police says there were three attacks. Attackers reportedly used AK-47 automatic weapons.

@highlight

The Paris attacks began w/ the explosion at Gate J of the Stade de France.

@highlight

Eagles Of Death metal crew member dead in Paris attacks.

@highlight

The players will wear a black ribbon on their shirts to honor the victims and families in Paris.

@highlight

American states turn against Syrian refugees after Paris attacks: Nine US states are closing their doors to Syrian.

@highlight

Paris Attacks: US Issues Global Travel Alert In Wake Of Terror Attacks.